Chapter 1 
It’s over 
“That's it. It's over.”, I whispered mostly to myself as we witnessed the remaining chunks of
the nautilus rain down from the blue, almost orange looking sky. I was glad this was done
because my limbs were about to scream in agony. We hadn’t had a proper rest for weeks at
this point. As I looked over my companions, my smile couldn’t be contained. We survived,
despite it all, we survived. I listened to what each had to say, keeping my thoughts to myself,
but then I felt a chill run down my spine. As I looked over, I was horrified as realization hit
me like ice-water, Astarion.
Looking as dashing as every despite it all, I focused my attention on him. “So, what’s next for
us? The world is our oyster, and she has many pearls we can choose from.”, he laughed.
I hoped that my ill feeling was wrong, but we’d gotten lucky enough and it was running dry.
“I honestly don’t mind what we do, once we get… Ow!” he exclaimed.
In horror, we began to see smoke coming from under his armor. His perfect pale face started
to show patches where flames would soon burst if he didn’t get out of the sunlight fast.
“What the - oh no. Oh, gods. Well… it was nice while it lasted. Argh! I’m sorry, I- I have to
go!”, Astarion said painfully and took off running.
I was too shocked to move as I glanced over the others, but when Shadoheart spoke, I was
incredulous! That’s all you guys have?! We have done so much for each other… Astarion, my
heart split into a million needles as he took off running in pain, all the while the group, our
friends, had not so much to say as an “Oh, well. Sucks to suck.” I can’t leave him alone like
this.“It seems that’s the end of Astarion’s love affair with the sun. That’ll be hard on him…” said
Shadoheart.
He’s close to death and that’s all you’ve got to say! I dared not stay any longer among them
and listen to their “poor him, oh well” commentary. I took off running after him, forcing my
aching limbs to pull strength from the ether, for I had nothing left in me after the fight. He
was in danger, my Astarion was in danger… What? I mean, my friend needs me.
As I thought that, my body moved faster, I could see the outline of him darting in whichever
shadow he could find in a panic. Seeing a giant tarp-like material nearby some barrels and a
fallen wall, I grabbed it as tight as I could while I sped up. Dodging the random survivor here
and there or jumping over crates and barrels, I had to push harder to reach him in time.
” I’ve got you!” I said more to myself than to him, but he looked up at my right before I
covered him with the thick tarp and pushed him under a sort of wheeled cart. His eyes were
shocked yet scared for he almost died. He had survived to become a hero, and that was to be
his end? Not if I could help it.
“ Tav! …what?…how?… I…”, he stammered, too shocked to speak. “ Are you hurt,
Astarion?! Do you need medical help?! How can I help?! Please, tell me! What should I do?!” I
said as I began to feel tears fall down my cheek. Why was I so terrified for his safety? Sure,
we had our bit of fun here and there, but why did it hurt to see him like this, so weak? Could
it be…? No, I surely can’t be, can I?
“Tav, I- I am alright, I think. You arrived just in the nick of time. It’s just that my hair… well,
thank you.” He tried to fake a smile, but his eyes betrayed him. He was grateful that at least
one of the gang came after him in his time of need. Likewise, he wasn’t expecting anyone to
try to save a vampire-spawn from bursting into flames.“I don’t want to remove the tarp just yet. I am afraid that if I do, you will start burning again.
So, you better get comfortable because I am not moving and neither are you.” I said to what I
think was his ear.
I couldn’t tell, for I threw the tarp on him, pushed him down and under. I hadn’t been that
close to him since the time in the woods when we… the memory of him waking me up as he
tried to sneak a bite while I slept, then the memory of him inviting him for a bit of fun in the
woods. My body began to flush, my heart started to race at the memory of him. I have to
focus. I don’t have time for my fantasies and raunchy memories of him. He is my friend and I
want him to be safe, especially now that he no longer has sun-protection.
“Well, I don’t suppose you will be moving off me anytime soon, my dear?” he asked in a
more relaxed tone. I shifted a little, but I didn’t want to move, I was too scared. What if I
move a little and he loses a foot. I can’t risk it.
“Do you want me to move? I don’t think it’s safe, yet. Do you think you can wait until the sun
fully sets?” I asked while trying to sound calm and nonchalant. I doubt he bought it. He was
the expert at lying, and I tended to be too honest and straightforward. He giggled and shifted
to get a little more comfortable. After all, I was technically the big spoon at the moment…
well, as big a spoon as I could be with my height and frame.
“On second thought, I don’t mind this. It’s not every day that our hero Tav offers her, should
I say, services in this way. I think I am going to enjoy this a little longer.” I tried to kick him
for saying that, but it was a tight space and I ended up getting closer to his back. I felt him
stifle a laugh.
“You’re lucky I don’t want to see my mates in danger, Astarion. Stop teasing, or I will kick
your calf once we get out.” I said, but I couldn’t say it with anger.
“Oh, so mates, are we? And here I thought I was losing to Gale? Hahaha”“What?! Gale? I mean, he is a great guy and all, but I… never mind that.”
My cheeks flushed red, I could feel it. Astarion always knew how to ruffle my feathers in a
good way.
“I’m only joking, my sweet. We are in a bit of a tough spot. I simply wanted to make light of
it. But still, mates…”
“Well, let me rephrase it then, I don’t want to see my friends in danger, that includes you.
How about that?”
“No, I think I will keep ‘mates’ intact, even if you do mind.” He laughed as he cradled
himself better.
Neither of us spoke for a while, so I closed my eyes as we waited for the sun to fully set. It
would be a matter of minutes now.
“Are you sleeping, Tav?” he asked almost as a whisper.
“Mmh… no.”, I mumbled half asleep now. I used up all and any energy I had.
He sighed.
“Thank you for coming to my aid. That means a lot.”
“I don’t want to lose you.” I whispered, half asleep. I was too tired to mind my words, but
perhaps he didn’t really hear me.
“I don’t want to lose you either, love.” He whispered back.I must have fallen asleep because I woke with a shock when I heard a male’s voice shout my
name.
“Tav! Where are you? Did you find Astarion? Where could those two have gone?!” It was
Wyll. His voice startled me back awake. “Over here! Under the cart. Help us up, will you.” I
shouted.
“It’s fine now, Astarion. The sun has set. It’s dark out. I’m removing the tarp from you. You’ll
be safe, I promise.” I whispered to him, my heart feeling calmer now that I knew he would
survive another day or, better yet, another night. “Sounds like a plan. Thank you for staying
until it got safe, Tav.”
I wiggled my way out from under the cart while taking the tarp with me and revealing
Astarion, who was now safe and complete. No embers, no fires, no nothing, just his perfect
elf-self. He also shimmied himself out and Wyll helped him up.
“We got so caught up in the celebration that I didn’t react as I should have. I’m sorry,
Astarion. I should have reacted better and come to your aid.” Wyll apologized not looking
Astarion in the eyes. He sure seemed ashamed, and he should. He should have known better.
I wasn’t too happy with any of them right now, but my anger would dissipate soon enough.
I’m just glad it’s dark out and we are okay.
“Don’t mention it. I wasn’t alone after all. Tav came to my rescue and stayed with me. She
even took a nap of all things, that woman.” Astarion teased. My cheeks flushed yet again. He
saw and gave me a mischievous grin. I couldn’t help myself and smiled back. “I’m just glad
you lot are safe now.” I managed to say.
So, where is the rest of the group? Is Karlach…?”
“She’s as fine as she can be. I was asked to try to find you and take you back to where the rest
are. We are about to leave. She won’t last much longer here.”“Oh, dear. Then we must hurry back. Come on! Which way?!”
“Yes, it’s in this direction in the little tavern we saw near the water.”
“Come on, Astarion. Let’s go. I want Gale to check you before you try to take off again.”
“Yes, yes, I’m coming.”
The ruined city, all these people… we need to see how we can help them rebuild or
something, but first Karlach. “Karlach! I’m here!” She looks up and smiles, flashing her pearly
whites from ear to ear.
“Hey, soldier. I almost thought you wouldn’t make it. I see Astarion is still with us. I’m glad. I
think the one going will be me.” She tried to laugh while clutching where her heart should be.
“What do we do now, sweetie?” I asked while moving closer to touch her. “ I think nothing.
It’s time for me to go.” Wyll also moved closer and put his hand over hers.
“Don’t say that, Karlach. You can go back to the hells. I am certain once there, your engine
will stabilize.”
“The thing is that I don’t want to go back, soldier. My home is here with my new friends. My
family.”
“What if I go with you? We can fight together. We can find a cure together. You don’t have to
do it alone.”
“What? Are… are you sure? It’s not an easy place to be. I cannot ask this of you, of anyone.”
“Well, that settles it then. We’re going back to the hells. I’m not asking your permission,
either. I am telling you. Let’s go.”
“Wow, soldier…Wyll. I never imagined you would sound this tough. It’s sexy. Hahaha. Let’s
go then. Friends, I love you so much. I will be back once I get this thing under control. Don’t
be strangers, will ya? Take care of each other.”
And just like that, we were down 2 members all too soon. Although sad, I know I will see
them again soon enough. We just have to find a way to help Karlach, too. I am starting to
think that we bit off more than we can chew on this.Gale, looking his best already with a smart tunic and I think also bathed… so soon, too, takes
over the room. “… So, I say let’s celebrate! Let’s eat and drink and relax. We’ve all earned it.”
Folks cheered all around us, but my eyes felt heavy and my body ached.Chapter 2 
I’ve got you, too.
It amazes me that she feels so heavy and light at the same time. It must be all that spunk and
sass she tries to hide. “Well, ladies and gents. It seems our Tav has worn herself out. I’ll take
her to one of the rooms above and let her rest. Don’t wait up.”, Astarion smirked as he said
this, not bothering to look back at the incredulous faces of the group. They had known for a
while that he and I had started to get closer, especially after the ordeal with Cazador, so they
weren’t too worried.
Well, let’s see… where’s the bed? And I was told there was a bath here… Oh! There it is.
“Tav. Tav?”
Just how much of a heavy sleeper are you? Never mind, it’s not like I haven’t seen all of you
before. I hope you don’t mind. I certainly won’t.
Astarion turned on the water from the faucet, checking that the tub was filling up with water
that was a comfortable temperature. He wanted to repay Tav back with something nice, and
he was hoping she would take offense to his efforts right about now. It was a rather
vulnerable yet intimate moment for both.
He took off every piece of armor Tav was wearing, leaving her down to her undergarments,
just a brassier and panties. “Mmm, perhaps I should take those, too?” He got her pack and his
own and rummaged through them trying to find something to dress her with.
“Oh, I’ll just grab this for right now and explain later.”, he giggled as he grabbed one of his
shirts to dress Tav in after the bath. “I highly doubt she’ll wake before I’m done with her.” He
stood up, removed the remaining clothes from her, took all of his off, and walked towards thebathtub. He glanced at a tall mirror he hadn’t seen before. “Oh, well, will you look at that! We
look quite beautiful together, don’t we, my dear?”
His pale body, tall and thin with defined muscles. He looked like a statue carved out of the
best marble found in all of Faerun. His eyes seemed entranced not only with himself, but with
the woman in his arms. She was a half-elf just like him, but unlike him, she didn’t carry the
undead disease. She wasn’t as thin and beautiful as Shadowheart nor was she built tall and
robust like Karlach. In comparison with the other women in the group, she would be
considered average looking in many eyes, but Astarion found her beauty intriguing. Short
curly hair, almost like his, but a tad bit longer up to her shoulders. Her skin wasn’t alabaster
like you’d expect from most half-elves, but instead was more like a light caramel. Her thick
lips which now hid her bright big smile. A bit of a button nose and large round eyes with
thick lashes and eyebrows. He always wondered how her eyebrows were so dark yet her hair
was dark brown with reddish tones. She was becoming more muscular because of the
fighting and constant running, but it made her look even more beautiful in his eyes.
As he put one leg over the tub, he realized he had to place the wash cloth and soap closer to
the tub. Tav wasn’t too difficult to maneuver, she wasn’t very tall, standing at her glorious 1.5
meters, he could easily carry her with one arm if he wanted, but he didn’t.
“Very well, this chair will have to do as my table. And, the towel… oh, here we are.” Now, he
again entered the tub gracefully, with Tav sleeping heavily in his arms. She shifted a little and
smiled while mumbling nonsense. Then he lowered himself to sit while positioning Tav in
front of himself. Now, he was the big spoon.
“Let me take care of you, my sweet. It’s the least I can do right now.”, he said as he began to
rub the soap on the wash cloth. Then, he started to pass the soapy wash cloth over her skin.
First, her face and ears. Then her neck and shoulders. Next, her back, all the while trying to
not move her so much as to wake her.“I suppose this soap will have to do for the hair, darling. I know, I’m not happy about it
either, but we'll make it work.” He mused as he continued to lather what he could reach of
both bodies, all while wondering why Tav didn’t wake up. Then with his hand, he reached
down his back to remove the plug from the drain and waited until the soapy water went
down the drain. Then he reached once more for the faucet and let it run cold. He smirked, but
it worked, partly.
Tav opened her eyes, her heavy eyelids feeling like lead weights, and tried to look around.
“Astarion, you’re fine. I won’t sun; bad sun.” She murmured and fell back asleep. He stifled a
laugh at her insistence of helping. He couldn’t help but wonder if this could become
something more. If he had a heartbeat, it sure would be pounding out of his chest right about
now.
“Oh, my. Tavy, you never cease to amaze me in the quirkiest ways. Anyone else, would have
shouted to the heavens if they woke up naked next to a vampire…spawn, but still. Not, you
though. Never change, my dear. I need that more than you can imagine.”
“Well, here we are. You can borrow my shirt, and I’ll just slip on your panties. We’ll do
without a brassiere for the moment. And now we brush your hair. And voilà. What a
beautiful sight to behold. And now me”
But Tav wasn't cooperating now. She grabbed hold of Astarion’s arm and held on for dear
life. Right here, right now, her true feelings shone through. She didn’t want to let go. But he
froze in amazement. He could use this to his advantage, couldn’t he? Surely, he was beyond
that old habit.
“Very well. I won’t leave your side tonight. Besides, it’s not like I would enjoy drinking wine
with the rest. I’d much rather have a bear, or you if I could.” Tav stirred a bit while a smile
formed on her lips.A couple of hours passed, enougIt seemed that it would be daylight soon. “Well, aren't I glad
those curtains were pulled, or I would be in trouble right about now. ” Tav started to stir
andslowly started to open her eyes. Feeling well rested, she started to take in her
surroundings; a bed, some lit candles and oil lamps for light, a closed wooden door. It was all
unfamiliar. She looked down and saw she was wearing Astarion's white shirt with the ruffle.
Shock hit her face and her eyes widened in horror.
"Good morning, lover. How are you feeling?" He said while looking at her from a chair next
to the bed a book in his hands and a seductive smile.Chapter 3 
Understanding misunderstandings 
I'm wearing his shirt! What happened last night? What have I done? Did I...? Did we...? But,
he said he didn't... Oh, Tav, you've outdone yourself this time! The sun temple wasn't your
only stupid blunder, woman! I hope he can forgive me. I wasn't thinking right. Oh no.
"Astarion, I'm so sorry! I didn't mean to take advantage of you like this. I feel so horrible. I
mean, the last time we spoke and said you didn't... and I'm fine with that. You're my friend
and I will respect your boundaries and choices. Oh, gods! I feel so disgusted. I... I mean, not
about you, of course not, but how could I... I mean, I don't remember much after Wyll, and
then...we were... Where are we? What happened?"
Looking astonished and a little taken aback, he tried to stiffle a laugh as the realization
dawned on him. "Oh, no my dear. I think you've slept far too many hours, and you're not
quite here just yet. Whatever you are thinking or, better yet, what you think we did, didn't
happen."
Then he begins to retell the events of last night with luxurious detail to calm her mind and let
her know that she isn't the "monster" she thinks she is. The only monster right then and there
was him, the spawn.
"Well, let's see. Wyll found us once it was dark out and brought us to this tavern-inn. We
gathered with the rest of the group, along with other survivors of the battle. They laughed
and drank. But you were simply beat. You started to swagger from side to side until
eventually, you collapsed. I simply carried you up to a room and bid the rest a good night.
They're still at the Inn, apart from Wyll and Karlach. Those two have gone back to the Hells to
keep Karlach from going boom.I listened intently, not daring to interrupt his retelling of the night's events. Perhaps, I was
wrong, and I didn't do what I thought. Sure, I want it, but not like this.
"So, once up here, I took the liberty of removing everything you and I were wearing in order
to take a bath. You were so exhausted that you were my little doll as I washed your hair and
body as best I could. You see, I found it logical to get in the tub right along with you and take
advantage of the water. Yes, we were naked and wet. But I was as respectful as I possibly
could be. Hahaha", he giggled.
"What? Why didn't you wake me? I could have done it myself, you know. You didn't have to
go through all the trouble. But thank you." I told him, but I could feel my body burning like a
wildfire just at the thought of him taking care of me, even if it was to this extreme.
A bit incredulous, he softened his gaze and took Tav's hand and offered a warm smile. This
was new to him, caring for someone who cared back. No one is like that, he thought.
"Seems like you believe that we made love last night, my dear. I know we did talk about that
before and I said that I wasn't ready to be with anyone, nor will I know when I will be able to.
Don't worry, you did nothing of the sort. You kept your word. Also, I didn't force myself on
you; I just thought that since we had been intimate before, that it should be me who helped
you bathe, tired as you were and all. Besides, it was basically impossible to wake you or for
you to let go of my arm." He looked at her playfully, trying to tease her, while trying to not
make her more ashamed of the odd situation.
I am not sure if that is a relief or not, but at least I didn't force myself on him. I want to keep
my promise and not push. Besides, it's not like I am as experienced as the rest of the lot or
even him. If they were to find out, I'd be teased and joke about till kingdom come. I don't
want that.
"Well, good. I am sorry, by the way. I didn't realize how tired I was. I will make it up to you,
just say the word and I'll make it my top priority. Also... by the way... thank you for notmaking it a big deal. We hadn't gotten much of a chance to talk after the last time. I want you
to know that I will never push you to be intimate with mmm... anyone, no matter what. You
are free, and you have the right to choose. It's your body and no one else's." Tav told him
while looking down at her legs extended down the bed under the covers.
"Mm... anyone? Oh, please. I've lived for over 200 years and now Cazador's gone. If I want to
be intimate with anyone, it will most certainly be you, my dear. You have your alluring
charms, after all. Or did you mean, you?", he lifted Tav's cheek to see her eyes while she tried
to avoid his gaze once more.
I hate how he is always able to disarm my defenses without even trying. Everyone else just
stops pushing the subject, so why does he always have to push further? Who am I kidding? I
can barely lie to myself, let alone lie to him. If prods just the right way, he will open me worse
than an old book.
"It doesn't matter. Let's just let this be behind us. Nothing bad happened, and we are well and
clean, which is all that matters to me. I'll just step over there to get dressed. Where's my pack?
Do you know?" Tav pushed her way with words, trying her best to hide her true emotions.
She was nervous being so close to him, even more so now that she was wearing nothing but
his shirt and all he was wearing was a book on his lap, which he had now closed.
"I'm curious, Tav. Perhaps you can enlighten me. When we spent the night together back at
the clearing? Why did you go?” Anxiously, he awaited an answer. His face not hiding the
worry he carried.
“I... I don’t know... I guess, I...”, Gods! Why did I go? I could have gone to anyone that night
of celebration. Gale offered wine. Lae’Zel was clear on her intentions, too. Halsin was even
more obvious, but Astarion was the only one whose eyes showed he craved to not be alone. It
wasn’t pity, that’s for sure. I saw myself in his eyes. I was feeling inadequate... alone.“Some of the others invited me to their tents that night. I was taken aback by their offers. I
wasn’t sure how to handle their...request. I pretended to not understand what they were
really after, I know it is a flaw of mine, to ignore the truth that’s out in the open.”
Astarion shifted on his seat now fully intent on understanding her thinking process. He, too,
had noticed she struggled with admitting things to herself. He knew she grasped more than
she led on, but forced herself to not admit some truths. Likewise, he was curious as to why
that was, and she was on her way to reveal it.
Tav continued, “I’ve always known things. I see people, and animals, and things all behave in
the say patterns. I know when things will break or come out. I’ve even been blamed of things
that happen because I know where to go or to stand because I just know.”
She sighed and stared at the ground with her shoulders down as if finally accepting defeat.
She was ready to bring down her defenses in front of him.
“When you invited me, I knew what you were after, too. I had connected the dots, you know.
At that point, you had really messed up. You tried attacking me when we first met. Then you
woke me up while trying to feed without asking. Everything and everyone was against you.
You had no one on your side to vouch for you. But it was not pity that I felt for you. I felt
your sadness... it... it resonated with mine. You felt lonely, and I was feeling lonely and
scared, too.”
I wish he didn’t give me that face, those eyes. He is able to disarm me just by giving me those
sad eyes. Perhaps If I close mine, he won’t be able to affect me as he always does.
He stood up and walked towards Tav and stopped right behind her. She could feel his cool
body crashing with the waves of heat that irradiated from hers. He spun her around, placing
a cool hand on her chin, and pulled her face up to look at him.“Open your eyes, Tav. Look at me.”, he said almost a whisper. She did as requested. It was
starting to become almost impossible to defy his requests in this tavern room, where they
were the only members of the party.
“I felt we had a sadness that was demanding company that night. I had never done what I
did with anyone before. It was the first time that I had allowed myself to succumb to my
desires. I wanted to be with you. I wasn’t scared that you would hurt me because I figured
you needed me. I was more useful to you alive than dead. So, I went to meet you. I pretended
I knew what I was doing. I followed your lead despite not knowing how to handle the
situation. I... it was... I wanted it. I wanted you, even if the reason you were doing it was to
save your neck from the others. I knew you were using yourself for self- preservation, and I...
I took advantage of this, too. I’m so sorry, Astarion. I didn’t want my first time to be like this,
so self-serving, but I was scared. What If that was the only chance I got to be with the person
who pulled me the most. I feel so horrible, but more so now that I cannot force myself to hate
that night. I don’t. I wanted you despite it all. Can you find it in you to one day forgive my
overstepping? I want to do all I can to make it up to you. I swear, it won’t happen again. I will
always respect your boundaries and I will be on your side. I give you my word.”, she
stammered half-way through her chaotic train of thought. She was trying hard to express
what she felt, how she felt, but it wasn’t easy.
Still holding her chin while looking at her eyes, he gave her a soft smile. He hadn’t expected
her to finally break her resolve and like a broken dam let her emotions, memories, and
observations flow out without the filter she usually had. He was glad she let him finally
confirm some of his own speculations now turned facts. He was her first and she placed a lot
of value in that. He couldn’t have imagined that in 200 years, he would once again use his
charms, but this time it felt different. It was different. He didn’t want to share this one. She
was his and no one else, especially now that he knew she felt so strongly about him despite
his disturbing past.
“Tav, was I your first man? Ever?”
“Yes.”“Is that why you started to act so nervously after?”
“No... yes... maybe... I don’t know. I’ve never been in this situation before. I just knew that
your past relied on using your body. I shouldn’t have allowed you to do that, but I got carried
away. I felt lonely, and I didn’t want to feel that way that night. But then, it got complicated.”
“What do you mean? Complicated in what way?”
“The more that we got to know each other, the more that I learned from you and from myself,
I began to feel how my heart skipped a beat. Your laughter, your banter, hells! Even seeing
you in the distance would make me feel a flutter in the pit of my stomach. So, I began to
ignore those feelings. You are my friend. You asked me to be just your friend. I may not know
much, but I do know that I don’t want to lose you. I’d much rather be your friend and stick
by you than to lose you.”
“You never cease to amaze me. Here I was thinking so many things that could be happening
inside that pretty little head of yours, and it turns out that we both... Oh, dear. It seems you
are right. We both do. How could I’ve been so stupid? Of course, and then I laid down the
law, and you abided by it. Of course, you would. Who else would, but you? You are you.
And you’ve been struggling with your emotions ever since. Oh, Tav. I am sorry. It wasn’t my
intention to create such a mess of things in you.”
With a shocked and worried look on her face, she wiggled her face out of his hand and took a
step back. She moved her hands from side to side in negation, trying to clear the air.
“Astarion, don’t. It’s not your fault. You are simply you. It wasn’t my plan to develop this
sort of feelings; they just happened. But you need a friend more than anything, and I want to
be that friend. It’s okay. I’ll get over it, don’t worry. I will never push you to be anything that
you don’t want to be. You are a free man, now. No one will ever force you to anything
anymore.”, she smiled at him hoping he understood that she wasn’t expecting anything from
him. She was just happy to tag along.He stepped forward again, closing the gap between them. He stood taller than before, broad
shoulders, alabaster skin. His hand reached for hers and held her tight, but not enough to
hurt her.
“I think we’ve both complicated things by spending the night. I don’t regret it. In fact, despite
using it for my own benefit, I haven’t been able to stop thinking about it... about you. I know
what I said, about wanting a friend, and I do, but... I want you too. But not as a cheap onenight stand. I want to make love to you. I want to hold you. I want to taste you. I want to feel
your breathing stop as I make you climax while saying my name. I want you to be mine and
mine alone. Tav, I want you, but not just your body. I want your company, I want your
friendship. I want it all and it all to be with you. I know I said that being intimate with
anyone isn’t easy for me right now, but I want you to be with me and no one else. Is that
asking too much? Perhaps it is, but I want to be selfish. I need you here with me now, and
forever, and always. Please, stay with me.”, he said in a desperate plea for her to accept him,
flaws and all, his eyes full of sadness and hope.
Oh, my Astarion. You’ve said the words that will bind me to you, so soon. We’re still trying
to figure out who we are now...what we want. What if I accept now, and then you meet
someone better in the near future? What if you get bored, and you decide to just being
friends? I cannot share your love. I will not. I am selfish, too.
“I can be your friend as you asked me to be, but I will not be one with benefits. Yes, you are
the first man I’ve ever been with. Yes, to me, you made love back in the clearing. But, I don’t
desire to use my body for pleasure like many others do without caring who pleasures them. I
can’t do that. I won’t. I need you to really think about your emotions. You don’t have to give
me an answer right now. Really do some soul-searching, Astarion. What is it that you are
looking for? I cannot share you. I will not share you. I’d much rather keep my feelings to
myself until I can control them than to be a short-lived fling. I can be your friend and stick by
you on your next quest. I am willing and able to do so, and I am not some sort of martyr for
doing so, either. I want to help you, but I need you to establish what relationship you are
looking for. Can you do that? Can you clarify your own thoughts, too? You’ve already priedand gotten my true thoughts. Yes, Astarion. I love you. I am in love with you despite it all.
Yes, I want to be with you and no one else. Yes, I want to follow you through hell and back
because a moment without you feels like an eternity in darkness. Yes, I am selfish, and I don’t
want to share you with anyone, ever. So, please. Do me this kindness and land your thoughts.
What do you want?”, she said with a firm tone, finally accepting her feelings which she had
been running from lately. She indeed had fallen in love with him, or perhaps the idea of him.
Nevertheless, there was no more hiding it. How they moved forward from this point on
would fall on him. This was a kindness she wanted to give him, the gift of choice.
Taken aback, face a bit in shock, he let her go and walked backwards towards the bed to sit
down. He wasn’t expecting her to be so strong in her demand. He forced her to admit her
truth, and now she gave him the choice to admit his own. He wasn’t expecting to be
confronted with his feelings so soon.
“Tav, you’re right. You deserve to know what I want, especially if it involves you. I know for
a fact that I don’t want to lose you, but you are right. My mind has been all over the place
after Cazador. I will do as you ask. I will get my thoughts in order and give you a proper
answer. I... I love you, too. I’ve never said that to anyone and meant it. Tav, I, Astarion, love
you very much. That sounds nice.”
Oh, Astarion. If you only knew that I’d set the world on fire only to keep
you warm.
“Well, that settles it, then. Let’s put a pause on this conversation. I need to get some food and
drink in me and see if the others are still lingering about. I’m thinking that it might be too
dangerous for you to leave the room right now, so I will get some food and drink and then
come back up and, well... you can feed on me if you want. I’m suggesting! You don’t have to,
but I was just thinking it’s been a while since you last properly fed on anything. I’ll be back as
soon as I can.”And with that she darted out of the room, still wearing his shirt with a very pronounced Vshaped neck line. She had just managed to slip into some pants, which also happened to be
his. The only thing she was wearing at the time were her own shoes. If anyone else were to
have seen her right now, they could swear she had just woken up from a rough night with a
vampire. Lucky for her, she at least managed to grab a coin purse to pay for food and
lodging.
On a corner table next to a window sat Gale, Shadowheart, and Minsk. On the opposite end
of the tavern, right at the exit door, Halsin’s large frame was heading out. One could argue
that Lae’Zel had gone, too.
Gale shouted Tav’s name while raising his hand to get her attention. She headed to the table
to touch base. A lot had happened since she last entered this space.
“Good day...? Is it morning or noon?”, Tav asked while trying to fix the shirt, so nothing can
come out.
Gale, with a playful smile, looking at Tav fussing over Astarion’s shirt said,“ Well, aren’t you
sight for sore eyes? I was wondering when you two would come down?”
Shadoheart looking at the rest of Tav’s outfit teased her about it, too. “I suppose you both
were rather busy since last night, given your current outfit and the state of your hair.”
Misk bust out laughing while imagining Tav and Astarion having a night of passion while
now Tav now making it obvious. This especially being the case that he too noticed Tav trying
to pretend nothing was going on between her and Astarion.
“What?! No! Nothing of the sort. I just... well...”, her cheeks flushed red, and she could feel
how her nervousness made her knees start to shake. She had to sit down or she would fall.This lot can be so unserious. I can’t even wrap my head around my conversation with
Astarion, and now I’m bombarded with this. I swear one of these days I will be the one
teasing them for loving someone they shouldn’t.
“The thing is that he helped me bathe last night. I was so exhausted I could barely move
myself.” Looking down at the table feeling very embarrassed but determined to be honest,
she continued. “I know, you guys know that Astarion and I did have... well, you know.”
Shadowheart interrupted, “Sex, you and Astarion had sex back in the clearing. It’s all right to
admit it, Tav. Sex is a perfectly natural action two consenting adults can partake in. There is
no need to be ashamed. As a matter of fact, even Gale and I have had sex, well, if you can call
that sex.”
“I showed you another more elevated and sophisticated way of intimacy, Shadowheart.
Besides, I believe you enjoyed it.”, Gale tried to defend himself while laughing.
Minks added, “Even Halsin has been enjoying the gifts. I saw him and Lae’Zel, him and
Shadowheart, and even Gale! Hahahaha Boo saw that one and was horrified! Hahaha.”
What?! This lot is too much to handle. How haven’t I noticed it before? Did Astarion...? Have
all of them been...? Great, once again I am excluded from the party. I hope Astarion doesn’t
tell them he was my first, or they will eat me right up.
“Oh, I had no idea all of you were so ‘close’ to each other. Well, as long as no one is forced to
do something they don’t want, it’s fine, I guess.”
“That’s exactly the reason why haven’t bothered in telling you anything. Halsin and Lae’Zel
have gone off to find a brothel to relax.” mused Shadoheart.
“Mm, sounds fitting, I guess. So, anyway, enough about me. What’s the plan? Do you guys
have any plans in mind?”, Tav said while trying to get the attention of the waitress. She wasvery hungry and thirsty at the moment and needed her energy to feed Astarion in a little
while.
Gale explained what they were thinking of doing next. “Well, now that the worms are gone, I
believe we’ve got some personal matters to take care off. So, I think we might need to split up
for the time being. What do you guys think?”. He looked a little sad, a small tear forming, but
he didn’t want to let it fall.
Shadoheart continued, “I think it is the smartest choice at the moment, too. I certainly have
some matters to attend with my family and this choice I made with Selune. I will need some
time to get my bearings.”
“And what about you Minsk and Boo? What are your guys’ plans?”, Tav asked, already
knowing the answer.
“Boo says we should follow Halsin and I think that is a fun idea.”, he mused, but then looked
at Tav’s saddened face and asked, “What about you? You look sad. Did you and Astarion
break up? You can follow us instead. It will be fun?”, he said, with a giant smile plastered
from ear to ear.
Tav with sadness in her eyes but a bit of annoyance in her voice, “For the last time, Astarion
and I are just friends. No, he didn’t break up with me... because there was nothing to break.
And as a matter of fact, he’s in our tavern room because I wasn’t sure how much lighting
would be in this area. I’m glad I asked him to stay put. Also, I offered him my help to search
for the seven thousand. They deserve a second chance, and they shouldn’t have to find it
alone.”
Gale and Shadoheart looked at her with knowing awe, yet worried look. They had come to
learn that Tav at times chose to do the right thing despite herself. Perhaps that’s why she was
so stuck on Astarion. After all, who else would choose to be with the monster and trust him
so fully.Gale, looking a bit shocked, with a smile on his face, added, “I’m not surprised you’d choose
that. But I must ask, are you sure? It’s certainly not the easiest path to take, especially for you,
a non-immortal.”
“And the fact you’d be going to the underdark while trying to shepherd newly freed blooddrinkers. At least Astarion has had the time to practice caution, but the rest of them, I’m not
so sure.”, Shadowheart interjected, showing her worries about Tav’s plan.
By this time, Tav’s ordered food had arrived, and she had begun stuffing her face as if she
hadn’t eaten in months.
“I know, I know. And I am not here trying to recruit any of you to come and help. You’ve
done more than enough and deserve a rest. That and the fact that you guys have your own
plans to attend to, but that said, I can’t let him do it alone. I was there at the castle’s basement.
Astarion was so close to becoming a more dangerous version of Cazador and I interfered. I
feel responsible for letting those prisoners go. I don’t want Astarion to feel he made a difficult
decision and then leave him to handled it alone. I feel responsible for him and them. I need to
help anyway I can. Besides, it’s not like I have a home to go back to.”
“Mm, so you’re willing to put yourself in harms way because you are just too good-hearted?
Tav, please never change! We need more people like you in this world.” Gale laughed.
Sheepishly looking at her second plate of food, Tav expressed her feelings for them, too. “I
don’t want to lose you guys either. To me, you are all like family. I’d be the first in line to help
you guys out in whatever you need, but I can only do so much. Besides, the tasks you will
head to do next, aren’t as horrible as fighting a nether brain. Is... is there a way to keep in
touch once we have to part ways?”
There was a lump in her throat, but it wasn’t the food. She was sad she had to let them go and
feared that was the last time she’d see them.Don’t you dare cry, Tav. This is what you want. Keep them safe and away from the
underdark. Keep Astarion safe. Find a way to help the seven thousand. You need to be
strong.
Tav looked up towards Gale, hoping he’d have something up his sleeve. He usually did.
“Well, I suppose we have these enchanted stones. They can serve as a communication device
even across realms. We could use them.”, Gale placed some crystal stones on the table, which
glowed lightly.
“That’s a clever idea, Gale.”, mused Shadowheart.
“I’ve already enchanted them. All you have to do is activate them by saying the name of the
one you want to contact. To end communication, just say ‘end communication’ and it will end
the connection. It’s not the best, but it is what I’ve got right now.”
“This sounds fantastic, Gale! You reckon I’d be able to contact you from down under, too? I
mean, what if I want to know how you are doing, or I have a question about some plant or
animal from over there. I mean, I’ve never been, so … Yeah.” rambled Tav while going for her
third plate and fourth tankard.
A bit surprised at the amount of food she was down right absorbing, Gale answered
whilestiflinga laugh. “Yes, I think so. I’ve never put them to the test, but I bet they could
even work in the hells. I’ll see if I can get these to Karlach and Wyll, too. They could come in
handy while they’re there, too.”
I hope those two are doing well. It hasn’t even been a day, and I’ve already missed them a lot.
As a matter of fact, I’m going to miss seeing them every day and every night, especially Boo.
He’s just the cutest.
“So, when are you guys heading out?
“Well, Gale and I were thinking right after eating lunch, but then you came down, and we
decided to stay until you finished up. Don’t worry, for my part, I’m not in any hurry. As forthe others, they might stay a day or two longer. They did go to the brothels after all.”,
Shadowheart mused while analyzing her own communication stone more intently.
“She’s right. I was about to go out when you came down. But, I am not sure if you’re about to
finish your meal. Not to put it out there, but isn’t that your third plate of food? If I didn’t
know any better, I’d think you’re preparing to feed ...” Gale stopped once he saw the look
Shadowheart was giving him.
They all knew that occasionally, to keep Astarion from trying to sneak a bite here and there at
camp, Tav became a sort of go-to for him. She never complained, but her eating habits
became obvious. Drinking plenty of liquids, potions, and elixirs to replenish health and
stamina along with foods high in animal protein, in particular liver. Karlach was the only one
that knew Tav hated eating liver, but it was rich in iron and this was done to keep Astarion
healthy.
“It’s fine. You are right. I know I am eating more than my fill, and you also know that I am
doing it to help Astarion. Perhaps Karlach mentioned it, but I hate liver. The only reason I eat
it is because it makes my blood tastier. That and the fact that from books I read, it replenishes
my ‘supply’ faster. Listen, I don’t want to lie to either of you guys, so I’ll just go on and admit
it. Believe me, it’s not easy for me, but truth sets us free. I love him. I do. And I know I will
probably do a lot of stupid actions in order to help him and ensure his safety. After the
situation with Oblodra, I realized he could smell blood and have a preference. I always tried
my best to consider your guys’ food preferences and try to have them available. I did it
because I love you guys, too. That’s the way I show my appreciation, through food and
drink.” She smiled as she went on about her love language to them.
“I figured it was you always trying. I always found it odd we would have plenty of fresh
fruits and vegetables despite having difficult living conditions. Even the campsites were
meticulously chosen to be as comfortable as possible. I thank you. You made the impossible,
possible, but at least I never stopped to thank your efforts. Thank you. I, too, appreciate youlike a sister or perhaps even a second mother. You surely have this strong energy about you.”
said Shadoheart with touching Tav’s hand on the table. Both smiled at each other.
“I agree. I am very thankful for your presence and all that you’ve done for us, Tav. I swear,
you have the patience of a saint. I am sure Astarion will thrive with you around no matter
where he goes now that he’s free. I will surely miss you all once I am back at Watergate, but I
do have some personal business to take care of. Let’s not be strangers and use the stones to
stay in touch.”
Minsk finally stirred, he had fallen asleep and had been for most of the conversation. Gale
agreed to find the others and explain the plans and the use of the stones. And so they finally
decided to head out. Tav ran quickly to the tavern owner to wait for her, since she would be
running right back. Her items were still in the room and Astarion was waiting for her. She
didn’t want the owner to think she was leaving without pay.
She followed the three up until the bridge. They kept up the conversation and playful banter
until it was time to part ways. Tav, silently crying, hugged her three great friends and patted
Boo lightly on the head. She kissed them on their foreheads and blessed them on their way.
They continued their path and crossed the bridge.
She stayed there for a minute longer until she could no longer see them in the distance. Then
she thanked the day and the sun for being so kind to her, but it was time for her to go on her
new path. She gave a bow while a final tear fell to the ground.
Well, that’s it. No more tears for my friends or the daylight. I made my choice. I choose my
Astarion and the darkness he must walk in. We are now a package deal, no matter what
hedecides to be for me. I feel happy.
Tav skipped and jump back the short walk to the tavern-inn. As she opened the doors, light
poured in, lighting up almost everything and everyone inside. She was glad Astarion agreed
to stay upstairs with the curtains up.She walked to the shopkeeper, who was a little surprised she was back so soon.
“Thank you for waiting. I do apologize for the inconvenience, but I really wanted to walk my
friends out. How much will it be for the food, drink, and the room?” She asked with a bright
smile.
“That’ll be 10 gold, Miss.”
“Does it include the room for today, too? We’ll be staying some extra hours. We’ll be leaving
at sundown.”
“Yes, Miss. I figured you would leave at dark. It covers everything. And Miss, I’m sorry to
pry, but are you safe? I think your partner might be a …” he stopped before he could say
‘vampire’. His eyes surely reflected fear for himself and for Tav.
Trying to look calm and unaffected with the sweetest smile she could offer, she answered, “I
appreciate your concern. Really, I do, but you’ve got nothing to worry about. He’s my friend
and I trust him with my life any day. And you have nothing to worry about for yourself. He’s
on a ‘vegetarian diet’ of sorts. No people, just wild game. I am a ranger, after all, so I know the
best places to find the best game.”
She paid the man, gave him a wink, and headed upstairs. She was still nervous about
continuing the earlier conversation with Astarion. She opened the door and was greeted with
an almost complete darkness. That was until her eyes adjusted to the dim light of the candles
and oil lamps on some tables and shelves.
“Astarion, where are you? I can’t see you?”
“I’m here, darling. I’m on the bed. I’m surprised you're back. I thought you surely had le ...”
“Left? Where? And without you no less in this time of day? Are you insane? You aren’t safe
right now with the sun out.”He smiled. She was really doing it, then. She was choosing him and his struggles just because.
It had been too long that he wasn’t sure if there ever was someone doing so much for him just
because.
This idiot is still thinking he can get rid of me just like that. Now, I will be his shadow just to
spite him then. The nerve of this man to think I’d just leave without my gear. He can’t even
carry his own pack. As if I were to leave him my junk and then double back to him to get my
stuff. Honestly, I don’t know what I see in him, but we’re now stuck on proper.
Tav pouted her lips as she tried to control her mild annoyance at Astarion’s belief that she
would abandon him in the Inn. Astarion noticed what he almost said had caused her
annoyance. She always made that face when anyone said something stupid about her. She
hated it when people projected their fears as hers.
“I apologize, my dear. It was just me projecting, since I’ve been stuck in this room for hours,
and I’m starting to get a little peckish.” He gave his characteristic laugh to relax the situation.
Tav exhaled to control her emotions. She was determined to offer herself for the time being.
“Apology accepted. But you’ll do well to remember that I don’t offer my companionship
lightly. I offered my presence and I will keep my word. I’d appreciate it if you stop doubting
my intent. Anyway, would you like to feed on me for the time being? I mean, it will be a
couple more hours until we can head out to the nearest forest. I have just had a good and
sturdy meal which will provide you proper nutrients, too. I need you in your best shape.”
So this is what Shadoheart meant. I do have a strong aura when I want to be undefied. I like
this new me a lot.
Tav thought while giving herself a light smile while standing proudly now next to the bed.Seeing her determination and strong presence, he couldn‘t help but feel inclined to accept her
offer. She smelled succulent, and her efforts and dedication shouldn’t go to waste.
“Very well, lover. Come and lay with me. Let me make this a little more comfortable.”, he
almost purred his invitation.
He knew when he talked like that, Tav’s heart raced, but not in fear, but rather in desire.
Since he discovered he had this power over her, he relished in the notion that Tav could
possibly climax by simply whispering sweet nothings in her ear. He might even be able to
just count numbers, and he’d probably achieve it. He was mischievous enough to try it at
some point. He tried to stop himself from smiling.
“You’re doing your planning something evil face. What are you planning to do, Astarion?”,
she half closed her eyes, showing him she was on to him.
“Oh, there’s no keeping secrets from you anymore. No fun. But if you must know, I was
thinking that you must feel a tingling sensation whenever I use my seductive voice. I’d
probably get you to climax if I whispered numbers in your ear.”, he smiled while give his
most seductive eyes and pout.
“You’re an idiot. Now move over, so you can feed. I swear, I’m like your cow, and you’re just
here trying to make me wet. Idiot.” As she said this, Tav moved her hair out of
theway, exposing her neck. Her veins throbbed, and d her heart beat faster. She wasn’t
scared, but rather she knew he was right. And she hated that he knew he could just touch her
just the right way and she’d be off.
“Mm, you smell divine, love. Don’t move. It’ll be over soon.”
His nose felt like ice on her hot skin, and it sent shivers down her spine as he played with it
on her skin. She wanted him to just bite, but secretly was craving to extend his touch on her
skin. She wanted him so badly right now, but was not willing to accept this just yet.
He could feel the shift in her. Her pulse beating faster but her scent smelling stronger of
desire. He could always tell when his conquests, nay, victims, pulsated with desire. He was acharmer and that was one of his biggest weapons, but with her, he didn’t use his
tactics. Furthermore, he wasn’t trying to woo her, he was simply there, next to her. That was
more than enough for her, and she was about to have her own little death. That made her so
desirable to him. If he had had a beating heart, it would match hers.Chapter 4 
To new beginnings 
He hadn’t felt this desire inside him in the longest time. As Cazador’s slave, he had to use his
body to get victims. He felt nothing, desired nothing. It was disgusting for him to have others
react to hisinnate abilities. He hated people that made him feel like a cheap whore.
But with Tav, it was different. She was not getting anything out of it. She didn’t need his
protection. He didn’t have anything to his name, so she wasn’t there for power or money.
Hell, had he chosen ascension, he knows for a fact she would have either left or killed him
after giving him a head start. Yet, her reaction towards him was always intriguing.
At times, like a mother looking after her progeny, she made sure all themembers of the party
were well rested and fed. She made sure everyone was taken care off, even the blood-drinker.
But at other times, she felt like a lover with a desire to take care of the needs of her lover.
Now, here she was once more, willing to give herself to the monster, to her monster, her
Astarion.
He was hungry, but his hunger for her wasn’t just for sustenance. He wanted her, too. His
Tav. His woman. His lover. His and no one else’s forever.
Against his better judgment, he let himself enjoy this moment of desire with his more than
willing participant. It was obvious she was struggling to stay in control of her body, but
perhaps one more for the road.
He began to caress her neck with his nose, taking in her sweet scent rich in iron and flowers.
He noticed that her blood reminded him of spring flowers in a meadow, but lately she had
been doing different things to ensure her blood was more nutrient rich, for him.Her body shivered at his cold touch now that her contrasting heat made him feel like ice. She
was struggling with her body, her desire. She tried to stifle a moan, but failed.
“Mm.”
Her hand quickly went up to her mouth, but wasn’t fast enough. He moved quicker and
placed his needy lips on hers. Another moan escaped her throat as her hand reached his head
and began kneading his scalp, grabbing his curls, while her other hand caressed his scarcovered back.
Her body was losing a battle she knew she would never win. She was letting go of all her
safeguards. She needed him, her lover, to take charge and make her his once more. Every cell
in her body was screaming for his touch. He complied. He broke away from her lips
andbegankissing her jaw line, moving slowly down her neck. He passed his tongue over her
collarbone, her neck. He felt her shiver.
This was it. She felt it from the pit of her stomach out like a shockwave from her center, out of
her limbs. Her wetness was felt quickly as he kept kissing slowly down her shoulders,
breasts.
He wasn’t in a hurry to remove any clothes, but they were certainly in his way. He desired
her taste on his lips, his tongue. He went back for another kiss. She moaned again while
arching her back. Her hands now on his back, became little claws that caressed with
her aggressive passion. She knew she could break his skin, but she wasn’t trying to. She was
simply holding on for dear life as he made her climax. He smiled as his lips parter to allow
his tongue find hers.
As soon as their tongues caressed, she saw a supernova in her mind’s eye. He felt how a
surge of energy coursed through her body straight to his and for the first time in forever, hemoaned along with her, only parting from her lips to allow their initial passion to escape their
lips.
That was all he needed to lose his resolve. He needed to claim her. He quickly took off his
shirt from her body and his own shirt from his. Now, on top of her, he saw her. Her breasts
craving his touch, his lips on them.
She saw him with desire, but was still struggling to contain herself.
“Astarion ...”, she whispered. “Are you sure?”, she gasped.
“I’ve never been more sure of anything. I need you, Tav. I want you. Let me have you.”, he
said with such seduction, it made her skin burn once more with passion.
“I’m yours, Astarion.”, she managed to say before he went in for another kiss.
He moved her with ease to sit her up, her legs straddling him, with his own now extended
behind her. Now there was no distance from each other. His cold naked chest was now
touching her warm chest. He kissed her neck and shoulders, leaving a trail of goose pimples
on her skin. She kissed his neck and tried to copy his movements clumsily with the little
experience she had.
She wanted to pleasure him as much as he was pleasuring her. Even now, she couldn’t help
herself. Her desire would always demand that he enjoyed every bit as much as she did.
He smiled as she kissed him, trying to copy his moves. He loved this feeling. It was always
him who took charge, but this one, this one was trying her best to pleasure him back. He was
more than willing to allow it. It felt great.
Then he began to move down her body, slowly kissing her breasts, using his tongue and lips
to tease her already hard nipples. Tav’s body shivered with desire, not being able to stop hershallow breaths and occasional soft moans of pleasure that escaped from her lightly parted
lips. Astarion was deeply enjoying how his touch was causing such a reaction on her, and he
was just starting. He wanted more, and he knew she did, too.
He continued kissing her down her stomach, caressing the sides of her with his cold hands,
now slightly warmer because of her own heat. And then he arrived at the button of his pants.
The thought of her wearing his clothes while enjoying her touch drove him mad. It was such
a sensual sight to see her panting while looking at him with her beautiful round eyes full of
lust for him.
He unbuttoned each of the buttons with expert care. And slowly began to pull them down
her legs, revealing her light bronze skin. He hadn’t had much of a chance to enjoy her beauty
the first time, but now he was taking all the time in the world. This was his moment to enjoy
what he felt was rightfully his. This was his Tav. His woman.
“Astarion ... mm ... you can’t ...”, she tried to say, but her own pleasure escaped her throat.
“Hush now, my love. Consider this my answer to your request. Yes, now and forever, yes.
You are mine and I am yours. Now, stop interrupting me.”, he purred with his sweet voice.
He continued removing the pants and dropped them on the floor. She had been wearing
nothing but his clothes, so now she lay bare, trying to keep her legs together, feeling a little
embarrassed of him seeing her all without filters.
He grabbed hold of her ankles and began to open her up. “Now, now, lover. Let me enjoy
every vision of you, my goddess, my queen, my Tav.”
A moan escaped her throat once more. Her fire inside was too much to contain. She needed
him, now more than ever. Her body craved his cold touch to put out the fire it started in her.
Her back was starting to arch in pleasure from him just watching her writhe in the pleasure
he caused her. Her hands went to her breasts to play with her hard nipples.She finally lost control of her self and gave in to it all. Her right hand moved down her body
to stop at her folds. She needed to touch herself. Her body screamed for it, she needed her
fingers to circle around her with vigor. She was on the verge of yet another climax.
“I said to stop interrupting me, lover.”, he flicked her hand away.
“Astarion, please! ... mm”, she moaned with delightful pleasure, face pouting. She ached for
his touch, but he was taking it slow. She wanted him now.
“If you insist, but I’ll do it my way.”
He pulled her legs apart and placed her legs on his shoulders for easier reach. He could smell
her sweet woman smell. He’d never been so close to her like this. It was exhilarating.
Then he began kissing the inside of her thighs, lightly nipping at them. She buckled, causing
him to get even closer. He smiled. He took in her smell once more. He could see her wetness
just building up as he continued to love her.
He finally reached his first objective. His lips were now on her clitoris. He began to lightly
suck on it with a kissing motion. Her legs buckled again. He switched to his tongue, moving
it in circles around her clitoris. Her panting sped up as he increased the force of his tongue.
Then he moved his tongue a little lower. He wanted to taste her. He wanted to feel her as she
gasped his name in pleasure. The sweetest his name was ever said.
“Ah ... mm ... Asta ... mm ... my star ... AH!”, she panted as her climax trapped her in his
mouth.
His tongue reached inside her as she climaxed. He moved in, in circles, inside her. She
reached his curls and grabbed on for dear life. That was it for him, too. He wasn’t expecting
her to pull him in closer in her passion that she passed on her fire to him.“Mm ...”, he couldn’t help but reach his first climax with one of the many he’d given her. His
knees faltered and went down. He laughed.
“My, my ... that’s a first.”, he mused as he had never been brought down to his knees.
This was his first orgasm in memory for him. He was always the giver, but she now was his.
His passion for her grew. He desired her even more. He was determined to become one with
her.
She panted, her chest heaving. All the while, a content smile formed on her lips, her eyes half
closed. Her legs relaxed and her back released the tension it had caught. She rode her orgasm
until her body went limp. She was done. It was fine if they stopped here. She hand’t noticed
he too had climaxed along with her. But he did, and he wasn’t done. Not yet.
He began to crawl his way back to her. He needed to kiss her. He wanted her to taste herself
on him. This idea was sure to make him climax again, along with her.
His lips on her lips, his tongue entering and finding hers. He circled her tongue with his to
ensure she could taste her sweet flavor now on his lips and tongue. Her back arched again.
Her legs parted. He nestled himself on top of her. He began to hump on her. His member
hard, throbbing, aching for her to surround him. To choke him.
His pants were still on, causing the cloth to rub against her, making her legs open more,
begging him to do what it was meant to do. She demanded he claimed her, to enter her. All
the while, he ignored her for the time being. He wanted to tease her folds a little longer. He
needed her to build her fire. He wanted to be consumed by her fire.
Then he stood up to finally removed his last remaining garment. She looked up at him,
standing there like a marble sculpture carved by the hands of forgotten gods. He was
perfection, eternal, ethereal, and hers.He saw her face full of awe and desire. He had her right where he wanted her to be, in his
grasps, begging for more of him. She was intoxicating to him.
As his pants fell to the ground, his member was now clearly begging his master to let him do
wha it was made for. It was made to become one with Tav’s womanhood. It demanded to be
surrounded, choked by her as she enjoyed his friction. Astarion could barely contain himself.
He also caught her fire of desire.
He grabbed hold of her ankles and pulled her closer to the edge. He was getting her ready to
be penetrated by his throbbing member. She gasped and felt how her wetness dripped in
preparation for his entry.
“Mm ... Astarion ... my love ... I’m yours. Please ...”, she half moaned, half panted. Her body
was loosing energy, but her passion still burned strong. She needed him.
He used his cool hand’s fingers to lightly part her folds. He didn’t want to hurt her as he slid
inside her. He felt her flinch at his cool, touch. He paused.
“Is this okay, love?”, he asked, hoping she wouldn’t deny him inside. He burned for her.
“Yes, please. Astarion, please.!”, she begged him to continue. She had waited long enough.
His tip was now right at her entrance. Her legs parted as much as they could to receive him.
He growled as he slid his member, feeling her bumpy skin inside her most confined space,
made just for him. Her back arched as he slowly slid inside her. Her eyes rolled back while a
loud moan was heard from both.
They were finally one in synchronized pleasure. He reached her end. She felt him and
moaned again while crying his name.“Astar ... Mm ... Ah!”, she managed to say before feeling him begin to slide out of her.
She grabbed on to the sheets in pleasure. His cool member was heating up because of her.
That made her mad with pleasure. She was sharing her life force with her undead lover. That
made her tip over the edge. Her walls clenched, pushing him out, but he thrust in harder. It
will be a battle of wills.
He began to push harder and faster, her body reacted. Her walls contracted, swollen with
blood for her passion. Her sensitive area very aware of the man sliding in and out of her with
forceful passion. He didn’t hurt. He felt pleasurable insider her. She had never had anything
like this before. Her back arched again. She tried to hold on as he reached her cervix with his
cool member. In, out, in, out. Faster and faster. Their breathing got faster and faster.
They were one, one flesh, one body, one soul.
He leaned down while staying inside her. Pumping in and out, feeling how her body swelled
around his member, tried to push him out while he kept trying to say inside her. His mind
was a swirl of passion. He was losing control of himself again.
He kissed her with more passion than before. He was starting to lose control inside her, on
her, with her, for her. He loved her more than life itself at the moment. He was blessed.
And then, with his sharp fang, she nicked her tongue. Blood came rushing out of the small
cut. That was it. He was gone.
He pulled his face to her neck and bit down. As his mouth filled with her blood full of her
passion, he thrusted harder, faster.
He fed as he enjoyed the pleasure of her walls crashing around him. As his ears enjoyed the
sweet cry of her moans and panting breath. He knew her eyes were white in the throbbing
passion he was causing her. This made him thrust ever harder, faster.Her hands reached his head, her fingers curling around his curls. She felt how her body ached
in her biggest orgasm yet. She was trembling from her arms to her legs down to her toes. She
was exploding and imploding all at once. She couldn’t let go of his hair, but in her passion,
she grabbed his head closer to her neck. Her legs buckled and surrounded his waist. She
straddled him while laying on her back. His body on top of hers. Her nipples and breasts
rubbing on his cool skin. Their stomachs becoming one. Her sweat causing the only wetness
on their skin. Her skin marking her scent on her lover. Every inch of him was covered in her
claim.
He knew he had to reclaim his will lest he bleed her dry, but just a little longer. He felt a new
sensation. He never felt that before, but it was exhilarating. As he thrusted inside her with a
passion he hadn’t had in the thousands of conquests of his past, he felt in his groin a
pulsation. A small pain that was waiting to be released.
He kept thrusting in and out, faster and faster. Feeling her body trapped in wave after wave
of an eternal orgasm. He gave her this passion, and he was riding it for dear life right along
with her.
Then, he felt a release. That little pain he had begun to feel was nothing more than the natural
explosion any man could have when their passion had nowhere else to go, but out, into her.
He felt this new sensation. Something from inside him clearly came out, but he was too busy
to pay attention. He stopped feeding on her. Now it was him whose back arched. A strong
groan escaped his throat as his hips buckled trying to push inside her further, just a little
more. His member throbbed and released inside her with force.
“Ah, Tav, my love, ah!”
No words could escape her now. She was too far gone for her body to match his scream. She
could only feel that something had escaped him. It burned a little, but it didn’t hurt. It felt sogood. How his scream was suffocated next to her ear. How her hands were forcefully
grabbing his curls. How his throbbing member had just released inside her. How that
burning release was coming out of her and down her.
She moaned loudly. He caught it in his mouth. He kissed her once more as her final orgasm
wave left her body limp and content. His body, too, went limp after releasing itself inside her.
Both panting in joy for all the sexual tension that had been building up for months, finally
was able to culminate inside each other.
She looked at his eyes with love and contentment. She was in full bliss. He smiled back at her,
his expression matching hers. He was both shocked and exhilarated at what had just
happened. He wasn’t sure if she had noticed how his body had been able to ejaculate. He
thought it was impossible, since he’d never done that in 200 years of servitude or
enslavement.
“Tav, my love, did you... did I just ...?”, he tried to ask, feeling a little embarrassed and
vulnerable.
“Mm ... Yes. I felt it inside me. It stung a little, but it mostly sent me over the edge. Then I felt
how it flowed out of me and down my ...”, she stopped, feeling her cheeks flush.
“Oh, that’s new. I didn’t imagine it were possible for us to ... Can I ...?”, he motioned to her.
He was curious and wanted to see it. She bit her lip nervously and agreed for him to go down
and see, taste, feel. She had already allowed him to taste her, it was only fair he could check
what he left inside and around her.
He parted her legs once more. Seeing how her hair was now a little more matted with her
sweat and his cum.
He leaned in to see closer. Her scent was mingled with his. He could smell his vampire
venom mingled with her own sweat and cum. It smelled intoxicatingly delicious to him. Itwas true, though. It had come out, for he could still see some of it pooled inside her entrance,
while a trail of it had run down and landed on the mattress.
He couldn’t help himself. He had to taste it. He leaned in closer, parted his lips and with his
cool tongue, he stuck it right at her entrance and began to clean her. Indeed, it tasted like his
venom, but it was thicker than his saliva. Though now there were also other flavors coming
from her. He liked the difference between her normal relaxed state to this state where her
hormones ran havoc on her blood. He could taste a strong difference in her blood. He then
apologized for he was about to do something he shouldn’t.
“I’m so sorry, Tav, but it can’t be helped. You’re just too much to pass up.”, he said without
looking up. And he bit her inner thigh. Drawing blood while he took a deep breath, taking in
that mixed scent of his passion and hers. Then he bit the other side. Letting her blood run
down his throat while he was still intoxicated with their combined scent. This was too much,
even for him, but he couldn’t stop. He needed to consume her.
Then he let go, o only to go back to find her clitoris. He suckled it for a moment, then slid his
tongue inside her once more. He was on a mission to not waste his venom on the mattress. It
was his to enjoy, and he was going to take advantage now.
All Tav could do was let out one loud pleasure moan before she lost consciousness. Her body
was done. She not only given him her blood, but she gave him all of her. She wanted to be
possessed, consumed, and he did just that. There was nothing left for her to give; he had
taken all and more.
She was fast asleep, her body wet with sweat, between her legs his venom, his saliva, her own
cum. She was sticky and smelled strongly of his scent. But on her face, there was a light smile.
Her soul finally took hold of his and became intertwined. Her ritual was done. He was hers
and no one could break this bond.He finally let her legs go. Licking his lips, with a coy smile, he positioned himself next to his
sleeping Tav. He spooned her and placed his head on the pillow. He didn’t need sleep, but
wanted to stay there in silence as she slept. He took everything she was willing to give him
and a little more.
He was feeling a strong sense of peace and joy. This woman came out of nowhere and not
only took care of him, but helped him destroy his demons. And now, this. How in the hells
was she able to let him ejaculate! That wasn’t supposed to be possible, yet here we were.
He allowed his thoughts to settle while he hugged her sleeping body. And another first in a
very long time. He didn’t enter a trance, he fell asleep while holding his Tav.Chapter 5 
Let’s head out. Let’s find out. 
There was a knock at the door. Someone outside wiggled the door knob and it turned. They
opened the door and saw two naked bodies, embraced, legs intertwined, bodies asleep.
“Oh, dear! I’m sorry. I thought the room was empty.”, said the maid, her face flushed red
with embarrassment.
Astarion took notice first, and he opened his eyes looking in the direction of the woman at the
door. Some onlookers behind her trying to peep at the scene inside the room.
Tav began to stir, and then her eyes popped open in a panic.
She jumped out the bed, her naked frame now visible to all who managed to see her. The
maid flushed even more crimson now.
“I’m terribly sorry, Miss.”, still shaken, for she knew the naked man was a vampire and his
lover was not.
“Close the damn door, woman! You’ve seen enough. Well, get dressed and be on our way!”,
Astarion said with loud annoyance.
He wasn’t happy that his sleep had been interrupted, along with the fact that some onlookers
got a glimpse of a very nude yet very disoriented Tav.
Tav finally reacted and reached for something to cover herself while letting a giggle escape.
“Close the door, Miss! Please!”, she shouted while she laughed.Finally, the maid was able to get her bearings and shut the door, her face still crimson. She
would likely never forget these two naked bodies embraced while sleeping. She hadn’t
imagined the faces of the ones who had provided a show hours before with their passionate
moans, name screaming, and loud bed thumping. That was the reason for the onlookers.
They wanted to see the lucky man who had made the songbird sing with such passion.
They were about to become a legend at that inn and give the brothel a run for its money,
according to some.
Tav walked towards the window to check on the light outside. It was dark out. They had to
head out now and find the next shelter before sun up. She turned around and saw Astarion
had also stood up from the bed, his body clearly more relaxed now.
“I think we need to head out now. What do you think?”, she asked in a soft voice.
Slightly more alert than her, “I agree. Let's pass on the bath. Let’s just get dressed, pack up
and go.”
He was clearly hoping to let his scent linger longer on her skin, as well as let hers linger on
his. This was a naughty thought he had, but wouldn’t dare admit it to her. She was still too
groggy and lost in her thoughts to notice.
They quickly moved back and forth, getting their belongings in their respective packs. He got
dressed and so did she. This time, she wore her own clothes. A pair of leather pants that
hugged her figure, a blouse that was also hugging her curves, and a corset that pushed her
breast out enough to make any man’s eyes not be able to look away.
He wore the clothes she had worn earlier. He smiled, knowing that all he was doing now was
extending the night of passion they had earlier.She put on her pack and he did his. She opened the door and was surprised to see a couple of
folks waiting to see the faces that belonged to the noise from earlier. They were taken aback
when, past the lovely young woman half-elf, they saw a tall, muscular, marble statue with
white curls and red eyes.
Astarion knew what they were thinking, and he relished in the knowledge that he
unknowingly gave these worms a show. That and that his woman would be for his very own
and no one else. He smiled at the g gawkers, flashing his fangs a little too much.
Tav pushed pass them. “Excuse me. Coming through.”
She felt many eyes on her, and she began to feel embarrassed. She decided to look at the floor
instead. Astarion, was more defiant and looked them in the eyes. He was gloating. He liked
this feeling of people’s shocked expressions.
They walked down the stairs up to the counter. Tav locked eyes with the maid who had
woken the up. She was still embarrassed about finding them in their naked embrace.
“I apologize, again, Miss. I thought you had gone.”, she flustered.
“It’s fine. Don’t worry about it. It was about time we left. Can you tell me what we owe you
for the room?”, Tav asked the shop-keeper. He shooed the maid away and took over the
conversation.
“Well, you’ve paid 10 gold for the earlier hours, food, and lodging. You stayed another 5
hours, too. And you both certainly offered a show that boosted my business. We didn’t see
anything, but we sure heard it, even down here in the noise.”, he laughed while making his
annotations on his business ledger.
“Would you be interested in anything else before I ring you up”, he asked.“Well, have you got loaves of bread to spare? Perhaps drink?”, Tav asked, trying her best not
to look embarresed.
“Yes, would 2 of each be good for you?”
“That sounds perfect. Thank you, Sir.”
He handed her the food and sneaked a bit of dried meat and cheese in the pack. He felt
obliged to the gift, for he was going to use this odd encounter to market the room as the “love
suite” for others to enjoy the magic left behind by these two.
Tav didn’t notice the extras, she just paid and took the pack with a smile. She handed the
things to Astarion, so he could place her food in her pack. He gave the shopkeeper a knowing
smile and placed the food in her pack.
“Tav, dear. I will carry the drink. Your pack is heavy enough.”, he mused.
“Oh, then let me ...”, Tav tried to take the remaining pack, but he was already placing the
bottles in his own pack.
“There we are. No, need my love. It’s done. Let’s go. Let’s head out.”
Tav turned around, bowed in gratitude to the shopkeeper and the maid then turned around
and quickly ran to catch up to Astartion who was already walking out the Inn.
“Astarion! Wait, you walk too fast!”, she said while moving quickly to catch up.
“Astarion and Tav ... even their names are uncommon. Do you think they are divine, dad?”,
asked the maid, mostly to herself while looking at those two beings that made an impression
on her.“Well, I don’t know about divine, but I am amazed that a vampire and an elf rented a room,
gave us a show, paid in full, left a tip, and we all survived to tell the tale.”, said the man.
He surely wasn’t going to forget this anytime soon. After all, it wasn’t everyday you
encountered a vampire and lived to tell the tale.
***
I wonder what he’s thinking now. My legs still feel a little sore and so does ... I should have
asked Gale for a time telling device to know how close we are to sun up or sun down. Oh,
well, let’s see what I find in the books once we set up camp.
Tav was lost in her thoughts, not trying to focus on the love making she just had with her
man, her lover, her Star. But her Star wasn’t so lucky. He couldn’t think of much else.
That was amazing! How can she be walking still? How much strength is she hiding from me?
She’s too much, but she’s mine. Focus, we need to find a place to make camp where I don’t
burst into flames. Mm, I already miss not having to worry about the sun.
They were a little lost in their own thoughts, but blissfully aware that they had shifted their
relationship. They finally accepted their feelings for each other and solidified their devotion,
their connection to each other. There was a lot of work ahead of them, but they were going to
do it together.
“Astarion, have you got any idea how much time we’ve got left before the sun comes up
again?”, she asked with a wondering tone while a little winded. She was still tired.
“Huh? ... Yes. See the color of the sky? That’s how you can tell. Once it begins to turn purple,
we’ve got minutes to find shelter. Once we start to see specks of orange, it becomes
dangerously close.”, he said, trying to pick up the pace.“Oh, that’s logical. Okay, keep looking up and checking the colors. I’ll do that. I’m just so
nervous about being out and not catching it on time.”, she admitted more to herself than to
him.
“You never cease to amaze me. Even now, you still have energy to take care of me.”, he
stopped walking, causing her to crash into him lightly.
Astarion turned around and hugged her tightly. She was taken aback but enjoyed this
moment of intimacy. She looked up at him and smiled. He looked down and smiled back.
Then he gave her a quick kiss on her lips and then her forehead. He then let her go.
“Thank you for being you, my love. I never knew how much I needed this in my life until you
came along, clumsily along that dirt road.”, he mused.
She gave him a warm smile back. She was glad he finally understood that she was genuine
about her offer. She was going with him wherever that may be.
Then she caught a glimpse of her next objective. Giant paw prints. They were nearing their
first forest. She pulled at his sleeve to get his attention and pointed towards the prints on the
ground. He took notice and agreed with his head. Neither spoke, for they didn’t want to
spook the prey.
He quietly removed his pack and set it down on the ground. She took it and began to move
towards some trees that offered even more darkness. As she did that, he took off quickly to
find that bear that would top off his hunger. He had to get his fill if they were to catch up to
the seven thousand.
Where are you, my snack? I can smell you. I can hear you. There you are!
Astarion pounced like a mountain lion towards the giant male bear that had just become
aware of this dangerous being with red eyes.The bear swatted at him, but Astartion was stronger, faster. He was able to move quickly
towards the proper vein to get his fill. He bit down and felt how the blood ran down his
throat until it became a trickle. It was not as great as Tav’s, but it would fill him up.
Besides, Tav could offer little feeding sessions to keep him full for longer now that he had the
bear.
He felt so giddy and drunk now that he had his proper fill. If they weren’t in such a hurry for
shelter, he swore he could make love to Tav once more and with more passion than before,
enough to make the stars themselves blush.
Meanwhile, Tav felt Astarion walk back towards her. She felt relief, though it was silly. A
bear was no match for her man, but she couldn’t help but feel worried about him being hurt.
She flashed a giant smile as soon as she saw him. He smiled back, feeling ecstatic about these
new emotions that he now carried.
“Feeling better, my love?”
“I ... Yes. I needed to top off. It’s not as delicious as you, but it will do for a couple of days.”
“If you feel peckish, let me know. I don’t want you to go hungry for no reason.”
“I swear woman. You know what to say and when to say it, and it only to makes you more
desirable, but I can’t make love to you again right now. We need to find our next camp.”, he
teased her.
She flushed red.They were both in a fantastic mood, despite feeling a little tired still. They had consumed all
the energy they had while making love and then were abruptly awoken by a stranger. But,
they were cheery enough to not let it bother them.
As they kept walking, Tav felt daring enough to grab Astarion’s hand. He was surprised by
this, but allowed it, for it also made him happy, and it allowed him to really gage her current
speed. After all, her stride wasn’t too long, and he was certain her lower half was still a little
sore. He smiled at the thought.
Then, they started to see the colors change in the sky, but by that time, they had seen a little
cave near a lake. This would have to hold them up for the next 12 hours or so of sunlight.
Great! This is perfect. We can set up camp here and perhaps find game if Astarion needs
more food, which I doubt, but still. He might have already noticed it, too.
“Tav, dear. Let’s go and check that cave. This will be our camp for today.”
“Yes, I’m on it. If we’re lucky, it won’t smell of bear piss or anything of the sort.”
They both approached the entrance and took a whiff. So far, it seemed clean enough. Tav
looked around and found a thick dry branch and took it. She had been working her spell
casting with the help of Gale before, so she was confident she could light up the branch to see
better in the cave’s darkness.
“Can you see anything that we should worry about, Astarion?”
“I got nothing dangerous before or after your branch. I think we did well with this cave.”
Should I ask him if we can stay in his tent or mine instead of setting up both? I’m too tired to
set up two of them right now. I promise, I’ll behave. I just don’t want to put up both.“If I know you well enough, I’d dare say you’ve got something on your mind. Come on. Spit
it out.”, he said, while trying to hide a smile.
She pouted a bit and turned around, pretending to be looking for something in his pack. She
wasn’t fooling anyone. She got caught in her thoughts and flushed.
“Come on, now. Out with it. You are a giant red sausage right now, trying to hide while
looking through my pack.”, he laughed.
“Oh, well! Fine! I was just wondering if you thought it was a good idea that, well...”
“Woman, out with it. How can you be so embarrassed right now when I have just made love
to you. I saw all of you. I tasted all of you and now a simple question is too much.”, he rolled
his eyes in slight annoyance, but he was right.
They became one flesh and soul in a tavern with many strangers hearing her pleasure cries,
and now she was embarrassed to admit she wanted to stay in his tent.
“Oh fine! I’m getting used to the idea. I wasn’t expecting you to make me yours that way,
anyway. Let’s just set up your tent tonight and stay together. I feel too tired to set up mine.
There, are you happy now?”, she said, a little exasperated with him, but also a little defiant.
She was not willing to take ‘no’ for an answer now that she had been pushed.
“Oh, that was it. It’s a fantastic idea. Never will I ever let you sleep alone as long as I’m
around, lover.”
She gave him a wide smile, and he was compelled to give her one, too. Even more than that,
he picked her up and kissed her. Her hands automatically went up to grab his curls in her
fingers. She seemed to really enjoy doing that every chance she got.“Now, now. Let’s not get carried away, too quickly. We still need to set up shop.”
He put her down and the began putting up his tent, but now a mix of items was evident.
Some of his things with some of hers. As for the bed, they both decided hers was best as it
was off the ground, and he had none.
She cast some warding spells at the furthest end of the cave and at the entrance. While she
took care of that, Astarion quickly grabbed some branches and rocks to create a camp fire at
the entrance of the cave. Though, she could come and go as she pleased, he would be stuck
inside, and he’d rather have a campfire out of habit.
And just like that, they had a sort of ‘home sweet home’ inside that cave. But just for good
measure, Tav cast some extra spells to keep intruders out.
“I know it’s over kill, but I’m exhausted and I’d like to sleep without having another woman
seeing me naked.”
Astarion laughed and let her go on with her spells. He never thought of her as a mage, what
with being a ranger, but he liked the idea of her being able to do multiple things.
“So, I’m guessing round two is out of the question?”, he teased, knowing well that he also
needed the rest.
“You guessed correctly. Have a cookie. I haven’t even bathed. I must smell musky and
sweaty, but I’m too tired to care. You’ll just have to put with me and my funk for a couple
more hours. Sorry.”, she said playfully as she began to set up the bed with blankets and pelts.
She was already feeling her eyelids become lead weights and was yawning more frequently.
Her tiredness which she had been running from finally caught up with her. She was notgoing to fight it any longer. Astarion just looked at her with loving eyes and smiled, not
bothering to continue the conversation.
If she only knew that right now I find her to be the sexiest, most delicious smelling being in a
100 km radius. I want her to stay smelling musky and feel sticky a little longer, for it is my
scent that covers her now. She smells like a vampire, and that will keep her safer in this cave.
He sat in front of the fire as he saw how the light began to cover the trees and hills. He felt a
sort of nostalgia for no longer being allowed to walk in the sun, but if giving up the sun
meant he could have Tav, then the sun would not be missed.
He began flicking rocks at the entrance of the cave while sitting near the fire, all the while
listening for Tav’s breathing. He wanted to make sure she fell asleep first before joining her.
He was sure she would fuss over his comfort if he joined her now, and she needed to sleep.
It didn’t take long before her breathing slowed down and an occasional light snore escaped
her lips. He smiled. It was time. He looked around one more time, making sure nothing
dangerous was nearby, and indeed nothing was. He then walked towards the tent, opened
the flap and stepped in.
He closed it behind him as he walked through. It looked the same as always, but on the right,
now, was a makeshift bed with blankets and pelts and on it there was the most beautiful
woman he’s ever seen.
She wore one of his shirts, but only the bottom three buttons were done correctly. It was too
large on her, so it looked more like a small night gown on her small frame. Her thick legs laid
bare, with her buttocks barely covered by his shirt. It made it look rounder than it was.
Her hands and arms escaping the long sleeves of the shirt lay extended to the side, and he
saw something, a paper, in her left hand. He took it and opened it up.He saw himself staring at a man with white short hair in curls. He had a very penetrating
stare with red eyes. His strong cheekbones and masculine jawline, made him think that it was
a very handsome man. He had thin lips and a coy smile. It was clear that many adjustments
had been done to the drawing, but it was coming along. It looked more like a portrait rather
than a child’s drawing.
Then he saw the signature and date. It was Tav’s drawing of him. He remembered the
conversation they had once where he wished he could see himself, and here he was doing
almost that. He didn’t think it was more possible to feel this strong love and connection with
this woman he had met a little over a year ago. Now he couldn’t contain the love and
adoration he felt for her. She always managed to say the right thing, or do the right thing at
the right time. Indeed, as she said, she’s always known, and here was proof yet again.
He took her charcoal and book and placed the drawing back. It was obvious this was a
surprise for him, but it wasn’t ready. He smiled, got undressed, and laid next to her. He was
not hoping to entice her, but he figured their level of intimacy was such that he could sleep as
he’d like without it being an issue. After all, she was wearing nothing but his shirt
andsleepingin his tent.
He didn’t fall asleep at first. He went into trance, replaying and reanalyzing a lot of the events
that had come to pass. But he noticed that his breathing was slowing down to match
hers. Then, when he least expected, he fell asleep once more. They were tired, and their bodies
agreed to rest together, at least for today.Chapter 6 
The long winding road 
They remained still for hours as animals walked by, peering into the entrance of the cave but
not bothering to come in. Clearly the low magic casting had worked, thus allowing them to
get the proper rest they needed.
Astarion began to come back first. He finally felt refreshed and rested, despite requiring a
bath. A smile seemed to be permanently fixed on his face now, and the reason was lying next
to him.
Look at you, beloved. So, peaceful and content ... no one would ever imagine you are a force
to be reckoned with. My little warrior love. And a delicious lover. Mm ... perhaps we can do
an encore before we arrive at the underdark. Which reminds me ... we have to choose which
way to enter. Mh ... perhaps the grove? I’ll have to run it by her before we decide. I have a
feeling she’s not in the mood for fighting.
He stood up, got dressed and stepped outside the tent. It was still very bright out, but he was
safe. He decided to go sit near the fire and just watch the day go by. There wasn’t much to do
for him, and he wasn’t hungry either. The fact that Tav would likely offer a nibble at some
point soon also allowed him to relax. He was grateful for her and what she was willing to do
for him, a man who had nothing to his name but the clothes on his back, and for her that was
not a problem.
I wonder where he’s gone off to? Oh! Where’s my book? Oh, there it is. I want to surprise
him, but I want a frame to put it. If I ever find a mirror, though, that’ll be funny. At least to
me. Well, rise and shine, ya potato! You gotta bathe. You smell like sex.She blushed at her last thought. She could still feel his touch on her skin, and it gave her a
little jolt. It would take a wile until she got used to being intimate with him enough that she
wouldn’t react so strongly.
Still wearing his shirt and nothing else but her shoes, she stepped out the tent, too, and
headed in his direction. She walked slowly, for there was no hurry. Then from his back, she
hugged him tight while smelling his hair.
“Hello, my beautiful. How are you feeling?”, she said while kissing his neck.
He was taken a little by surprise, but quickly recovered. Then he grabbed her, pulling her
towards his front and sitting her on his lap. Now, with Tav in his arms, he looked at her, just
enjoying the sight and finally he kissed her.
He gave her a loving smile that lit up her eyes. “I am feeling even better now, my love. What
are your plans for now?”
“Well, I was thinking of taking a bath in the water over there first. I feel a little sticky, and I’m
embarrassed that I stink like sex. I don’t know, but I think I do.”, she said sheepishly.
He raised an eyebrow in curiosity, not really sure if she indeed could smell herself. He knew
that she did have a musky scent which was mostly his own on her skin and blood. He did
feed on her and that passed some venom to her bloodstream.
“About that. I’d like to give my two cents before you do.”
Now it was her who had a curious stare. She stood up from his lap and instead sat on the
ground, looking at him intently.
“What’s on your mind?”“I think it would be a good idea to mask your scent with mine as much as possible. What I
mean is, we are going to the underdark and there’s only two of us now, so I think if we both
smell like a vampire, it reduces the chances of grabbing unwanted attention from other
things. That and I also love how you smell right now, a little of me and you during our love
making. It’s thrilling.”, he said with a serious tone, really hoping she would comply, but was
not to be surprised if she said no. He knew her to be rather fussy about hygiene.
She gave a little pout while she frowned. She was really thinking hard about the pros and
cons of his request. She was already feeling annoyed that her skin felt sticky, but she was
uncomfortable thinking how her privates would smell, knowing how they both climaxed,
and it ran down her a bit. She certainly was uncertain of how to have it both ways.
“I don’t know, Astarion. I think now that we’re talking about it, I will feel very itchy just
knowing I need to clean myself and I choose not to. It’s already starting.”, she said as she
started to wiggle while sitting, trying to scratch an itch on her bum.
He couldn’t help but burst out laughing at the sight. Then he gave her his typical mischievous
look. She stopped wiggling and started to disagree with turning her head from left to right.
“Well, you could bathe now, and then I can mark my scent again.”
“No, I ... you shouldn’t ... what if ... what if I can’t walk right after? You took me out, and I’ve
just recovered my energy, but my mobility, not so much.”
Then in a bit of a whisper, “I can still feel you inside me.” She clasped her hands on her
mouth in shock. She was surprised with her self at such a candid revelation.
“Mm ... I was wondering about that. I sort of noticed you were still ... well, rather wet down
there. How Delicious. It’s becoming rather difficult to not make love to you right here, right
now.”She laughed and shocked herself again when her perverse thought escaped her lips.
“Well, I could always use my mouth.”
Her eyes widened in horror and stopped laughing, turning crimson all over. She was always
curious about doing that, but to say it out loud was too much, even for her.
He raised both eyebrows in shock. He never imagined her to be so sexually daring, especially
since he was her first man, and if he could help it, the only man she was and will ever be
with. But, at the same time, he was thrilled that she was so willing to be open to having a
healthy sex life, even if it was with a vampire spawn. It was very alluring to him.
“You know, I think I will take you up in the offer. After all, you’re the type to be reciprocal in
the relationship and what is more reciprocal than doing for me what I will gladly do for
you.”, he shifted himself from sitting to his knees and began to seductively crawl to Tav.
He pushed her softly to the ground with one hand while he parted her left leg with the other.
He wanted her open to receive him, or at least to tease her already wetness with the cloth of
his pants.
Her heart beat shot up, as did her breathing. Her surprised expression turned to a lustful
gaze. They had no hurry to leave, and it would be hours until sundown.
This man will have to carry me everywhere if he continues to seduce me. I can’t say no to his
charm. I’m still not recovered from our last time, but my body burns for him more and more.
I want more.
She reached for him, grabbing his shirt and pulling him towards her, and kissed him
passionately. This time it was her who opened his lips and found his tongue. Her body jolted
upwards, her heat looking for his cool skin. Her body had a mind of its own for her legs once
more clasped around his waist, pulling him down on her, his legs now extended in betweenhers. She began to hump as she kissed him. Her right hand firmly grabbing the back of his
head kneading the scalp, enjoying the softness of his curls while her left hand was strongly
holding his back, going under his arm and almost clawing her nails to his skin.
This woman is not of this world! What do you want to do to me, pet? Don’t stop.
“Mm ...”, Astarion found himself moaning in delight at this aggressive show of dominance
even though she was pinned under him. She certainly was full of firsts and surprises, and he
was completely into it.
She finally let go of his lips, but not his hips. She continued to rub herself on his crotch. The
only thing in the way of penetration were his pants, but not for long.
“Oh, Tav. You will be the death of me.”, he panted.
“No, you’re my life, my love, my all. Fuck me, Astarion. Make me yours. I don’t want to
forget I’m yours.”, she panted in his ear, trying to suppress her orgasm.
He used one of his hands to unbutton some buttons of his pants. He knew he would not be
able to lose all his clothes, but that didn’t matter. All that mattered was that his woman was
demanding he fucked her with passion, and her wish was his command.
He guided his already hardened member out of his pants and placed his tip right at her
opening. It was wet and ready to receive him. But her walls were too swollen with blood. She
was mid-orgasm, and he would have to push hard to penetrate her. So he did, but it was
making his head swirl. He couldn’t concentrate. He could only push in and out of her this
time. They were like animals in heat right now, and that’s all they could manage.
“Tav, what you do to me... Ah ... mmm ... woman ... relax your body, or I won’t last long.”He began to thrust in with force, out, in, out, faster, and faster, in, out. His moans of passion
combined with hers. In, out, in, out, in, out. He pinned her shoulders down with force, a snarl
forming on his face. In, out, in, out. He looked at her like a lion looks at his prey. In, out, in,
out. He was feeling the same build up from before, inside his groin. It started to hurt, but he
wanted it to hurt. In, out, in, out. Her eyes were turning white, her silent screams, her strong
moans, all of it was for him. In, out, in, out. His eyes were turning white, too, but no, he had
to hold on, just a little more.
Tav reached for his lips again and began to kiss him with the same intensity with which he
was penetrating her. She loved this. It was wild, animalistic. She wanted him in every way.
Then she turned her face to suck on his neck. She wouldn’t bite him, but she could suck on
his skin like he does to her. Her body was on fire again, and it was all for him. He tried to pull
away a little.
“No, fuck me like this. Push harder in me, please. I need you ... Ah ... Mmm ... Astarion...
Ah ... Asta ... mmm ... harder ... mmm ... please ... more ... come inside me ... love, please ...
Yes, yes, yes ... ah ... fuck me ... ah ... do it ... Mm ... Yes. Aaaaaah!”
He kept pushing inside as he felt her body contract inward in her orgasmic climax, but she
shouted.
“Bite me, Astarion. Please, feed.”
“My love.”, he whispered as he climaxed inside her while he bit her neck and allowed her
blood inside him. This blood was always different. Now it was a little thicker but rich with
her hormones. It made his mind numb. He had to stay in control of the bite, but it just felt so
good.
He licked the drops that came out of the bite marks, but he didn’t stop thrusting. The build
up was coming again, and her arched back and buckled legs were still going strong. In, out,
in, out.“ASTARION! AH! ...MMM … AH! I’M COMING! DON’T STOP! AH!”, she climaxed again,
but this time her body went limp and just a faint smile replaced her orgasmic bliss.
“AH! TAV! TAV! MMM … AH! TAKE ME! OH, GODS! MMM! TAV! AH!”
He felt his explosion once again enter her body and grinned. It felt delicious to him, knowing
that he was filling her up with his cum, his venom. He could not turn her. He could not
impregnate her. But he could lay his claim by having her absorb his essence from the inside.
That thought made him thrust a little more to result in one final ejaculation before his body
finally went limp with exhaustion. A smile on his face.
Both felt rather naughty at the thought that they were still lingering with their previous
passionate love making and now, like animals in heat, went at it again on the dirt. But they
felt bliss they’ve never had before. Their needs were being met, and no one was forcing them
to do it. They allowed their bodies to take over and just have a good hard fuck.
He rolled over from her, his penis limp and wet. He didn’t bother putting it back inside his
pants. He just stared at his Tav with a stupid happy smile on his face and half closed eyes.
She on the other hand was panting still with the same stupid look on her face and her legs
still spread apart. She could feel a cool breeze begin to dry the secretions they both released in
their orgasms.
“I love you, my star. To the moon and back. I do.”
“I love you, my Tav. My true sun.”
They both laughed at how lovey and annoying they sounded, but they meant it. Even when
fucking like dogs in heat, they knew their love was real. Besides, they were making up for lost
time. They avoided each other’s presence before, and now they didn’t know if they’d have achance to make love once they got to the 7 thousand. In a way, they both knew that now was
the best time to literally fuck each others’ brains out, and they were glad they had the chance.
They stayed on the ground looking at each other in silence a couple minutes more. Then he
broke the silence.
“Tav, I was thinking about how to enter the underdark.”, he mused, not taking his eyes from
her.
She laughed. Here they were again, smelling of sex, covered in dirt, and now he was
switching to ‘business’ mode.
“Do you have an idea of where to enter from?”, she asked, still looking at him with half
closed eyes, still enjoying her rush.
“I have a feeling you don’t want to go in while having to fight your way through, am I
correct?”
“Indeed.”
“So, perhaps the blighted village?”
“Is that the one where we have to jump down? My feather falling still needs work, so …”
“No, this one has an old temple. It used to be for Selune, but it was desecrated long ago.
There are some entrances where, if sneaky, we can bypass most of the things that live there
now. So, what do you think?”
“I think, I just might like this idea. I was wondering which would be best, but I had forgotten
of this one. Didn’t we go through this one before?”“Yes, but it was very near the time we met, so we were certainly all on edge.”
Tav laughed as she recalled that they were still very cut-throat at that time, and most of the
group was wary of Astarion and his affliction.
“Yeah, I remember. All the rest warned you about trying to bite them. That’s why I offered
myself. I mean, truth be told, I didn’t have feelings for you then, but I did feel we were all
useful. I decided to use myself as a hook to keep you around.”
Her cheeks flushed once again, as they did when she was a little embarrassed.
“Well, I’m glad you did. You were my first, too, you know. My first ever thinking being. I’m
very blessed we are here now like this.”
“Panting because we can’t seem to stop fucking?”
“Not entirely, but I do enjoy your body very much. It’s invigorating and soft, and sexy, and
everything good in the world.” He turned himself over to get on top of her again.
Feeling how his flacid member began to harden as it touched her matted hair and lip folds.
“Well, I enjoy your body very much, too, Sir.”
“Sir?, So, am I a formal stranger to you, ma’am?”
“Perhaps, you are, Sir. Have you seen a marble statue with great hair? He’s gorgeous and
very sassy.”“No, I don’t think I have. Could you perhaps describe him a little better?”
“Certainly. His eyes are like crimson rubies, full of sparkle. His eyebrows and hair are while
like fresh snow. He’s got a manly, strong stare that could melt the hardest alloys. His
cheekbones can cut through diamond. His jaw line is stronger than the hardest steel. Oh! And
his lips, delicious pink plump lips that are so kissable, you’ll go mad if you can’t kiss them.
“Oh, tell me more. I might have seen him”, he said now fully on top of her, pinning her down
while looking at her face.
“His smile, a fierce sight. He’s got perfect teeth, but get this, he’s got fangs. He’s a vampire.
He’s my vampire. Then his strong neck that leads to his masculine shoulders. I think he’s
divine, but he’s forgotten that he is, that’s why he’s with me. And let’s not talk about his
amazing body, muscles, waist, even his ass. The many times I’ve lost my mind while seeing
him walk in front of me. He’s just too, much perfection in one body.”
He kissed her again, finding her tongue and, this time, sucking on it. She moaned, for she
didn’t expect it. He was making her wet again. He wanted one more for the road.
“Have you seen him?”, she managed to moan out.
“As a matter of fact, yes. Let me introduce him in you.”Her eyes opened fully as she felt him enter again. In, out, in, out. This time with such an
urgency to climax together. She didn’t speak this time. She just let her body burn up in their
passion. Her legs shook, her back curled, her buttocks spasmed, she could control nothing but
just take him in and out.
Her mouth opened, but no words could come out.
His lips kissed hers and moved to her neck then her breasts. She would suck on whatever she
could find. He nibbled on her nipples, causing them to bleed a little, and then he would clean
her blood. Then go back to sucking her tongue and biting her lips and neck. He was feeling
hot, but it was because of her. In, out, in, out. Each thrust wanting to go deeper but stopping
right at cervix. That was his new favorite feeling, touching her pulsating cervix with his hard
member dripping with his newly found cum.
He kept pushing in and out, having his hardened member squeezed by her vaginal walls. He
knew this friction would cause her some swelling later, but it was so hard to stop.
He was so hard he had to fuck her hard again in order to stop. She was spread-eagle,
enjoying how the cloth of his pants rubbed her clitoris. That was until he got one of his
fingers wet with her own cum from her vagina and began rubbing her out while still going in,
out, in, out, in, out. Hard and deep.
She started to shake in such a passion she was sure to explode. Until they did. They finally
reached a climax. Her legs spread so wide, he could have fallen inside her passion. His bach
arched again, while filling her up right to her open cervix. He could feel how a bit of suctionhappened for his tip was right there begging to be filled with his cum. So, his body did what
it was meant to, he filled her up again. He felt his buttocks contract and his back arch. A loud
moan escaped his throat while his song bird joined his song.
At this rate, they might never walk again, but they were fine with that.
Their bodies went limp, but this time he didn’t roll off. They stayed like that for a while, his
penis now limp inside her, her walls still swollen thus trapping him inside. Her breathing
was the only thing making an echo in the cave’s floor.
Both whispered, “I love you.”, before succumbing to yet another moment of restful sleep.
They were exhausted.
A couple of hours passed and they both startled awake. They heard a noise outside the cave
and their eyes shot open.
“What was that?”, asked Tav still trying to come back from her sleep.
“I don’t know, but I’m going to find out.”, said Astarion, just realizing they were out cold on
top of each other, even his member stayed inside her.
Oh, how sweet, but I have other matters to attend, my beautiful.
They stood up and tried their best to fix themselves up. There was still some light out, so Tav
grabbed his arm to slow him down. She was nervous about him being too close to the light.
He agreed to her command.
She went outside and saw a couple of bear cubs running after each other and couldn’t sense
any other danger. She climbed up the nearest tree, just to make sure she was just being
paranoid about any true danger lingering around. That’s when she saw a familiar silhouette.“It’s Halsin?!”, she shouted at Astarion as she quickly came down the tree.
“Halsin? What the hell is he doing here?”
She shrugged her shoulders to show she had no idea, but she was happy that she saw Halsin.
“You think it’s a good idea if we call him over?”, she wondered out loud while looking back
at the entrance.
“I honestly think it’s not necessary. We don’t know what he’s doing, and he can’t follow us.
Perhaps it’s just best to let him do his thing.”
“Very well, but I figure that if he ventures too close to us, we should say hello.”
“That seems fair. Let’s do that. By the way, how is the daylight?”
“It’s getting closer. Perhaps we should start packing up?”
Astarion stretched his back while looking at her disheveled state. She indeed needed a bath
and clean clothes that were hers. “Tell you what. I’ll start packing our things, and you get
some food and drink in you. It’s been hours since your last meal.”
She gave him a big grin. “That’s a fantastic plan.”
She went inside the tent and took out both packs to allow him to start packing as well as to
allow her to rummage through them for her food and drink.
She found a loaf of bread and took some, but then she found the extras: some dry meat and
some hard cheese. “Oh! Goodie! I got extras! Life is good!”, she mused with an even broader
grin.He realized she hadn’t noticed it, but was glad it made her happy. She didn’t have to hunt for
food tonight herself. He kept doing his work as he watched her prepare her food and drink
and subsequently began to eat.
It didn’t take too long for either to complete their task. He was ready to head out by the time
she finished her small meal.
“So, I really want to take a quick swim before we go.”, she said out loud, hopeful he’d agree.
He finally relented. After all, he’d gotten his way far too many times just today. He gave her a
smile. She smiled back.
Then she headed out the entrance to check again. The sky was going from red-orange to
purple. It was safe for him to step out. She waved him over, and he walked carefully paying
attention to his own body. No one wanted fatal mistakes.
“Mm, it’s a nice night out.”, he mused more to himself.
Tav feeling a little impatient, grabbed his arm and almost dragged him over to the lake they
had seen earlier. She then undressed and got in. He followed.
“The water sure feels nice. Mm, I wonder, would you have some soap with you by any
chance?”, she asked.
“I’m afraid I don’t. Sorry. I completely forgot to get some from the Inn.”
With a bit of a pout on her lip, “Mm … that’s unfortunate. Perhaps in our next stop we can
buy some, or I can make some.”He was surprised at her knowledge to make goods, but then he remembered she’s a ranger
and those folks are full of surprises.
As he was looking at her, a moving shadow caught his attention. Tav noticed him and
ducked under the water. She was positioning her self to attack with which ever rock she
could get from the bottom of the river bed.
Then Astarion shouted, “Halsin!? What in the hells?!”
“Astarion, my friend! Nice to see you here! But, wasn’t there someone with you?”
As soon as he asked that, Tav went up while dropping her makeshift weapon.
“Halsin! Hello! How are you? What are you doing in these woods?”
“I am about to ask the same to you?”
Halsin took a big whiff and gave a knowing smile. It was obvious to him that these two have
mated and haven’t stopped. Even in the water, her scent was strong in Astartion and his was
even stronger in her. He was curious at how that could be. He guessed if she fed him her
blood, that would explain her scent on him, but how did Astarion manage to become stronger
in her?
Halsin would have never imagined that Astarion was able to ejaculate, and he’d been doing
that too often and deeply inside her. Her body was absorbing his venom ejaculate and
entering her blood stream. He simply didn’t figure that this was Astarion’s way of protecting
her. She was starting to smell like a vampire, though it was a weaker fragrance than his.
Halsin looked at Astarion and gave him a knowing smile.
“Clever.”Astarion agreed with his head then walked out of the water. He turned to Tav.
“Would you like some privacy, love?”
She was unsure of allowing Halsin to see her bare, but it would just be easier to suck it up
and just walk out and get dressed.
“It’s fine. Halsin is a gentleman, and he will look away as I get out.”
“And Astarion?”, Halsin laughed.
“He’s already laid his claim. I doubt there is an inch he hasn’t seen.”, she said while giving
him a wink.
Their greeting and chatter was short-lived. Halsin was watching over the bear cubs from
before, and mentioned that Minsk and Boo had stayed at the camp. He also showed them the
stone Gale had given them. As for the other two, they quickly explained their odd plan.
“So, you already have a way to enter, then? That’s good. I wish you luck.”, said he with a
smile.
In that time, both Astarion and Tav had gotten dressed and were ready to head out. It was
proper dark now. They had the freedom to move about now without the worry from the
light. As for other possible assailants, that was another story.Chapter 7
Into the darkness
Meeting Halsin put Tav in such a good mood, she had been singing lightly to herself for a
while.
Astarion was also enjoying the walk under the stars. But he was worried about Tav.
Their objective, though noble, was dangerous, especially for her. He was worried that seven
thousand spawn were surely too dangerous for just them two. What if they got to fight?
Worse yet, what if they got so hungry, he won't be able to protect her?
I could possibly take down a dozen and so could she, but would that be enough?
He kept walking without getting much peace in the multiple catastrophic scenarios. His face
was his giveaway, his downturned smile and his furrowed brow were also giving him away.
Tav noticed. She’d stopped singing for a while now. She began to worry that something was
very wrong.
I don’t like that face. That face always means something terrible. The last time he gave me
that face, he was so broken. He had realized he had fallen in love with me and thought it was
better to let me go, for he felt corrupted, unreal.
She decided it was stupid to continue walking, both having scowls on their faces and
fantasies of dread in their minds.
“Astarion, stop. Talk to me. What is going on in your head? What’s wrong? I can feel your
energy is all dark right now. Please, talk to me.”, she said with a trembling voice.She was trying hard not to cry, for she was terrified that her own fantasies indeed came true,
and he was thinking of leaving her.
He was startled back into this world, his eyebrows showing his surprise, hand to his dagger
while getting into an attack position.
“What?! Where? Get behind me!”, he said, looking around but finding no one else around,
but Tav.
Her face showing her worry and growing sadness from her own speculations, eyes filling up
with tears. She didn’t want to lose him, but she understood that the task they set out to do
might make him think it would be for her best. She was terrified that this was something on
his mind.
They were becoming so in tune that she was almost right about her own speculations.
“Oh, Tav, my dear. What’s wrong? What … Why are you …?”, he walked over and hugged
her so tight he was afraid she’d break.
“Talk to me, my Star. What’s eating you?”
“What ...? Oh, ... I guess I can’t keep much if anything from you, my dear. The thing is that,
well, I’m scared... scared that I am leading you in harms way. Before we had more hands to
fight and do things, but now it’s just us. We are going to the underdark, first of all. And then
we want to try to shepherd seven thousand spawn into becoming normal again and less
animalistic. They will be hungry. And you, my dear, are very enticing.”
“Is that why you’ve been finding ways to make love to me in the wild? To ensure your scent
stays lingering on me... in me?”He was startled. He hadn’t realized she would notice it so soon. Perhaps Halsin let it slip, or...
was she this observant? He was certainly left speechless.
“It wasn’t Halsin who told me, by the way. It was your reluctance to me bathing often, as well
as your new-found hobby of going as deep as you can and letting yourself go. I felt you the
first time and the last time, I felt it different. Like you needed to enter me further to ensure
there was no escape of yourself left behind. I don’t find anything wrong with that, really, but
I wondered why you felt it needed to. It felt as if you were kissing my insides, too.”
He was taken aback, for he surely thought he was being discrete and here she was retelling
his actions and not being angry with him for doing so.
“I … I am sorry, Tav. …. I have been doing just that. The thing is I believe if others find you
are part of me, like a spawn or something like that, then you would have a better chance of
survival. Monsters will only attack if they think they can win.”
“My gods, Astarion! Here I am going crazy, fearing you will leave me here alone and that’s
exactly what you want to do?! I will not allow it! Not now. Not ever. Please, promise me you
won’t go.”, she said, her voice finally breaking.
Memories of her past came flooding in to her mind's eye. She never told any of them her
past, but she remembered, even when she was still running away from it. She was terrified of
being alone again.
Tav felt bad, but Astarion had become her anchor in this plane of existence. She wasn’t ready
to confront her past just yet, though. All she knew was that it terrified her to be left behind
and forgotten. And for the first time in what felt forever, she wept. It was not the silent cry of
desperation, but rather the painful wails of someone who had been broken for so long that it
was becoming impossible to continue breathing.Astarion wasn’t expecting this reaction. It was too much for a simple doubt of continuing
with or without her. He suspected his doubt was nothing more than the final drop in a glass
that had been filling up for far too long. So, he kept holding her.
He thought that perhaps he could hold her so tight that all her broken pieces could mend
back together, but that was the thing. That wasn’t going to be done in one night, one hug. If
he were to mend her broken pieces, he would need many days and many nights.
“Tav, I’m sorry. It was just a moment of doubt. I wouldn’t dare to leave you.”, he said with a
lump in his throat.
“It’s. . . Not. . . Your. . . Fault.”, she hiccuped as she tried to control herself, but she wasn’t
able to.
This sadness had been waiting to find a way out for far too long, and it would not stop until it
was out of her. She kept crying, while clutching her heart. She could feel the broken pieces
trying to fuse together, but it wasn’t time for it.
This was just the beginning, acceptance. She now knew. So her Astarion simply held her
there. He waited until she had no more tears left, no more muffled screams. The kind of
screams that escape the throat of those with a broken heart.
After a couple of minutes, she was able to regain her composure. Now some stray tears
would occasionally trickle down her cheek, but her eyes were still glossy. This was the first
time that he had seen her truly break. He didn’t know what to say or do.
She let go first, and he followed, then took a step back.
“Do you feel better?”
“I don’t know. Maybe. I just. . . My past came running, and it caught up with me just then.”
“Do you want to talk about it?”“Mm. . . Not right now. It’s almost daylight and we need to hurry. We have to find a new
campsite and keep you safe.”
“Very well, my love. I can wait, so whenever you are ready, I will be here. I am not going
anywhere.”
They quickened their pace, and she eventually decided to climb a tree to check out more
distance. She caught a glimpse of a hill that was positioned in such a way that it would block
the sun rising from the east and at least part of the sun when it was fully on top of them. The
tree tops would do the rest. In any case, they would have enough shelter, even if it was a bit
more in the open than a cave.
She was still tingly with nerves, so she decided to take off running. Astarion followed her in
silence. He wasn’t sure what to say anyway, so he just ran with her. Then he saw where she
was headed. It would do.
They began to set up camp in silence, for the last couple of minutes had been emotionally
draining for both. That and they were unsure on how to clear the air.
As they finished up, they both went inside the tent in silence.
Astarion pretended to fuss about with whatever book he could grab and pretend to be
reading, while Tav just sat in silence on the makeshift bed hugging her knees, looking at the
floor. An occasional sigh escaping her tired body. He was afraid of making a mistake again
and hurting her. He felt a fool.
“Hells, Astarion! You should have known better! Look at her. That’s not my Tav. She smiles.
She’s clever. She’s. . . She’s. . . Broken, like me.”
He finally dropped to his knees at the thought that perhaps she was more destroyed by her
past, and here he was moping and sighing like a fool and making her distraught with guiltand sadness. He wasn’t t sure how to deal with this situation or even his emotions. All he
knew was that he wasn’t going to leave, no matter what happened.
She finally raised her head to look at him. Her eyes still red and swollen from crying and her
voice like a whisper. Nothing like the typical woman she possibly pretended to be. Her true
form, someone who feels deeply and was hurting now.
“I need to talk. No, I have to tell you. It’s just not easy for me to do so. I’ve never had the need
to be open and true. I. . . It’s important for me to open up, to you. It’s illogical for me to give
myself to you and not let you in. . . It has to be all or nothing.”, she said, looking at him with a
look that showed him this was difficult for her to do.
With the softest voice he could conjure, he stood up and moved towards her. He sat down
next to her, grabbed her hand and spoke.
“You don’t have to tell me anything you don’t want to. I’ll stay with you either way. I love
you. I’m not going anywhere.”
“The thing is that I do. I have to... I have to use my voice. You have taught me that. You have
taught me so much that it would be insulting to you that I don’t apply it. I have to practice
what I preach, even if it’s difficult.”, she said while still turning to see him.
He was unsure of how he felt about this revelation.
She’s learned a lot from me? What in the world could I have taught her?
She already knew how to fight by the time we met? Could she mean sex?
Even there, I’ve been tame, for I wouldn’t dare use my tricks on her. She’s
my special one, and she deserves me, not the slave...”
“I have learned that it’s okay to let my guard down. That sometimes you need to show how
you really feel, especially around people who care about you. I have learned that your pastdoesn’t have to define you. That if you were placed in a situation that was beyond your
control, sometimes you will be forced to do things you don’t want to, but if given the chance,
you’ll do the right thing. I have to do that. Even if it’s for me, especially if it’s for me.”
She said this now, looking at the floor, for she didn’t dare see his worried eyes lest her
resolve break.
He didn’t dare interrupt her. He just held her hand and looked at the floor, too. Both with
their heads down.
“I know we all have secrets. That we have things we aren’t proud of or even ashamed of.
Sometimes the past we carry is the reason why in the present we are so fucked up, you know.
In my case, I’ve done some shit things to survive, but I could live with it, manage it. But there
is something that I haven’t been able to process correctly, so it weighs heavy in my heart and
mind. I know it may sound stupid, sure, but this is part of me. And I am ashamed of how I
went about things.”
He was taken aback. He never expected her to be so cryptic about something so important.
She was usually very direct, and now it felt as if she was going in circles, trying to speak her
truth while also keeping it hidden. It wasn’t like her to contradict herself like this.
She finally looked up to see him, and he followed her lead. She stared at his eyes, to her very
honest and true. He saw her looking tired. As if she had aged 200 years to meet him on the
same ground. He didn’t dare look away, and neither did she.
“I am a runaway. I am a traitor. I abandoned. I left. . . I left and never dared to look back. I
was branded a coward, a traitor, and then I was banished. I was just a child, and I was left to
fend for myself. I was left behind. . .”, her voice barely a whisper, cracked again, and she
began to weep once more.Astarion hugged her, waiting for the waves of her sorrow to hit him down to his soul. He
hated to see her in pain, but it was her right to decompress, and she was safe here. He was
going to be her anchor during this moment she needed him the most.
After some minutes, she regained her composure. She took a deep breath and continued, but
this time she stared at the floor, her head down.
“I am 40 years old. By elven standards, I’m merely a child. By human standards, I am
halfway to the grave.”, she gave a light laugh and a sad smile.
He was a little surprised. He always thought she was at least 100 by the way she knew
things. Though, he didn’t make any remark, just waited for her to continue.
“By the color of my skin and other certain traits I carry, it’s obvious I have elven ancestry. I
am a wood-elf. Well, I am half-elf, the wood kind.”, she giggled at her own wording,
confusing, but that was all she could do now. Her brain was struggling to be.
He had at least gathered that much from being with her all this time, wood elf, ranger,
optimistic, very loving, and in many cases extremely trusting of strangers. Yet, she usually
had a good pick with her strays, except for Gale. That one could have stayed in the wall.
Astarion still had a bit of a thing with Gale, for the mage tried to woo Tav at one point.
Tav took a deep breath and continued, now sounding a bit more composed.
“I come from a clan of proud people, broken minds and all, but proud. They are a very tightknit unit which allows them to commit atrocities to others and to themselves, all for the sake
of tradition and purity.”, she almost spat that last part out. There was hatred in this
revelation.
“My family, the clan I share blood with, are rotten, especially the elders, both men and
women. The boys are encouraged to do it because it’s expected, but the men are the worst.They just take and take, and you simply have to give because it’s always been that way. We
have to. It’s our duty, to clean our blood. Imagine that! Keep the disgusting behavior going
for the sake of purity. Damn them all! I hate them. I am filthy because of them. I am a product
of their rot, their tradition. I HATE THEM!”, she couldn’t keep herself contained and once
again wept.
She hadn’t been able to process any of this, for she was too young still to give herself some
grace. Astarion simply held her tight, not daring to let go, for she might break apart into a
million pieces.
He had never heard her hate anyone other than Cazador. He remembered how she had been
learning a fire spell from Gale before, right after she learned of Cazador’s “poem” on
Astarion’s back. She mastered it well enough to burn down as much of the palace and of
Cazador himself when the ritual was botched and the spawn were freed. He could vaguely
recall her say, “Into the fire I’ll swallow your hate.” as she cast a spell he never heard of
before, “Igne furia” as nothing more than a faint whisper. But from that whisper, a fire arose,
a phoenix whose song ravaged through the halls and walls. It came from Cazador’s dead
body. His fire turned flames and the phoenix rose in flight, touching everything in sight. Then
the beast was gone. He always wondered why there wasn’t heat coming from the flames as
the group ran for safety, along with why Tav simply walked out like nothing important was
happening. Her eyes were fury then, but perhaps it was the flames reflecting in them, but one
thing was certain, into the fire she swallowed the hate.
According to Gale, it would be impossible for her to do anything with it, for she was a ranger,
not a mage. He saw no trouble teaching this to her. Then he comes to find out she did do
something with it, terrible, but great. He was sure more careful in the future when it came to
teaching her spells, for he worried she would end up losing her essence with them.
But from Astarion’s view point, there hadn’t been any more reason to keep using it, thus she
hadn’t used it since. Perhaps this was the point where Astarion realized he failed his game ofseduction. Tav was supposed to fall, but instead he fell for her, for everything she did was
done in kindness.
She calmed down again and pushed forward.
“My people. . . They are sick. They. . . They are a cult, I think. The way they behave in the
world. They do things that are wrong. . . Sick and twisted.”
It was difficult for her to simply come out and say it, for it would make it real again. She
didn’t want to make it real, but she had to say it to let go.
“They take advantage of the young and warp their minds to fit the standards. They are
groomers.”
She took a deep breath and Astarion simply waited, still looking at the floor, fearing that if he
saw her eyes, it would break her resolve. She kept hugging her knees and looking at the floor
while he had his arm around her in a half-hug while still sitting on their bed of pelts and
blankets.
“My family practices polygamy. . . incestual polygamy. Even with children.” she shuddered
at this revelation.
Astarion’s mouth dropped. He was surprised that this was even a thing, especially in elven
folk. He said nothing, but wasn’t sure how to process this truth.
“I am not sure how long ago this started, but by the time I was born, it was the way. Boys
would be encouraged to have their way with the girls if they wanted. The girls were expected
to accept the treatment. We were basically slaves to the way of life. The elders encouraged the
young girls to go with the flow, and they would laugh it off.”Her body gave an involuntary shudder at the memory of what she witnessed. The
debauchery of a broken people was too much for her young mind, especially since she was
one of the few or perhaps the only one who couldn’t accept it. It was wrong. It was putrid.
She was wrong and putrid or so she believed.
“Then there were the men who could take and take. It was custom for them to wait for a
girl’s first bleed to bed them. After all, they encouraged bearing any and all offspring to keep
the clan alive, the blood going. But also, they had this sick idea that by incest, they would
eventually erase the human side. Can you believe that foolishness! Of all things holy! These
monsters wanted purity through the rot!”, her hatred rose once more, for her voice was full of
malice.
Her emotions were certainly like waves of an angry ocean, just looking to drown any and all
that tried to wade through the water.
To Astarion, this was the most visceral revelation she had ever given him, and he’d been
intimate with her several times by now. He was surprised that you could be intimate with
just words and not just with a naked body. But still, he was worried of what else she might
reveal for he was certainly not knowledgeable enough to talk her through this, so he just
listened. He was just there and for her, that was more than enough. She needed this.
With extra hatred she continued, “My father, a vile creature, was among the worst. A head of
house, Clan Storm, the best trained and most deadly rangers. They would wait for any child
to learn to walk to then start training them. I had my first kill at 7 years old! Who does that to
a kid?! I was 7!”
A single tear streamed down her face. “He was my adversary, a third cousin born too frail. It
was kill or be killed. And I used a fucken rock! His face still gives me nightmares. He smiled
when I pinned him down, and he said, ‘It’s okay. I’m free.’ He let me win.”She tried harder this time to not let the waves of sorrow hit her again. She needed to continue.
She hiccuped and took in a breath. Then continued.
“He wasn’t my last, whether animal or not, I had to show my worth to my clan. The problem
with this was I was born a female. Once my first bleed came, I would be transitioned from
guard to breeder. They coveted the females like me, those that from a young age were born
strong and cunning. My mother, Varya Storm, was one. She was the last born of my uncle,
Glaedr Storm. He had a twin who was much more corrupt than most. This one, for I cannot
call him a man, is called Draeven Storm.”
Astarion, was shocked at the name for he remembered a language almost forgotten, and he
began to understand. He was also taken aback, for she had never revealed names of her past.
He began to wonder if she was truly Tav Storm. It didn’t make much sense, but he waited for
her to continue.
She hugged her knees tighter as she felt that she was about to fall down an abyss of
memories she tried to forget, but she couldn’t. This was her burden, but she needed to let it
go, or it would continue to fester inside her.
“Draeven was the firstborn of the two. A formidable warrior, but a violent lover, and a worse
father. He would beat my mom at times when she didn’t want to offer her body to others or
to him. Sometimes she would be able to defend herself, but by the time I came along, her fire
was dying. Then I turned 10. She tried her best to protect me from those monsters who took
and took with violence. At times, she offered herself, if only to keep me safe. . . Keep me
clean.”
Her voice started to shake, but she tried her best to keep it as steady as she could.“Then she began to notice Dreaven notice me. He was proud his offspring could all be trained
at an early age and that we became his deadly weapons ready to do his bidding. But, I was
his first female spawn.”, she spat this word so hard, even Astarion flinched.
But, she didn’t mean to insult or shame Astarion. She didn’t want to use the word daughter,
for she wasn’t born of love. Her father raped her mother when young, and she was the result
of that abuse.
“I was his male-born until he began to notice my body change from a shapeless child into a
young woman with breasts and legs and all that he liked to pleasure himself with. Vile
creature that one with his touch lingering too long or his eyes. . . Gods! Those eyes that made
me feel like he was already making my body his! I was just a child! And my mother knew,
but what could she do? She was just as much a victim as I was starting to be, or already had
been.”
Her voice broke again and simply allowed more tears to run down, before she kept going.
Astarion, simply held her with one arm while keeping his horror to himself. Their hell had
been similar. He never imagined that someone as happy-go-lucky as her lived through that.
He struggled to not be bitter because of his hell, and here was this woman freely giving him
her love without restraint.
My Tav! I didn’t know. Oh, gods! My Tav, what can I do to piece you back together? Who am
I kidding? I can barely piece myself back together.
“My mother knew she had little time left, so she encouraged me to be the best in my training.
From casting spells to making my own arrows, by the time I turned 13, I could fend for
myself even in the most perilous woods. I could take down a bear if I had to, and take two
down just for fun. But then, I began to notice some changes in me. She did, too. My food
began tasting funny. Varya began to suspect, but it wasn’t until I woke up one day and there
it was. My first blood. I was too young to have it. That’s when she knew. He’d been usingroots and elixirs and anything he could get his claws on to speed up the process. My time ran
out. He was coming for me next.”
He couldn’t help but shudder. Cazador was a monster and used him as a weapon, but never
did he have to be the object of desire for him. Tav was born to be both and just accept her fate,
for her cult family encouraged it. It was difficult to believe this could be.
“My mother had to act fast for she knew he had eyes everywhere, so she did the only thing
she could think of, she branded me a traitor. In the Storm Clan, they’ve got a sigil they use to
brand the weak or the traitors. It is used occasionally, for you cannot remove it. It is supposed
to stay on your skin and burn you for being unworthy of carrying the Storm Clan blood. She
branded me in secret, burned the bedsheets with my blood, and told me to run.”
And there it was. This was the reason why she broke down back on the trail when she saw
my face full of worry. She didn’t want me to leave her because she’s been alone all this time.
Oh, my love! I’m such a fool for every doubting your resolve.
“I didn’t understand it then, though. She branded me in secret only to shout at me with
hatred. She said I was a traitor, that I was planning on killing Dreaven before I got my first
bleed. She shouted at me to leave and never come back. She said she hated me and hoped that
I didn’t survive my first night in the woods for I deserve the worst.”
Her resolve finally broke, and her body shook as the waves of her sorrow hit her like waves
of a cold, angry ocean. She missed her mother and she felt so lonely for so long that she didn’t
know how to cope with all this grief, especially now that she was finally willing to open up
her own Pandora’s box.
Astarion was starting to feel lucky his memory of the past was all but forgotten. He was
afraid to carry a burden like hers around like a ball and chain while also being the grounding
rock for others. So, he simply held her as her waves became less and less. Now his shirt wet
with her tears, he was glad he was able to at least be here with her if nothing else.“My first week away from home was horrifying. I couldn’t think straight, and my heart
ached. I barely survived while alone. Then I fell. I was running from I don’t know what, and
it led me to the edge of a cliff where there was a waterfall. Whatever was hunting me wanted
me to fall, and it succeeded. I lost my balance and I went down into the white water. I finally
forced myself to remember all that I learned from my ranger training. I survived. I took all
my grief, my pain, and my memories and I locked them in a box, to never be opened.”, she
laughed at this for now she had opened the box to her chosen lover.
“I was 13 when I had to fend for myself. I was 20 when I began to understand how cruel the
world could be. I was 30 when I learned I had a choice to be, and I chose to be kind. I was
mostly alone in the world, with the occasional pet. At times, I’d go into a town and chat with
folks. I was craving connection. You see, I can live off the woods. I don’t need to be in a town,
but the woods are a dangerous place and quite unforgiving. I was so lonely for such a long
time that I even contemplated going in the water and just stay there forever.”
That last sentence shook Astarion. He never expected her loneliness to be so deep that she’d
thought it better to just... He dreamed of freedom and power for himself as Cazador’s slave,
but never to end it like that.
She took a deep breath and straightened her legs. She had held that position so long, her legs
were going numb. Tav was almost done with her first layer, but was feeling better for it. It
usually does wonders when you trauma dump your demons, though it’s better if you have a
willing participant or a journal to do so.
He was grateful that she allowed him inside her past, but was unsure on how to continue the
conversation, or rather her story. He chose to wait for her.
She shifted her weight just enough to be facing him and grabbed both his hands.
“I want to apologize for my outburst back on the trail.”
“My love, you don’t have to.”“I do have to. I scared you. I worried you. But the thing is that it wasn’t because of you. I
need you to know that. You didn’t hurt me. You haven’t done so, at least willingly.”
She sighed, but now looked at him directly, locking in on his eyes. How she loved those eyes.
“I was just tired, and my brain locked in on a feeling I tend to suppress. I’ve been working on
finding books and scrolls on how to deal with grief, but Faerun doesn’t have much to offer,
sadly. So, it’s mostly me talking with scholars and old folks whenever they let me.”, she said
with a short chuckle.
“I know now that I do have issues stemming from my past, especially regarding
abandonment. That’s why I want to apologize. Perhaps it wasn’t your intention to consider
leaving me in a safe space. I get it. The problem was that you didn’t know this is wound I
carry. How can you help if I don’t allow you in, you know? At least you’ve had the courage
to let me in. You’ve taught me the courage to be vulnerable, and I am very blessed for it.”
He was surprised, hearing this, him. . . Courage? He never expected to hear the word
courage and vulnerable in the same sentence being told about him. But, he felt proud of
himself for that meant that he was learning and growing.
He wondered if Tav realized just how much he was also learning from her. He wanted to be
on his way to being a better man, and she simply inspired him. The thing was that they
inspired each other to be better, but they didn’t do it for each other. No, they did it for
themselves, the other simply got the honor to be there as it happened.
“Tav, thank you. Thank you for trusting me enough to reveal the past that still hurts you
now. I don’t think I have the words to help you heal, but I have the desire to stay with you as
you continue in your healing, just like you have been doing for me. I hope the love I have for
you is enough to help you know you are not alone anymore. I love you, beloved.”, he said
with the softest of whispers in her ear.He was certain that if his heart could still beat, it would be for his Tav, especially now.
“Oh, Astarion! I love you. I know I’m not easy, but thank you too for just being and for not
forcing me to be anything else other than myself. I know I can be too much sometimes and
you, well... I’ve always thought we are like light and dark, day and night, pun intended. I
mean, you tend to be, well, you and I think our personalities shouldn’t be compatible. You
have your way and I have my way, and it’s just illogical for us to be together, and then you
are a vampire, and I’m. . .”
Astarion kissed her to keep her from rambling. She was getting nervous, and she would
drone on and on if she wasn’t distracted. He had waited long enough, though. He had been
fighting his urge to kiss this woman that had just shown him she gets him. And now he gets
her.CHAPTER 8
AN INTERLUDE
They sat there in silence for what felt eons just in silence after their kiss. He looked into her
eyes and she into his. Just present. Silence. Her breathing. Her heart beating. Intimate.
Neither knew how to continue. He exhaled, though he didn’t need to, and that was enough to
break the spell of silence that had covered them.
“My love, let me step outside and make a fire.”, he kissed her forehead and headed outside.
He had a lot of thoughts running through his head and need to settle them before attempting
to say anything else to her. So, he walked as she watched him leave the tent. She needed him
to step outside, too.
She poured her heart out in the arms of someone who she felt was safe, a vampire spawn. The
irony was not lost on her. But, now she needed some time to gather herself, before she could
face him again. She was afraid this had been too much, even for him, and she wanted him to
feel safe around her again. Sometimes, when you pour your heart out to someone, they might
not know how to respond and remain silent.
As she stayed in the tent with her thoughts, Astarion was outside under the shadow of the
base of the hill they camped at and the thick canopy of trees. He was safe to move around
here and that’s what he was looking for. . . That, and wood.
Should I say something? But what can I say? I can barely deal with my own sorrows and
woes, and she’s helped me at least by just listening and never pushing? Can I do that for her?
Have I been doing that? I’m at a loss, here.As he was collecting some branches as well as his thoughts, something caught his attention.
He heard music.
“What in the hells?! Music, here?,” he said to no one while he headed towards the melody he
heard. As he moved towards it, he realized he was chasing the echo of the music he heard. He
headed back to camp and realized that this was the source of the music. It was Tav.
She was still inside the tent with the tent flap open. Her music, her song, flowed out into the
heavens asking for strength or perhaps thanking for the strength already given. He continued
to work on making a fire, for he didn’t dare interrupt her. He wanted to listen as he felt it
calmed his heart and mind.
Meanwhile, she had procured her lyre, which she had found in one of the many ruins
they’ve explored. She hadn’t played much since the worms, but her heart told her it was time
to sing. This time Tav was certain Astarion was far enough away, she could do it without
feeling embarrassed. She felt she had already demanded too much from him. If she could
only gather the courage to sing to him directly.
She began to play, letting her heart take the lead.
Let’s get old together.
Let’s be unhappy forever.
‘Cause there’s no one else in this world
That I’d rather be unhappy with
Let’s be exposed and unprotected
Let’s see one another
When we’re weak
Let’s go our separate ways
In the night like two moths
But know that you’re flying home meAs he finally arrived to the camp, he proceeded to set up the fire by arranging some rocks and
placing the wood. As he did so, he just listened to her sing about love. Perhaps about him,
even. He didn’t want to be so bold as to claim that, but he really heard her. He realized just
how much and how deeply she feels about him. He matters.
I was born thinking it would all be dreamy
But I know that I wouldn’t be happy that way
You wear me out with frustration and heartache and anger
But we wait for the wave just to wash it away
Don’t say nothing
Just sit next to me
Don’t say nothing
Just be, just be, just be, just be
Astarion completed setting up the fire and sat down next to it. His face revealing his
conflicted emotions, not about Tav, but about everything. He started to realize that he had
never stopped. One day he was a magistrate in Baldur’s Gate and the next thing he knew, a
gang of Gur attacked him. He was robbed of his humanity, likely for coin. Then his hell
began. A tear rolled down his cold cheek. For a long time, he felt his heart needed to cry.
Let’s let go together
Let us unfold one another
And watch all the little things
that once drew me to you
Eventually get on my nerves
I wear you out with frustration and heartache and anger
But we wait for the wave just to wash it away
He wanted to shout, to break things. He wanted to fight with the universe for forcing such
trials on him without his consent. Here they were, two broken people, but not by their own
doing. They were simply trying to mend the broken pieces of themselves, together. And itwas extremely hard. He felt hollow about life, but he wanted to feel alive. And he knew it
wouldn’t be easy for either of them, but he wanted to try, not for her, but for himself. He
loved her deeply and wanted to mend to give himself fully to her. He wanted to live.
Don’t say nothing
Just sit next to me
Don’t say nothing
Just be, Just be, Just be
When you’re sick of the everyday
When you’re tired of my voice
When you tell me you’ll walk out that door
That’s when I know
that’ll you’ll stay
He wanted to answer her call. It was building up inside him. His desire to show her that he’s
there now with her, for her. In his chest a growing longing and sadness that had been his
longest companion was clawing it’s way out of him while the happiness he felt for finally
having someone on his corner was fighting its way inside. He felt this battle down to his core.
Don’t say nothing
Just sit next to me
Don’t say nothing
Just be, Just be, Just be
Just don’t say nothing
Just sit next to me
Don’t say nothing
Just be, Just be
Don’t say nothing
Astarion stood up, determined to answer her call. He almost marched in the tent, startling
her. She was still sitting on the bed, but now she had the lyre in her hands and red, puffy eyes
from crying. He went over his things as she watched him with curiosity. Then he found it, hisviolin. His chest felt heavy with all the emotions he had been trying to suppress, and was
finally ready to let to. He tuned it and he began to play. He let his heart answer her call.
He began to play for her, pouring his heart out as he felt how his soul finally began to break
into pieces for it was time for it to reshape itself into something better, something new,
something his. She joined his melody as his began.
If not for you
Babe, I couldn’t find the door
Couldn’t even see the floor
I’d be sad and blue
If not for you
If not for you
Babe, I’d lay awake all night
Wait for the morning light to shine through
But it would not be new
If not for you
As he would play, she would she’d complement his melody. She felt his love flow through her.
If not for you
Babe, I couldn’t find the door
Couldn’t even see the floor
I’d be sad and blue
If not for you
If not for you
Babe, I’d lay awake all night
Wait for the morning light to shine through
But it would no be new
If not for youIf not for you
My sky would
Rain would gather, too
Without your love I’d be nowher at all
I’d be lost if not for you
And you know it’s true
If not for you my sky would fall
Rain would gather too
Without your love I’d be nowhere at all
Oh! What would I do if not for you?
If not for you winter would have no spring
Couldn’t hear the robin sing
I just would have a clue
Anyway, it wouldn’t ring true
If not for you
He ended his song and sat down on the floor looking up at her with a soft smile. She smiled back and
got the courage to sing to him one more song. So she bagan. This time it was him who decided to
accompany her melody as she sang.
They say there is a war
Between the man and the woman
I’ve never felt like this before
My heart knew tthat I couldn’t
And then you take me in
And everything beings to feel like I belong
Like everybody needs a home
And when I take your hand
Like the world has never held a man
I know I cannot heal the hurtBut I will hold you here forever
If I can
If I can
As she said this, his tears began to roll down his cheeks, matching him, she was crying, too, but
continued her song. He closed his eyes to focus on her words.
And then I learned the truth
How everything good in life
seems to lead back to you
And every single time time I run into your arms
I feel like I exist for love
Like I exist for love
Only for love
I can’t imagine how
it is forbidden from loving
His eyes opened as she said this. He smiled.
‘Cause when you walked into my life
I could feel my life begin
Like I was torn apart
the minute I was only born
And you’re the other half
The only thing that makes me whole
I know it sounds like a lot
But you really need to know
We are learning out for love
And we will learn for love forever
I know I love you so
And then I learned the truthHow everything good in life
seems to lead back to you
And every single time I run into your arms
I feel like I exist for love
Only love
She kept singing feeling her heart starting to feel lighter and hoped he did, too.
And when you say my name
Like white horses on the waves
I think it feels the same
As an ocean in my veins
And you’ll be diving in
Like nothing is out of place
And we exist for love
Only for love
And I love you
I love you
I love you
As she was ending her song, he put his violin down and stood up. Shakily, he moved towars
her and helped her up. He placed her lyre on the bed next to his violin. And hugged her.
And I love you
I love you
I love you
As they embraced, she cradled her head on his neck and she cried. Though she felt lighter,
there was one thing more that she wanted to let go of.
“There’s one more thing that I have to tell you. I can’t. . .”“Are you sure, love?”
“Yes, the thing is. . . back at the palace, I was. . . I didn’t want to interfere in your choice, but I
was ready to not. . . to not let you become him. I was ready to kill you.”
“I know, my love.”
“But, you don’t understand! I was going to set you ablaze and I along with you. I. . . I don’t
want to live without you, but I don’t want to let you be a worse monster than. . . Cazador.”
She hated how that name felt bitter on ther tongue.
“I know. It was very tempting to take that power all to myself. . . and I. . . I wanted it. I
wanted to have it all, and have it with you. But, I saw the pain in your eyes. I understood then
that I had to choose. I had to choose between what I coveted or a woman that had showed me
trust. Trust! Of all things! I gave you little to earn your trust. I used you. . . I used you for my
own benefit, and you saw beyond it. You looked passed it. I don’t hold any grudges about it.
I understand now that you would rather end us than allow me the freedom to become a
monster I wanted to be.”
“Oh, my Star, I just. . . I have felt so horrible about it. What if. . .? What if you had. . .?”
“Yes, but I didn’t. And you didn’t. And if you want, I forgive you. I forgive you, my love. I
understand where you were coming from. Now, I understand where you are coming from, so
I get it. And I thank you. I think your plan was the best if I had. . . if I had chosed to kill my
family, my kind, but I didn’t. And, I didn’t do it for you.”
She shifted to look at him and smiled. Her face puffy from craying so much, but for now, she
let go of so much that she felt she needed him to know.
“I did it for myself. I wanted to be free of the monster who made me, but to become him and
have his power was very tempting, I’m not going to lie. But, I’d like to belive I made the right
choice.”“I think you did. They didn’t deserve what was done to them, to you. You were all victims of
a sickness that was forced on you. You did what you could to survive and they’ll have to
learn to do the same.”
They let go. And walked toward the bed to lay down. She put her head on his shoulder and
took his hand. He got comfortable and touched his leg with hers. They just stayed there and
their world stopped for right now. Bodies tired, heart ligheter, and mind full of everything
that had just happened. They just lay there in silence for now. Then they closed their eyes and
rested.Chapter 9
At Twilight
A loud grumbling, gurgling sound awakens them. Astarion looks at Tav with a surprised look, and Tav
gives him an embarresed smile. She begins to sit up to get out of bed. Astarion follows.
“I seem to be a little hungry.”, she said trying to stiffle a laugh. Her body feeling lighter, but her
stomach demaning attention.
“You don’t say. I thought there was a bear right beside me.”, he laughed while heading out the tent,
looking back at her.
She got her pack and got some things out to prepare herself a meal. A small pan, a water skin, a bottle
of wine, what she had left of her bread, cheese, and dried meat. Perhaps tonight was the last time she’d
have this and the next meal she’d have to hunt for. It was fine, though. She wanted to collect some pelts
for sale or trade if they came up to a new town.
She thought that the best way to get easy supplies was to work for them. She was also pushing Astarion
to not steal things just because he could. They both could, but she was more comfortable if they took
from obvious, long forgotten ruins and not form Jacob, the shopkeeper, or something like that.
Of course Astarion, was a little annoyed by that, so he kept his hands to himself, for the most part.
“How much of that food have you got left? Is it still good?
“Well, the bread is a little stale, but it’ll do in a pinch. I’ll just toast it with the cheese and it’s pretty
good, still.”
She said this as she was putting her iron skillet on the rocks from the fire. She placed the pre-cut slices
of bread on the skillet to let them toast a bit.
“Besides, I had pre-cut slices to allow it to dry. It’s a little trick I learned. If it dries faster, it won’t
spoil. I also place some drops of water on the hot skillet and cover it up. The vapor helps soften it a bit
as it toasts. The cheese will also help a little as it melts. Then with the dried meat, I will add more water
to soften it, too. I’m basically making me a sammich with extra work. But it’s good, I swear!”She explained this like if it was such a normal thing to do when you went on a long excursion towards
danger.
He looked at her intently as she was fussing over her meal preparation.
“You know, I never really noticed you the living have a lot of things to consider to simply stay alive.
Here I was focusing on my own things, but you also have to consider even the little things.”
“Well, yeah. I think we both have little things and big things to consider. That and also, I live my
creature comforts. Just because I am living in the woods, doesn’t mean I want to also live like an
animal. And neither should you, to be honest.”
He agreed with a nod as he thought back on the little things she had tried and kept or forgotten about. It
was almost military in her part the way she organized and prioritized tasks to either ensure hygene or
cover up the tracks of a feeding vampire-spawn.
I wonder if it bothers her to have to do all those things. I mean, even I get annoyed
at times that I need to help out with the hole digging, but I certainly appreciate her
reasons. She doesn’t want ayn Gur on our tracks.
Tav was a ranger and had learned a lot of things to keep herself safe and unseen in the woods or most
any other place with enough shadow. In part, this was a reason why she didn’t miss the sun and
daylight much. All her life, she’s lived in shadows, though she is a day-walker. But she wanted to keep
him safe as well as have a comfortable stay at their temporary camps. Though, it was a little tiring for
they stayed in camp about 12 hours give or take a couple hours more or less.
When a new campsite was scouted out, she tried to go for spaces near water. She prefered ponds or
lakes, for Astarion, but rivers and streams for her. Either way, water was important. She had fashioned
water skins from the stomachs of some bears Astarion had fed on which allowed her to carry a bit more
for things like washing up and cleaning. She knew about the necrotic energy left behind animals he fed
on, so she didn’t consider using the meat for eating. She would just keep the pelts rolled up after she
was done with them.
When pelts where involved, they would stay a day longer to allow then to dry properly, with a little
help of elemental magic, of course. She saw this as currency whenever possible. She’d collect
medicinal herbs and forests fruits, too. Anything that could be carried for then to be sold and traded.
She had gotten better at finding and keeping food stuffs and medicinal stuffs in good condition long
enough to be traded for needed items.She’d gotten soap, bread, dried meat, and good cooking utensils, so far. Her next goal was to get a
small cart that she could push with their gear on top. Astarion thought it was unecessary, but secretly,
he did like the idea of not having to carry his pack.
But for the most part, it was the little things that fascinated him. She was alive, so that meant eating and
then then, well. . . so, her way of managing that was interesting to him. He never paid attention to the
crew before because there were so many, but now it was just her.
She called it her “poop tent”.
“Poop tent? Seriously?,” he asked, with a surprised yet disgusted look on his face.
“Well, that’s what it’s for. What else would I call it? The tent of secrets? Now, that is stupid. Besides,
it’s bad enough your hearing is so good that you can hear when I pass wind. Like this we can both be
uncomfortable.”, she laughed as she kept digging a deep enough hole.
He helped her dig her little trenches here and there. But, her logic seemed pretty solid. The tent was a
little restroom, where you can have a private moment like wash up or for poop and pee for her. All
water and waste would collect down the path that was dug down into a deeper hole. Said hole would be
covered with branches and leaves to allow the air to pass and minimize gas build up from the waste.
As for Astarion’s food, that was kept in an area a little further away from the main tent. She would tie
the legs of the animals and raised them to make them look like they were being bled. Her benefit here
was she was a ranger, so if anyone came looking, she’d have no issue explaining she was just hunting
for food and sale. But in reality it was just a front. Those animals were no good after he fed.
Right as the packed up their camp, she and Astarion would place the carcases with the lingering
necrotic energy in the waste hole and then she would use a fire spell to burn it all. Then she would
place dirt on top of it, add a sappling or seed, water it, and be on her merry way.
He found this to be very much a thing she would do, even without him and his kills.
“Hey, are you okay? You seem lost? Come back to me, my Star.”, she said softly as they kept walking
in the dark path with only the moonlight to guide them.
“Huh? Oh, I’m fine. I was just thinking back on all the little things you do. I mean, from trying to cover
my tracks to your little tent. And you just keep taking things down and putting things up, with a smile.
It’s fascinating.”, he mused while looking at her with a raised eyebrow.
She blushed. She had thought, he hadn’t really noticed the little things, but she was wrong.“Well, my poop-tent is my best idea so far. But thank you for noticing. I don’t want any freaking Gur
getting ideas. I swear, I see one or a couple, it’s on sight! Two chops to the throat!”
She punched the air as if she were fighting with some imaginary man in front of her. His expression
softened. His little killer was still not forgiving the Gurs for having attacked him over 200 years ago.
That made him think of something he rarely did.
Just how dangerous was this woman? It made him shudder to think about the details, but despite her
size, she had somehow managed to do things out of character for someone that short and young.
She was 40 now, for any elf, she’s just a child, but she also carries human blood, so that means she’s in
her prime. She lived alone most of her life and she lived in military training practically since she was a
babe. Then she befrended the most unlikely bunch of folks and they made her their temporary defactoleader. She tried to pass on that claim to anyone else, but the group didn’t budge. From the Blade of
Frontiers, to an explosive mage, to an even ill-tempered Githyanki, she managed to win them over.
Then out of all things good and holy, she took a liking to a vampire-spawn. So much so, that she
offered herself to keep both the spawn feed and the rest of the crew relaxed about the spawn’s feeding
habits. They didn’t like it much, but she explained to them what she would do and how she would do it.
Listen, it’s fine. Really. He will feed in private, so you guys don’t feel
uncomfortable and neither does he. I still got some of my berries. I just eat
them after a feed to recuperate faster. I’ll be fine. Besides, he needs to learn
how to control his hunger and feeding habits. If he kills me, he will die, too. I
doubt any of you lot would be as relaxed about him as I am. So, I am safe.
Adding to the fact that he also feeds on large beasts that I manage to track. I
simply top him off. It’s fine.
The group wasn’t too happy about this arrangement, but she was stubborn enough to make it happen.
Besides, she was safe. She trusted Astarion with her life, even back then for when he had the chance to
kill her, he didn’t. And if he failed to stop feeding in time, Karlach would burn him up, Wyll would
behead him, and the rest of the group would also have their fun.
“According to the map, we will be arriving at a little town in a couple of hours. Would you
like to see if there’s an inn?”, he asked.“Yes, I think we should try and see if we can get a room. So, anyway, how are you? How are
you feeling?”, she asked as she looked out to the horizon.
“I. . . I feel better. I think better than I have in a long time. Thank you. And you?”
“Same. I mean, I feel better, too. I was carrying those emotions and ideas for such a long time
that I hadn’t realized just how heavy they became. Thank you for. . . holding me as I feel to
pieces.”
“Thank you for holding me, too. Now, let me go gag for being so sickly sweet.”, he fakegaged.
“HAHAHAHA! Let’s do something manly to regain our manliness then!”
He laughed with her as they kept walking. He liked her company especially when she would
match his dark humor. They could be as caring and sweet to each other when the time
needed it, but at the same time they enjoyed seeing two trolls trying to fuck in a barn while
laughing at the sight.
“Oh, look! I can see the tops of the buildings. I think I should go in the inn first if they have
one and try to get a room. You go and brood your way into a corner for now and then we’ll
meet up in the room. Well, if it pans out that way. Otherwise, we’ll head into that abandoned
building on the west side of the town for now. Let’s hurry. It’s almost sunrise.”
They quickened their pace and Astarion took a right leaving her while she kept going to a
building that looked like an inn.
It was. She checked on the door. It was open. She took a deep breath and stepped in.
“Hello? I’m sorry to disturb at such an hour, but I am looking for shelter? Hello? Anyone?”
A creak was heard and someone shuffled inside a room. Then a door opened and a man in his
sleeping tunic appeared, disoriented but trying to find the reason for being awoken.
“What in the good heavens? Who are you? What do you want?”“Oh, dear! I’m so sorry! I thought this was an inn. I checked the door and it was unlocked!”
“What? Oh, yes, yes. It is. It’s just that this hour is not conventional for any patron”
“I know and I’m sorry, but I have been walking for hours and this is the first town I’ve seen.
I’m just so tired and I got excited when I saw this amazing place out in the darkness.”
“Mmm, well, we have some rooms available. How long?”
“A day. Well, the thing is that I need a room for my partner as well. Would that be an issue?”
“Might, but not for me. Rooms have a single bed. You can either share or rent two rooms.
What’ll be?
“One room is fine. Do I pay now or later?”
“You pay now to have the key to the room. Top floor, at the end of the hall on the left. We
offer food and drink after 9am if you are interested. Rooms have a water basin for washing
up, but for toilet use and showering, there is a cabin for that outside behind this building. No
extra charge for that.”
“Oh, that’s fantastic. How much do I owe you?”
“That’ll be 3 gold.”
She handed the money, thankful that it was certainly cheaper than Baldur’s Gate. She headed
up the room to check it out, but as she passed by the inn’s door, she opened it and whistled.
Astarion heard it and got out of his hiding place to go in the inn.
As he stepped in, tall and pale, the inn-keeper gave a little jump. He wasn’t sure why, but
that man had something about him, though he was still too sleepy to find out. Astarion
simply kept looking at the stairs as he walked toward them. He quickly went up and caught
up with Tav as she opened the door.
It wasn’t much, but it was clean and it was safe from the sun. By now it was starting to
become day. Astarion stayed at the door as she dealt with the window. She marked on the
ground with a coal she kept, just how much direct reach the sunlight entered through it. This
was more for her to calm her nerves.The room would do in a pinch. It had a single bad on the furthest corner and a small table
with a chair across. There was a chest at the foot of the bed and right in the middle of the
furthest wall opposite the entrance was a small window. This one was a 2-pane with a
vertical slider and shutters on the inside.
After Tav marked an outline of where the light touched the floor, she opened the glass
window pane and closed the shutters. Then took a leather strap and fixed it to keep it from
opening on accident. Then she took a cloth and placed it on top. Was it excessive? Yes. But
she was very thorough when it came to Astarion’s safety form sunlight. Even a sinch on his
skin was unacceptable, especially if it were by her own lack of preparation.
Then she beckoned him to enter fully into the room. He gave her a thankful smile for her
efforts and took off his pack and gear. He closed the door and walked over to the chair. She
gave him a look.
“What’s wrong, love?”
“I wanted to use the chair to block the door? I don’t want any other stranger opening it by
mistake while we’re in here.”, with a worried look on her face.
“Hahaha! I almost forgot about that. But, we sure looked divine. How about we just move the
table instead?”
“Mmm. . . let me see. . . Oh, I know. I’ll tie some straps to the door-lock and I think I can get it
to the bed.”
“Don’t, give me ideas, my dear.”, he said with a seductive smile.
She blushed and felt a little jolt of energy from her stomach down her body. He was certainly
right about this, though. He could simply wisper numbers in her ear and that’d be enough to
send her flying.
“Oh, you! Stop it. You only get like that when you’re hungry. You haven’t eaten well in a
couple of days. So, move it over and let me set up.”He laughed to himself for it was true. He found that when it was getting closer to feeding on
her, his body started to desire her in all the ways it should be desired. So, he took off
everything else he had on except his briefs. Perhaps he could get lucky after “eating”, or at
least not be so hot in this stuffy room.
Meanwhile, Tav also took off her gear and clothes. She only kept her shoes on and her
undergarments like Astarion. They surely behaved like an old couple by now that they’ve
spent so much time together. She occasionaly looke over and saw him looking at her, and
she’d still blush after all this time.
Get it together woman! He’s seen you better than you can see yourself
with a mirror and tasted every part of you, yet you still blush as he sees
you in your panties and bra? Seriously.
She then took out a water-skin and a small wash cloth. She wasn’t in the mood to go outside
and freshen up. Then she saw the corner where the inn-keeper said the water and basin
would be and decided to use up her water and take new fresher one.
She walked over and poured her water in the basin and placed her wash cloth in, got it wet,
wringed it and then began cleaning her neck. She knew Astarion wouldn’t mind feeding on
her as she was covered in sweat and dirt, but she wouldn’t have it. She was gifting him her
life, and she wanted it to be clean.
He enjoyed looking at her while she washed up. The way she would pass the washcloth on her neck
with some force to really scrub her skin. The way her skin would protest and turn red, and the way you
could tell how her skin looked a deep copper for her skin was darker, as expected from a wood elf. Her
skin was not as dark as the druid Halsin, but not as light as his. He always thought that perhaps high
elves always had a light skin color and now that he was a spawn-vampire, perhaps it went lighter.
Either way, he found her fascinating.She then continued with her face and arms. Rub and rub, wash, wring, rub and rub, repeat until done.
The only thing that she didn’t do was between her legs as she preferred a proper bath or shower for
that.
Then she saw that there was a metal bucket under the basin and poured her dirty water in it. She’d
throw it away later.
Then she turned to Astarion.
“You’re next. Come on.”, she said as she procured a new wash cloth from the pack and placed hers on
the back of the chair. She poured the last of her old water in the basin and stepped aside.
He stood up a bit reluctantly. He preferred to keep her scent lingering on his skin, but she would be
upset if he didn’t clean up a little. At one point she told him there wasn’t any reason to be unclean just
because he was undead. That’s what Shadowheart meant, though. Tav did have “mom” vibes at times
and was rather pushy when she wanted to.
So, he took her wash cloth from the back of the chair and threw the clean and dry one at her while he
gave her his mischievous giggle. If he was going to be forced to clean himself up, he’d do it his way.
She just rolled her eyes and laughed.
She too enjoyed watching him as he cleaned up. She wondered how she got so lucky with finding a
man like him. He was gorgeous in her eyes and despite being undead, a bit arrogant, and conceded, she
felt that it was just a front. He was caring, and he was soft. He was strong and resilient, too. He was
very clever and had a dark sense of humor just like hers. To her, it wasn’t just his body which she found
attractive, it was also him as a person. His handsome face was just a lucky bonus, but she’d figure she
would have fallen for him even if he were fat, short, and hairy, or missing something. In other words,
his physical beauty wasn’t the only pull he had, it was his essence.
As she was lost in her thoughts about him, he started with his face and hair. Then his neck and
shoulders. He also rubbed the cloth hard, but his skin remained the same shade or marble white.
Occasionally, he’d turn to see his Tav watching him with flushed cheeks. He knew she was a bit hot
and bothered, but she’d never admit it. Though she was always a more than willing participant, it still
made her blush.
As he finished, he rinsed out the wash cloth and placed it back on the back of chair, poured his water in
the bucket , and walked towards the bed.
He looked at her with with seductive stare. That one he knew would get her going and spoke.“My dear, shall we? Get comfortable”
Suddenly, she felt her head spin as her heart rate spiked. Even after doing this countless times, she
couldn’t helped but get a little aroused at the expectation of his bite. Perhaps she would never admit it
out loud, but she found these kinds of moments with him very erotic. She had heard stories from time
to time when a little younger when she visited some towns. There was at one point that she landed and
Baldur’s Gate, though she didn’t know it was. But she heard the most stories there, of balls and halls,
and people being seduced.
By now, she guessed the stories to be true and that many of them were about the beautiful man walking
towards her. The only difference now is that he wasn’t being forced to seduce anyone. He found her to
be the most beautiful being in existence and wanted her for who she was and not what she offered. That
was her bonus.
As he placed a knee on the bed, she gasped. He laughed a little.
That’s right, my love. I love how you still react like that when I am
near...ly on top of you.
He couldn’t help himself when his giveaway laugh escaped his lips as he continued crawling on the
bed.
“Oh, no… what are you planning, you! Stop it!”
“What? little o’ me? I’m just getting comfortable to. . . eat. What ever shall you mean?”
She gave him a suspicious look. She knew him enough to know him better. He was going to turn on his
charm to the max. She stood no chance. To the world outside, he was wrapped around her finger, but
here, like this she was his and he knew it.
“Fuck.”, she let it escape her lips knowing his intentions.
“Gladly.”, he answered back.
He placed his knees firmly on the matress and grabbed her hips, with his strong arms he turned her
facing down. He’d never had her like this and was dying to try her this way, at least for a while. He
prefered to see her face as he pleasured her.Now, facing down, her breathing accelerated. That feat of strength really got her going. Though he was
strong, he was always gentle with her. He tried things only if she was all right with them. This time, she
had no complaints, so he continued. He caressed her back with his index finger. It was cold to the
touch, but quickly warming up, because of her. She was on fire, for him. He smiled and continued. He
placed his hands on her hips again and lifted her buttocks up towards his hips. She reacted with a moan.
This time she would be able to cover her mouth lest she lose her balance and plant her face on the
mattress. He know that, too.
“I thought you were hungry?”, she said in but a whisper.
“I am.”, he replied with that simle that melted her resolve.
She couldn’t see his face, but she knew that smile and that voice. He was extremely famished, and so
was she.
“Are you hungry my beloved?”
She gasped and with a shaky voice she managed to say, “y. . .yes. Mmm. Yes, please.”
He grabbed her from her hips again and thrusted his own hips towards her. He was teasing her now,
enjoying how her body gave little shakes and her breath accelerated, all in anticipation for him. He
loved this, he loved her. He loved how she wrapped herself around him, but it was too soon for that. He
wanted to make her exhausted not the other way around.
“Astarion, please.”
“Sh. Now, now, my love. Great things come to those who wait.”
As he said that, he grabbed her from her chest and pulled her upward. He nestled her body on his torso
and her neck right where his face was. He was showing her how easy it was to dominate his little
assasin. A moan escaped her lips as she closed her eyes. The pleasure she felt having this man, this
monster, be able to have her this way was such extasy for her. She loved this, loved him and wanted to
be consumed by him, by his touch. She wanted it all as long as it was with him.
He began to hum his melody from before as he gently swayed from side to side with her body firmly
held on his arms. Then he began to have fun. His left hand frimly held her from under her arm, acrossher breasts, and his left hand stopped close to her collarbone. But with his right hand he began to caress
her left cheek, then he trailed the tips of his fingers down her neck, and down to her breasts.
He started massaging her right breast, then playing with the nipple to make it hard. Then he squeezed it
lightly, and as he squeezed, he began sucking on her neck and her ear lobe.
“Mmm”
He continued by kissing her neck with his cold touch. He found how his skin warmed slowly with the
more he pleasured her. He felt alive when they were like this, her body like putty by his touch and his
skin warm again. This was the best place to be.
He played with both her breasts and nipples for a bit knowing full on well that the longer he waited, the
more moist she’d be for him. But, he had to check just in case, didn’t he?
He moved his hand slowly down her stomach and she gave a little jolt. She knew what he was doing
and was about to melt into him. As he slid his hand down, first he went on top of her panties. He
touched her through the cloth and she shuddered lightly. He smiled and began to nibble at the skin of
her neck. She buckled as he touched her and nibbled on her neck at the same time. She dind’t know
what to do with her hands, so she threw them backwards to grab at his own briefs, pulling him closer.
She got him, too. A moan escaped his lips, too. She smiled.
“Right back at ya, love”, she whispered.
“Oh, it’s a competition, now? Good to know. I won’t let you win.”, he purred in her ear and then licked
her neck with his cold touch. She gasped. She was gone.
“Mm. . . Astarion!”
As she moaned his name, he covered her mouth to stifle her moan.
“Hush now my love. We don’t want to wake up the others, now do we?”
She bit her lip as he removed his hand fom her mouth while she moved her head from side to side in
response. But by now, he was right with her. It was time to do what he desired. He wanted to claim heragain, but now it was different. Before they were broken. Now they were whole and recunstrected from
pieces of each other. Today, they would finalize their claim on each other and finish what they started
back at the base of the cliff. Today, they would release the last remanents of the past imposed and
started anew on their own terms.
He slid his fingers down her waist to catch the cloth of her panties. He didn’t want to rip them, he just
wanted to slide them down to make it easier. So, down they went as a little growl escaped from his
throat and a gasp from hers. She had waited long enough.
He braced one knee to hold his their weight and used the other to move her leg. Then with his right
hand he helped her move her right leg out of at least one pantie hole. Now, she was free, and so was he.
He pulled down his briefs to reveal his already hard member just waiting impatiently for his master to
do what both wanted, to lay claim to the woman in his grasp. Astarion readjusted her leg to spread it a
little more. Then he slid his right hand again down her stomach and then a little further down. He found
what he wanted.
“Ah. . . Mmm”
“That’s right my love, don’t you ever forget you are mine, lover.”
“Mmm. . . yes. I. . . am. . . yours.”, she panted.
He began to use his hingers to lightly press her clitoris while using a circular motion. He loved how she
lightly moaned whenver he touched her that way. She found his hand and guided him in the direction
that caused her more pleasure. This he love the most. Even now when he was doing his best work to
make her know he’s got her, she still manages to let him know that she’s still in control. He loved this
woman in ways he still didn’t understand, but she was his, and he was hers. Now, forever, always.
Then he used his hand to guide himself inside her. It was time. As he slid in, finding it tight as always,
so he had to fight his way in, he arched himself back just a little. As he did this, she curved to the side,
leaving her neck exposed. He couldn’t say no to this invitation.He took a bite as he entered her tightness. Then he begun to lightly thrust. She couldn’t help herself and
clawed her fingers into the back of his thighs. As they did this, a supernova exploded inside their
intertwined souls.
He fed on her, feeling how her life flowed into him. He felt how tightly she received him, choking him.
She felt how his teeth pierced her skin and her blood rushed out. How his cool lips formed a tight seal
on her hot sking and throbbing neck to not let any drop escape his lips. He felt how her heart pounded
fast on her chest and her breathing was deep. How her nails pressed hard on his own skin as the
pleasure of all of this happening all at once was sending her over.
This time, she didn’t shout his name, she whispered it with such love, such passion that now it was him
who couldn’t handle it. He began thrusting faster and faster, until his love flowed into her and she
accepted him deep inside her.
Both panting, they weren’t done. He stopped feeding on her, but kept slowly thrusting inside her. Now,
he just kissed her neck and lighthly nibbled on her ear. But as he kept going in and out of her tightness,
he pushed her down. This took ger by surprise and she began pushing back. It would always be a battle
with this two.
As he pushed forward, she pushed back. They met half way. This was probably how a volcano felt
when it was ready to destroy a town. He grabbed her waist to have more control on her rhythm as he
began to pick up the pace. She was about to let go. She bit her forearm to stiffle a scream, but he caught
her.
“No, my love. That’s mine.”
He grabbed her arms and pulled her up, she had no choice. His name escaped her lips as she moaned.
“Ah. . . Ah. . . As. . . tarion!”
“My love! Yes! Mmm. . . Aah!”
As they came together, he let her go. She fell forward and as she did, he followed, landing on top of
her.They laughed as they lost their balance once the exploded together. As he was on top of her, he kissed
her shoulders and rolled off her.
It was a small bed, so he had to maneuver himself to not fall as she moved over to lay beside him. They
embraced each other while looking at each other. Her eyes showing that this was the last thing she
would do for a while. He smiled at her and kissed her forehead.
With a wisper, he told her as her eyelids were closing, “Rest now, love of mine. I’ll take care of you.”
He held her as she fell asleep while a broad smile appeared on this face. He was happy. This woman,
was surely something else.
***
A couple hours passed and now the sun was at it’s brightest, you could tell because the window let a
little light in around the curtain Tav had placed. She began to wake, opened her eyes and looked up.
She smiled at him and he smiled back.
“Hey. Did you know that I love you?”
“Yes. I do. Did you know I love you?”
“Yes, very much.”, she shifted to hug him and then kissed him on the cheek.
Then she grabbed hold of her panties and put it back on properly by sliding her leg back in through the
panties hole. Then she rolled on top of him to get up, but he caught her. He hugged her with a light but
firm grasp.
“Now, where do you think you’re going, my love?”
“I. . . well. . . I’m getting dressed and going downstairs.”
“May I ask what for, my love?”
“Uh, well. . . No reason now it seems.”, she answered back as she laughed.As she allowed her body’s weight settle on top of him, she asked him, “So, then what’s the plan then,
Astarion?”
“Mm, good question. Are you hungry my dear?”
“Well, now that you mention it, I think I am. Can you please go with me downstairs?”
He rolled his eyes pretending to protest at her request, but she knew that he had a hard time denying
her. He didn’t like having her being alone in places that were new with other people potentially trying
something funny. But in all reality, people were more in danger of her if they crossed her.
He let her go, so she could stand up. She did and walked over her gear, and as she did, Astarion
observed her movements. She wasn’t graceful and dainty. If he had to compare, he’d say she had the
same grace as an orc too big for its size. She was powerful, every movement calculated and rough. She
wasn’t raised to be a dainty flower. No, she was raised to be the force of a thousand oceans clashing
their waters together to take down any powerful fleet. That was his Tav. A force of nature all bundled
into 1.5 meters of magic turned flesh and that was amazing to him.
Pants on, top on. Chest plate on, bracers, boots, belt, all of it on. Then her cerrated knife, hidden on her
left boot. Her dagger, his gift, on her right leg. Then her trowing spikes hidden on her left bracer.
Another dagger hidden on the right bracer, a dagger that he also gifted her. The only things she wasn’t
going to equip were her swords and bow. If he hadn’t known she was a ranger, he’d swear she was a
rogue like him.
Then she sat on the chair and took her chance at looking at him while he got dressed. He loved his
theatrics and love to give a show. He brushed his fingers through his curls and gave her a wink. His
broad shoulders and chest stretched as he flexed his arms up made him look like Atlas. He then slid on
his leather pants. She quite loved how those in particular accented the toned muscles on his legs and
buttocks. She was a butt-girlie, what can we say. He buttoned up his pants and then got his doublet. He
tended to prefer this one with the embroidered design in gold with purple stained leather. It was
mended but it fith his figure in all the right places. She was certain if she offered to get him a new one,
he might say no for he has his favorite. This made him so human and common, a typical guy with a
favorite shirt who wore it so much it will eventually fall apart. If and when that day came, she would
make him something else with it or try to fix it for sure. He certainly loved to look and feel extravagant.He put on his embroidered leather boots, who he actually enhanced. She loved the fact that he was so
good with his hands in more ways than one, in particular regarding his clothes. He always looked so
handsome, even when he didn’t in her opinion. Then he too began to hide his own weapons pretty
much in the same places as Tav, for it was him who taught her how to keep her danger hidden. Then
they were ready to go downstairs.Chapter 10
What’s for lunch?
She walked down first and he followed. As they took every step down, with deliberation the
people chatting and laughing took notice. They perhaps could feel it deep inside that what
was walking down the stairs was danger in the flesh. The woman, bronze goddess with gear
that meant she was no dainty, frail woman. Behind her a much taller man, pale and muscular
with red eyes and a look of arrogance, quite the difference from the woman for despite her
wild look still carried a friendly smile and eyes.
What a pair and what a sight. As she reached the floor, she looked towards the bar where the
inn-keeper was cleaning some ale mugs. She headed towards him as Astarion took a turn and
headed towards the furthest table on a corner that was partially covered in darkness. In truth,
it was also very far from the door leading outside and that particular corner didn’t have
windows. It was the best place for him to see the people there while also not give an
accidental show of flames. As he sat down at the table, broody, mysterious, and quiet with a
face that could kill, he looked towards the direction of Tav. She was about to try out her
charm. She was hopeful for a trade or a sale.
They weren’t running low in funds as of now, but she had taken the effort to cleanse and
clean them, she might as well try. From what he recalled she had put some work into these
pelts and were ready to be used. She always took great care into making sure things would be
useful and safe, even for him.
He remembered when she stayed up until late some days ago to clean the pelts collected. He
had fed on the bear and since then a couple of foxes, a wolf, and a stag. In her view, it was
unfortunate the meat couldn’t be harvested, but the pelts could with a little help. She asked
him to put the carcasses on the respective holes and set them on fire. That would at least
cleanse the necrotic energy left behind from his feed and allow nature to recuperate nutrientsin the ground for future life. He found that poetic. He was the reason for death, but she
helped him bring life again.
As for the pelts, she’d do the dirty work herself. First stretch the skins tight and proper. Then
with the knife, remove all the fat from the skin and collect that. The fat would be boiled and
clarified as much as possible. From this fat, she made candles for our use. This meant she
didn’t have to cleanse that. Less energy spent here. As for the skins, she would use fire to
help the drying prosses accelerate. Then, brush the hairs to remove any mud or blood stuck
on it and allow the natural oils to move back into the hair. Then add her own special mix of
oil that would help the cleansing of necrotic energy.
He thought it was curious how she always waited until the moon could offer enough light,
but at times she would clean them during daylight. Either way, she would do this barefoot.
She would really dig her feet in the dirt when she applied the oil and brushed the hair of the
pelt. She would whisper into it. She allowed the energy of Faerun enter her and use her body
to transmute the energy of lingering death into her, to be cleansed and come out renewed for
life.
From life comes death. From death comes life. The blood we take, we take no
burden. The life we take, we give back life. Let this sacrifised life know it was not
wasted. The flesh gives back to the nature it came from. The blood gives life to he
who was robbed from it. The skin will give warmth to those that accept it. No part
was wasted. No part will rot. Enter in me that which life rejects and let me birth
it back into the energy of the universe. I will it by the fire that burns in me. I
will it by the blood that runs through me. In perfect love and perfect trust. So
mote it be. This is so, and it is done.It took him by surprise how the energy shifted from that general location. He was a little
saddened that he had left that kind of mark, but then here she came and took it into herself
and transformed it. He was thankful, but there was surely a seed of doubt planted. Was this
the type of energy he left in her when he fed on her? She offered herself wilingly everytime.
And he certainly accepted her offer, for more reasons than just one. But, was she carrying his
energy the same way the pelts were?
Back in the inn, she was chatting and laughing with the inn-keeper and some additonal folks
he hadn’t noticed while he was daydreaming. He could hear parts of their conversation quite
clearly for she tended to speak loud enough for hm to hear whenever he was “moody-sitting”
on a corner.
“Thank you so much for the room. It’s perfect. I slept very well.”
The inn-keeper blushed as she said this. She hadn’t realized his own room was right under
hers, so he kind of, sort of, hear them making love right before she fell asleep.
<<cough>> “Certainly, Miss. I’m glad I was of help.”, he still said while trying not to choke in
surprise.
He hadn’t seen Astarion well, but seeing that marble-statue of a man walk down the stairs
with her and she was now standing here like it was no big deal, certainly caused him a bit of
a shock. Astarion noticed and laughed to himself. He still enjoyed the reaction he caused
strangers, but even more so if they somehow heard how he made love to his woman, to then
have that same woman walk out of the room like it was nothing more than a walk in the park.
Astarion figured that either Tav didn’t notice the reaction people had or she didn’t care
enough to notice, either way, she will turn heads.
“So, I wanted to ask some things if you don’t mind. You see, I am a ranger and a merchant.
My husband and I travel from town to town selling our goods. So my first question is, do you
know of a place here in town where I could possibly sell somethings? Or even trade for othersI don’t have? The thing is that this is the first time we’ve been to this town. We usually
traveled further north, but I was feeling a bit daring and I convinced my husband to go
south.”, she said this with a bright smile, despite some lies.
It was true she wanted to sell or trade, but she was no merchant and “my husband?!” That lie
right there surely would ruffle some feathers on a pale-elf.
HER HUSBAND?! I AM HER HUSBAND! WHAT? SHE SEES ME
AS HER HUSBAND ALREADY?! What am I doing?! I haven’t
even. . . I mean, should I? Does she want to be. . . my wife? But, I
am. . . a vampire. . . not even a full one?! Hells! Is this what I want?
I mean, were practically married now, living and travelling
together, but. . . would she want it to make it official? Does she
want that? She deserves the world and more. Can I be that one that
gives her that? I do want to make her mine. . . I thought I had made
her mine. . . I mean. . . every time I make love to her, aren’t I?
What?. . . I. . . do want her to be mine, to make it official. Yes. I will
find a way to get her a ring and ask her hand in marriage. Tav, I
will make you my wife. You are already mine. It will just make it
official.
The determination on his face was almost frightening. There she was oblivious to
the lie she said just figuring it would make it useful. Some of these towns didn’t
take kindly to young women staying in rooms at inns with men, especially if the
noice they made was heard. She certainly wasn’t saying it to cause any reaction
on anyone, espeically Astarion, it was just a clever ploy to get sympathy points
from strangers to earn quick coin or trade.
Some folks from the tables nearest the bar stood up and walked over interested
in the conversation. It wasn’t everyday they met women that looked likeassassins strike up a conversation with such a friendly demeanor. She was
interesting, to say the least.
“I’m sorry for eavesdropping, young lady, but did you just say you’re selling items?”
“Oh, hello, sir. Yes, you see, my husband and I travel the woods together and we explore and
I find things that can be useful for others, but hard to get. For example, medicinal herbs, some
dried goods and even pelts.”
An older woman joined in looking at Tav with interest and some distrust.
“If you don’t mind me asking, dear, but why are you and your husband traveling the woods
together? You look so young, should you be bearing him children? Can he even provide a
home for you?”
It took all the energy in his soul for Astarion not to leap and tear this woman apart. How dare
she question his Tav? How dare she imply that he cannot provide for his woman?!
Does this woman want a death sentence?! How dare she even…?! What
do you mean I can’t provide for Tav?!. . . Can I?
As he was losing control again of his emotions and thoughts, Tav took the conversation and
flipped it. She wasn’t about to let some strange old lady make her feel bad about her life
choices. She’ll learn today to mind her poison.
“Well, miss. I don’t see why you are so daring in coming to a stranger and try to make them
remember things that are painful and out of their control, but I’ll humor you.”, Tav said with
tears building in her eyes and a shaky voice. She was really digging in ther theatrics.
YOU DARE OUT POISON ME, SNAKE! LET’S JUST SEE WHO IS
BETTER. YOU WILL LEARN TODAY THE DIFFERENCE
BETWEEN VENEMOUS AND POISONOUS, WENCH!She continued with a sad face, “you see. I was born baren. I cannot give my husband any
children, try as I may. We’ve been traveling all over for four years now going to mages and
clerics, and everything in between and nothing. I was born broken. I will never have the joy
of being a mother. Are you a mother? Could you imagine your husband wishing with all his
soul to start a family, fall in love with you and then you cannot provide? I’ve carried my
sorrow and my husband carries me. He should be off with another that can offer him children
but he chose to follow me. So that’s the reason, which you don’t deserve to know, but I am
not ashamed. It was not my choice that my body cannot give life. But it is my husband’s
choice to stay with me despite it. So, are interested on some healing balm, pelts, or just want
to make me feel miserable for not being woman enough?”
The way the other town’s folk saw the woman turn beet red and storm off was priceless. It
was obvious that said woman did this sort of thing often, but was rearely if ever put in her
place. As for Tav, she was thankful for the woman, for her sympathy points overflowed. She
was certain that she’d sell all, trade all and achieve her objective, she wanted her push-cart.
Astarion couldn’t believe just how insane these last couple of minutes had been. Hell, the last
couple of hours, from making love to his woman, to becoming her husband in front of
strangers, to being call unfit as a man, and now his Tav is baren and he chooses to stay with
her.
Obviously there is a mix of truth and lies in everything Tav is saying, but she isn’t saying it to
cause Astarion any pain or discomfort. She wasn’t to cause it to that nosy woman that was
too smug for her own good. Too bad our favorite vampire-spawn can’t read Tav’s mind to
calm his.
Is she. . . baren? Does she want children? Does she want mine? But, I
can’t have any. . . Curse you Cazador!. . . But, who am I kidding? Had I
not been turned, then I would have never met her. But, still. I never feltthat I wanted children, and a stable home, but Tav. . . Does she? With
me? I need some fresh ai and I can’t leave. Oh! Gods! I can’t. . .
Meanwhile, Tav was having the time of her life, enjoying the attention and working her
charm to get her little cart. She was oblivious to the fact that her lover was losing his
mind in a dark corner listening in to her invented banter. Furthermore, she couldn’t wait
until they left town to tell re-tell him her thought process, because she found these
interactions hilarous.
“So, how about it? Any particular place I need to go to?”, Tav continued.
“Well, miss. I think this is a good a place as any.”
The inn-keeper with a booming voice got the attention of the patrons present.
“Folks, gather around. Today is your lucky day. We’ve got some goods that might be of
your interest for coin or trade. This here miss, has something for you, your misses, or
anyone else that might need something they didn’t know they did.”
“Hello, respectful town’s people. My name’s Tav and today my husband and I came to
your home looking for sale or trade of some goods. It would be my pleasure to show you
my wares, if you have coin.”
She proceded to open up her rucksack and put things on the bar. Some dried goods and
medicinal herbs a long with ointments made from clean fat and herbs wich were infused
with magic.
Then she said loudly, “Astarion, my love. Could you get the pelts from the pack in the
room, please? I forgot to bring them down. Thank you.”
He snapped out of his whirlwind thoughts, stood up, and headed upstairs. The town’s folk
turned to see him stand up, walk over, walk up, and disappear in seconds. There was a lotof dried gulps when they saw him, for his beauty was other worldly but his demeanor
made him look like he was the embodiment of “if looks could kill”.
It wasn’t long before he came downstairs with his hands full. He carried about 6 or 7
pelts, one of them the giant bear. He walked towards her, placed them on the nearest table
to her, kissed the top of her head, and walked back to the corner to possibly brood or
sulk. Whatever makes him happy, for sure.
Tav displayed her items rather proudly. She took joy in making them and was certain they
would be useful or even make folks share her joy in using them.
“How much for this?”
“Well, that depends, do you want a trade or use coin?”
“What do you take in trade?”
“Right now, the medicinal things, I’ll trade for food or soap.”
“Soap? Surely, you can make it? You made all this, I suppose.”
“Yes, but soap that smells nice takes longer and I don’t have that kind of time or
equipment. So, do we have a trade?”
“Let me go to my home and get some soap. Can you hold on to these two jars of
ointment? My mother likes these ingredients for her worn hands.”
“Of course, let me put these to the side.”
And off went her first potential customer, a rather young man with freckles and red hair.
Then the inn-keeper began,” A bear?! Could this be used as a rug?”
“A rug, a pelt, a dress, a cape, or just for décor. Who am I to judge your good
judgment?”, Tav laghed.
He saw the size of the woman in front of him and the thougth of haggling went out the
window. If she took down such prey, he dind’t want to think of what she’d do to a
haggler. Or what her husband would do either. That one looked more like an assassin
than her.“200 gold? Do you think that’s a fair price?”
Tav gave a dry gulp. She was charming, but she was horrible putting price on things. 200
was a lot for her, but she had learend to not go lower.
“Um… 200 gold. . .”
“Okay, 300 gold, I can go no higher.”
“The bear goes to this fine young man at 300 gold.”
He blushed at the mention of “young man” for he was clearly not even close to 30
anymore.
And like this they traded and bought with coin the things she wanted to sale. She thank
them and blessed them on their way with a smile.
Then she looked at back at the inn-keeper and asked him what she wanted the most.
“So, sorry to bother you again, but do you know of any carpenter in these parts? I’m
looking into buying a little push-cart, so we don’t have to carry so much on our backs.”
“What kind are you looking for, miss?”
“I suppose 4-wheels, that I can push myself. I am not looking to get an animal for it. But
large enough for my packs, a tent and my merchandice.”
“Well, if you don’t mind, but I might have something of interest out back.”
Her face lit up. Though Astarion wasn’t too happy. He could go with her to check it. But
he had to accept that she was just as dangerous as he was, so he just stayed put.
As Tav walked out, she squinted her eyes. She certainly didn’t miss the daylight and
surely at this hour. Perhaps it was around 1pm or 3pm, either way it was too bright and
hot and her eyes hurt.
“Over here, miss. This is it.”“It’s not much and she sure has been used, but I’m not using it. To be honest, it was my
wife’s, but she has recently changed hobbies and doesn’t care for it anymore.”, he said
with a booming laugh.
Tav inspected it, taking in consideration if she could fix it in case it broke down. It was
basically a bunch of branches held together with wishful thinking. She fell in love at first
sight. She knew Astarion would have it and was kind fo glad he couldn‘t be here with her
as she handed over the gold for it. She laughed. It was a done deal.
They both walk inside all smiles and laughter. Astarion saw them, saw her. She too had that
mischievous laughter herself. But he couldn’t reach the door at this time. He’d have to wait a little
longer. He was getting even more worried. Especially since stayed at the bar.
“Pardon, but you mentioned before you offer food? Is that option still available?
“Yes, miss. Here is the menu. What would you like to order?”
“Let me see-… I will start with-…”
So, she order her several dishes and drinks along with food for the road. She usually went with her
classics, bread, dried meat, and cheese and one or two bottles of wine. She was not a fan of it, but
Astarion liked to drink it from time to time, so she didn’t mind it. But this time, because she was
celebrating her little push-cart, she asked for four bottles of wine.Then she headed back to Astarion’s table and sat down. She was quite merry for things went pretty well
for her. Astarion wasn’t sure how to start the convesation. He felt nervous and unsure how to start.
Should he aske her about the husband part or the part she was baren? Was she being honest? So, he just
smiled and watched her in silence. She was hungry, so wasn’t paying too much attention to his
broodiness. Besides, he usually was a little sour when he had to be surround by people. She focused her
attantion on the waitress that was to bring her food. Tav was getting impatien, but happy when it came
to her food. She enjoyed her little creature comforts a little too much at times.
Her first plate arrived, she put her hands together, bowed her head, gave thanks by blessing those
whose hands prepared the meal, those who worked the land to obtain the food, and the food itself for
being willing to be part of her essesnce. She even blessed the fact that it would become part of
Astarion. Her devotion to him was everywhere and that made him even more anxious.
Blessed be the hands that worked the land to grow and tend to the plants
and animals for this meal. Blessed be the hands that worked their magic to
make this meal. Blessed be this meal that will provide me the energry to
share my life essesnce with the one. And blessed be the one who will
accept thy life source to cleanse his essence with this light. So mote it be.
Sometimes it felt a little too much for him. Perhaps he gave his answer too quickly back at the inn at
Baldur’s, but he felt so sure back then. And now, was he having second thoughts?
Now, she’s eating like nothing happened and I’m here. Should I bring it up? Does she want to marry
me? Kids? If I needed to breathe, I’d be having issues with that right about now. Gods! I don’t want to
lose her, but what if there is someone better out there and I’m here wasting her time? She deserves it all
and I’m here taking it. What if-…
His thoughts were interrupted by a little foot finding his knee under the table. It was Tav. She was
happily eating her meal with a smile while her legs were outstretched and it seemed she had removed
her boots to touch him. Once again, here he was taking her attention.
“Tav?”, he asked with a worried face that he couldn’t hide.She finally noticed. She saw his face of worry and she sat up straight. Then gulped down what was in
her mouth.
“What’s wrong my love? Talk to me. You’re making me worry. What happened?”
She quickly stood up and went to his side and hugged him while he remained sitting. She held him
there while caressing his scalp.
“What’s wrong Astarion? What happened? Talk to me, baby? What’s going on?”
He didn’t know what to say. Everything was just stuck in his chest and his throat. And her reaction
wasn’t what he expected. Why couldn’t she be colder towards him? Why didn’t she just answer coldly
and with disdain? Why did she ran over to hold him in a loving embrace? What had he done to deserve
it?
She took her hands and held his face and pulled him to look at her. She had to see him, see through him
to find out what was happening with him. She saw his sadness and it confused her and scared her. What
did she do? Was it something she said? But she didn’t say anyting, did she? She’d been pulling things
out of her ass to sell and it worked. Whast it that? What the hell did she before? She couldn’t
remember.
My love! What’s wrong?! I don’t like those eyes when they are sad. Why
can’t I rememer what I said before? Is it the food? Is it the noise? Does he
want to go now? Did someone contact us via the stone? But I have it as a
necklace. So, it can’t be that. Dammit Astarion, talk to me!
“I will wait for you in the room upstairs.”, he managed to whisper. Then stood up and left.
She was worried. She asked the inn-keeper if he had a little container or anything to put her remaining
food away. It was likely they were ready to head out soon. The man oblidged and gave her partchment
paper and a small wooden tray. She packed her food, and did a little incantation to keep the food for
sometime. Though she was worried, she wasn’t about to waste it. You never waste food. You neverdeny food or water to those who ask. And you are thankful for what you get. At least, that’s what she
had learned in her solitude during her younger years.
She headed upstairs with her little try of uneaten food, reached the door, and openened it. She saw
Astarion was sitting on the bed with his head down. He looked defeated and she had no idea how we
got to this point.
She placed her tray on the table and turned to stand in front of him. He grabbed her waist and hugged
her. She hugged his neck and head, too. She was unsure what was going on, but her heart felt heavy.
This wasn’t hers, though. It was his.
“Talk to me Astarion. Please my love. What ever is the matter?”
“I don’t-… I-…”
He looked up at her, unable to find the words to express his frustration, and fear about her. He had felt
so useless and undeserving of her earlier, it was driving him mad. All his emotions about her and about
things around her were bubbling up and he felt weak.
“My love, perhaps breathe? Copy my breathing. I might help? I cannot let you go outside, yet. It is still
too bright out, so you’ll just have to make do with what we can.”
He squeezed her tighter. He was trying his hardest to not cry, but he was losing.
“Astarion, you can pretend nothing is wrong, but I know you are lying. I can’t read your mind, but I
swear I’ll figure it out if that’s what it takes.”
He pressed his face to her stomach and she could feel the wetness on her shirt. She knew what was
happening just barely, but she didn’t know what to do. Then he finally spoke.
“Why-… me?”
“Why you what?”
“Why are you with me? Why didn’t you marry someone who could give you children? Why would you
choose a vampire time and time again? Why-…?He finally wept.
“This again? Astarion, what am I going to do with you, beloved? Just because. Because, I’m stubborn.
What does it matter? I’m here. You’re stuck with me.”
He kept looking at her with the same sad eyes. Then it dawn on her, she finally remembered the earlier
interactions and some of the things she said were the culprits for this now.
“Oh, fuck me-… I didn’t mean-… I mean-…”
She sighed. She motioned him to let her go so she could sit on the chair.
“Did my lies get you hot and bothered, Astarion? That’s what they were. And they worked. Don’t take
them personally-… I mean, what’s really the problem? I know you enough to know that my words
were just a catalyst to something that’s really eating at you. I can’t help unless you let me in, my love.
Let me in.”
A tear rolled down her cheek as she looked at him with saddened eyes.
Gods dammit, Astarion! Get it together! Just tell her! But, why is it so
difficult?
“Tav. It’s just that-… When you were talking with those people, you-…”
“Did you doubt my words? Is it because I called you my husband? Astarion, out of all things holly, my
love! Look, I know it’s not something we’ve discussed. And I honestly don’t mind. I mean, I never
expected you to want to marry or anything like that. And what we have seems to be working, so why
rock the boat? You know. Besides, I raise less suspicion as a woman travelling with a freaking divine
god made flesh. That and why do you keep questioning my choices? I find it hurtful that you keep
judging me for choosing you. No, I don’t see you as the sorry sack of shit you think you are and I will
never see you that way. I chose you because I wanted to choose you. I want to be with you and I am
selfish for my choice. I want you and you alone. And I don’t care if you don’t understand my reasons as
to why you. You are not supposed to understand my why. I only beg you to let me love you without
questioning my reasons every fucken day! I chose to love you out of my own free will. I will the naturethat surrounds me and I will my heart to let me chose and if that means to choose an undead then for all
that is holly and unholly, I will always choose you, Astarion. Why can’t you just accept that? Accept
me? Am I so wrong? Am I so unworthy of you that you need to question my resolve everyday?
“Tav, it’s just that-…”
“No, Astarion, it’s just that fucken nothing! I know missery loves company, but for fuck’s sake! Why
are you so intent in staying his?! I can’t fight the dead when you refuse to accept that you are doing all
in your power to stay his! I can’t fight him. He’s dead, he’s gone! But unless you accept that, he’s still
controlling you, I can’t fight him. In to the fire I swallowed his hate, but my love unless you let me in, I
can’t win and neither can you.”
What?! But-… this is about-… my god! She’s right.
“Astarion, for over 200 hundred years, you were broken, maimed, abused. I know that you don’t know
what love is. I know that you don’t understand what that means. But I beg you to do something if not
for you, then please do it for me. At least try, please. I need you to pay attention around you. I need you
to focus. I need you to learn about love.”
“What? Learn about love? But how?”
“Love is an energy that is all around us. Sometimes you can love and other times you can be in love.
They are not the same. To be in love feels like a fire. It’s a pull that you feel for another. Like your
broken pieces were broken in order to let the other enter and stay. They won’t heal your broken, the
broken parts will always be there, but your beloved fits right in, inside those spaces that would have
been empty without them. Like you want to possess them or consume them and you and they feel the
same. Like you were born broken in half and like this, you can get back together and become the one
you were supposed to me. That’s what you feel like to me. I can’t explain it other than my love is
selfish. I want you. I need you. I choose you every morning and every night. It’s always you. For many
reasons and for no reason at all. I just do. And I can’t explain why I am in love with you for I don’t
know myself. You aren’t easy to love, Astarion. You are a broken man that is just barely learning how
to be yourself. That’s why I asked you to really think about it back at Baldur’s Gate. I told you to take
your time before you gave me an answer. Now, my need for you has grown so much, I don’t know if I
will be able to go back to just being friends. I don’t want to just be your friend. I want to be that and
more. But I need you to start your journey to understand love. Love doesn’t mean you find someoneyou pefer to fuck. No, love is simple. Love is kind. Doing little things and big things can be acts of
love. Kissing on the cheek, giving a blessing, buying something just because you want to, that can be
love. I need you to pay attention and learn from those around us. Learn how to love, Astarion. Please.
Learn from me. Learn from others, but learn. Please, perhaps like this you can one day let me love you
the way that I can.”
“Tav-… But I don’t-… But-.. It’s just that I can’t give you children! I can’t even offer you a stable
home?! I have nothing to offer you. Nothing! And I hate that! I have no money, just a pack of clothes
and a bag with some gold. That’s not even enough to buy you a house to keep you safe! What kind of
man wishes to mary a woman that’s magic and then has her sleeping on the ground?! I have nothing to
give you. I just take and take and you keep giving like it’s nothing. I-… I hate that. You deserve the
world and more, and I-… I’m just here-… being a burden to you. You fixed the tent so in case of
emergencies, I remain safe, you burn the carcases to avoid detection of the Gur hunters, you sell the
pelts, you even use yourself as a vessel to cleanse my necrotic rot! Why are you so good to me? I’m not
easy to love, and yet from nowhere you came and stayed. You trusted me even when my intention was
to use you. And, I don’t know what to do? Then we are heading to a dangerous place because you want
to give my kind the same chance you gave me! Woman, have you got any ounce of self preservation?”
It wasn’t everything that was eating at him, but that was a start.
“First of all, children? You’ve never even mentioned that. Is that why you’ve been-… coming inside
me?! Astarion, you can’t do that! Not like that. We’re going on a difficult mission. I can’t be worried
about having kids. Don’t get me wrong. I have no idea if I even can. My fat-… that man, he fed me
things when I was 13. I don’t know if they wrecked havoc. I don’t know if I can even carry, but believe
me that if I could, I want you to be the father.”
He looked at her with surprise.
She doesn’t know. Perhaps we’re both baren. Oh, gods! How cruel can
this life be?
“Secondly, neither do I, you idiot! I have no land to claim. I was banished and even if I hadn’t been, I’d
still have nothing to my name. We’re the same. What we’ve got here is all that we can give. I got about1000 gold now and that’s just today. You’ve got a little more than me. Thirdly, a house? Seriously? I’m
basically a fucken bog witch! I’ve lived alone in the woods. I’m nothing more than a whisper to idiot
hunters in the woods. If anything, I have more possessions now and our tent which to me is our home
with you than I every did”
He gave her a half smile.
“And fourthly the reason I do all the extra work is because I’ve always done it for myself! I’m a ranger
but I also had to live in the dangers of the forests alone as a woman! I cannot leave a trace of anything
lest I am found by men. A lot of men together can be dangerous to any woman, especially if this said
woman lives in the woods without a clan. My act of love toward myself simply expanded to include
you. That’s my love language. I do things because my love is selfish! I get joy from lightening your
burden. I get joy from seeing you happy and smiling. I get joy from knowing that I did something to
help you. I do it because I love you and because I love myself. That’s why I need you to learn about
love.”
He stood up and walked towards her. He wanted to hug her, but she swatted his hand.
“No! No hug for you. I’m really mad at you right now. But, you will not be free of me. Now I will stay
with you if only to spite you. You want to wallow in your fucken misery like you did for him, fine. Be
miserable, but know this Astarion, I will not go. You can’t get rid of me just because you are caught in
your feelings of misery. I will be miserable right along with you, so move over Mr. Miserable because
your fake wife, Mrs. Miserable, will out do you in your self-serving pity party.”, she said as she pointed
her index finger at him.
He had never seen her this angry, but he deserved it. He made up scenarios in his head because of
Cazador’s shadow. He made sure Astarion and the others know they were nothing and they believed
him. And now this woman was a willing participant to give him all that Cazador told he would never
have nor deserve.
Astarion went back to sit on the side of the bed, looking at the floor. He felt he made a mess of things
and now she was mad at him. Perhaps, it would not last long.“And one more thing, Mr! We are taking a shower once the sun goes down before we leave. I bought
my little cart, you will push it or pull it when I get tired! That’ll teach you for interrupting my meal!
Gods! When do I interrupt with your food-… idiot”
He couldn’t help but laugh. She was in a worse sourn mood because she was still hungry. He had feed
on her right when they arrived at the inn and he got in his sour state right about when she was about to
start eating. She’d probably even have a heachache.
“Tav, do you have a headache?”
“Tav, do you have a potato for a husband? What do you think?!”, she said in annoyance.
He laughed lightly then stood up and walked towards her. He then placed his hands on her temples. The
coolness of his skin worked wonders whenever she had a headache. He stayed there as she ate. While
he was like this he remembered when she suggested to modify the tents to make one sun-safe or sunproof.
“Hey, so if we’re not going to be using my tent anymore, let’s work some magic.”
“What ever do you mean, dear?”
“So, yesterday we kinda, sorta saw the path we’re taking to reach the grove. And I saw that if we try to
keep to the forests and trees, we’ll take longer. I get anxious just thinking that we’re taking longer to
get to the babes.”
“The babes? You meant the spawns? Seriously, woman, but I’ll humor you. What have you got in
mind?”
“Well, I was thinking, I’ve got my extra pelts, and my tent and my idea is to combine yours and mine to
make it very sturdy. My tent can be the the inside layer, then in the middle I can use the pelts to make
them leather, finally the outside layer. That’s three.”
“Why the leather?”
“That’s where the magic lies. You will help with that. You will help embroidering some-… a lot of
glyphs that will create the protective barrier.”
“What kind of glyphs? I am not a magic “doer”. So, how do you intend on achieve this? Gale isn’t even
here?”
“Look, I love Gale to bits and pieces, but I can do some stuff, too. It will work. I’ve done it, but at a
smaller scale.”“I’m not so sure about this, but fine. It’s not like we have a lot of work anyway.”
So, they detoured and stayed in the Wood of Sharp Teeth in order to get materials and shade as they
worked on their special tent. First, Astarion needed to draw some warding glyphs on the outer canvas
layer and then with a knife he scratched the same on the leather layer. Then he added Selune’s Crescent
on several areas of both the outer layer and middle layer along with runes of warding. On the inside
layer he drew the symbol of the Moonmaiden. All of this from a book with clippings and parchment
from other sources. It was as if Tav would take bits and pieces of things every time she went to a town.
When she handed him her book of “notes”, he gave her a look. She explained that she didn’t steal the
things, she simply stayed long enough to copy things that were interesting or that seemed important.
Then he noticed she had no boots on. She was covered in mud and grass stains and even had some
twigs and tree pollen in her hair. She was a sight, but he let her work.
She moved back and forth gathering a pile of items. She had bee’s wax and fat in a little pot. She had
procured some thick branches wich would be the stakes and some thinner twigs and twine along with
some vynes. She had a knife and was already buidling a fire.
As they both worked, they would occasionaly look at each other and smile. They mostly spoke when
Astarion needed more thread to continue his part. She had quite a bit, but considered that he should
start with the leather layer first in case they had to switch to grass fibers to finish. The canvas would
have been easier to work the grass fibers in in case needed.
All in all, they made copies of symbols and then Tav went to his work and added some from nowhere
but herself. She was very concentrated on these ones. Then she simply said “it felt right to add that one
there” or “I think that can help.” Either way, they were added to each of the layers. They worked hard
on all parts. Even the stakes were engraved and marked with holding wards.
Astarion had not noticed it at first, but then he realised that what he was hearing wasn’t the wind in the
trees, it was her. She had been whispering incantations left and right as she carved, drew, and burned.
She sometimes would put her hands over something and whisper several things.Even when she was water proofing the outer layer with wax, she drew on the sygils with wax first and
then painted them over with the rest of the wax. Everything smelled like the forest after the rain.
Once they finished with their work, she was spent and so was he. She ate some forest berries and went
to sleep. He decided to get some small game for the time being.
It took them 2 full days to finish it, but then they had to test it out. The following morning she set out to
put up the tent outside the forest. The sun was not out yet, so Astarion helped, but she rushed him. She
was more nervous than he was. She had the canvas Gale had enchanted before he left Baldur’s Gate
that was intended for emergencies. So, they stepped inside, but she didn’t let go of her emergency
blanket in case Astarion got burnt by accident.
They waited inside. It was cool to be inthere. She wanted to make sure it was fine, so she pinned the
“emergency blanket” to the entrance flap of the tent and wiggled her way just enough to get outside.
And she shouted.
“It’s sun out! You’re safe! It worked!”
He laughed so hard inside that he dropped to the floor. This mad woman had succeeded in making it
safe for him. That would surely quicken their pace if they didn’t have to keep to the woods.
Now, back in the room at the inn, he came back to the present. Tav was still eating her meal, but now
she was wiggling a little. She tended to do that when she enjoyed her food and drink.
“Tav?”
“No, shush it. I’m eating.”
“I’m sorry.”
“No, shus it. Not ready to not be mad. Shush it. Let me pretend to be mad a little longer. Like that
you’ll knock it the fuck off, young man.”
“I’m over 200 years old.”
“No, you were taken at 39. You’ve just stuck around. I’m a year older and that counts. Shush it, young
man.”He laughed and started to walk back to the bed.
“Nope. Get back to your spot. You wanted to feel miserable, then let’s. Touch my head. Go ahead.
Touch, touch. When I finish my meal, you’re free.”
She proceded to take her sweet time finishing the last piece she had. He didn’t mind. He was glad they
were in a better mood now. But she was right about him, he had been choosing to be miserable despite
her efforts and he felt wrong for that.
He wanted to find a ring without her knowing, but that would be challenging. Perhaps they could find
some ruins or something for him to stay away from the sunlight but still hide his surprise.
“Okay, I’m finished. I’m taking a nap.”
“Sleep well, my love. I promise I will pay more attention.”
“Shush it or you’ll scare of my naps”
Either way, she leaned in to kiss him on the lips and crawled over to the other side of the bed. As soon
as her head hit the pillow, she was out cold.
Astarion stood up, took his coin purse from his pack and the rest of his “safety geart” which he had to
rummage through his pack to recover. His friends had gifted these items to protect him from the sun.
He was grateful for this. Then he stepped out of the room.Chapter 11
With this ring, I thee wed?
He was a sight to behold, with his gear, but it couldn‘t be helped. The tarp that Tav used back at
Baldur’s Gate which she used to cover him under the cart was now charmed with Gale’s help. She had
asked Gale to enchant it for emergency sake. After they finished the tent, she decided it would be better
to fashion it into a hooded cloack instead, now that the tent was safe. She even dyed it a deep green and
waterproofed it with bee’s wax. She said, “Now it can work to keep you sun-proof or dry.”
He donned some special glasses with darkened glass. These were procured by Karlach when they were
looting it. She figured they would be better kept by Astarion than to leave them there to burn. Wyll did
the same. He found found gloves in some chest and thought they fit Astarion’s style. Gale checked the
items and determined they were enchanted so the wearer could walk in direct sunlight for a very short
while.
He made sure as much of his body was covered to keep him safe for he was about to do something very
stupid and without telling Tav. She was still asleep in bed and didn’t stir when he kissed her on the
forehead before heading out.
As he walked down the stairs, he caught the eye of the inn-keeper. The poor man gave dry gulp once he
realized that mysterious tall figure was walking towards him. His only thought was that if the other one
was with this one, this one might not be that bad, or dangerous.
“Good afternoon. You seemed to have provide usefl help to my wife earlier. I was wondering if you’d
extend the favor to me?”, Astarion said with his best velvety voice.
The man was a bit shocked to have this otherwordly man speak to him, but to have him also have a
voice that matches his face was a bit too much. He felt his throat dry in seconds. Astarion knew the
type of reaction he was having on this man, and he relished it. He still had his charms after all.“Y-… y-… Yes, certainly. How-… What can I do for you, Mr-… ?”
“Ancunin. Mr. Ancunin. Well, you see, I am looking for directions to the best spots for trade, in
particular where metals and gems can be bought, sold, or traded.”
“W-… well, we have the high district. There you’ll find the best jewelers here in Elturel, b-.. but it is
patrolled by the Kings Guard, so. . .”
Astarion raised an eyebrows in surprise and interest. His bright ruby eyes almost gleaming in the dim
lighting of the tavern’s bar.
Giving him a knowing nod, Astarion continued, “ Clever man. But I thank you for the warning. I’d
figured as much. Well, what would be the opposite side of that mess. I am not looking for trouble if I
can help it.”
“Well, we have the docks. Everyone who isn’t high born goes there. From tieflings, to traders, and
everything in between. You could even sell your soul to the highest bidder before a paladin finds out.”
The man surprised himself with how much truth he was revealing. He didn’t know it, but this was
mostly because a vampire was charming the information out of him. Lucky for him, this one had
already eaten hours earlier and the inn-keeper knew it.
“Well, I thank you for your honest help, young man.”, Astarion wiked while pushing a gold coin
towards the very confused, yet somewhat scared man.
Astarion then put on his gloves and dark glasses, put the hood up, took a breath, and opened the door.
He was nervous of the outcome, but he was determined to go outside. After all, he did need a bit of
fresh air after his previous outburst.
He wasn’t aware of it yet, but that woman from before really did a number on him. She hit him where it
hurts, his pride. Despite the woman’s intention to hurt Tav for no real reason, she ended up getting
under his skin, instead. She questioned his ability to impregnate his wife and provide a safe home. Two
things that he couldn’t do no matter how much coin he could have, which right now wasn’t much. He
was surely determined to “shut her up” one day, though. He may not be able to give Tav a child, but he
will give her a castle, or perhaps a cottage. His “bog witch” will probably not be interested in a giantpalace with an even larger service crew to maintain it. But she would like something more discrete
inside or near a forest.
As he stepped out of the inn, he tood cautious steps toward the street, checking his pain levels on his
skin. As long as he felt nothing, the protection was holding up, but we wasn’t about to push his luck.
He would move in the sunlight towards the shadows provided by the tall stone buildings and many
alley ways. He felt lucky for that.
As he walked, he saw a man pushing a cart and got his attetion. He still needed the direction towards
the docks. He sort of smelled it from his current place, but he wanted to make sure. Mistakes and
getting lost were not an option, especially in this city. At Baldur’s, he would likely be left alone, but he
knew that this city was “too righteous for its own good” and wasn’t in the mood for taking on some
religious freaks for the sake of being a vampire.
The man pointed in the right direction, though he gave him an odd look. This tall man with velvety
voice was a sight to behold; he looked ready to move in the shadows of a forest during heavy rain. The
confused man simply thought it might be a ranger or druid lost.
Astarion paid no mind and moved swiftly in the direction heading west, towards the docks. As he
moved from shadow to shadow and occasional brigth light spot, he was caught in his thoughts again.
He was replaying the conversations he’s recently had with Tav. He had the feeling when she woke up,
all would be forgiven or at least forgotten, but he wanted to avoid the same rock twice. He didn’t want
to find out just how much patience she had with him. He didn’t want to test it and find out she’s run
out.
He moved like a shadow and was mostly ignored the more he neared his destination. But his thoughts
were still swirling.
I would have never imagined she feels like she’s fighting Cazador, too.
But, she’s right. He did such a number on me, that even now despite her
best efforts, I can’t let go of what he taugh me. A whole lifetime of being
called unfitting, unwanted, and unworthy can’t be erased in a couple of
days, but I didn’t realize I wasn’t putting my best effort. Gods! She’s beenputting in the work for both of us and not once has she reproached me
about it, and what do I do? I do it for her. Idiot!
He turned at one alley and saw a group of Kings Guard with ther armor shiny and clean. He simply
hurried to the next one, luckily it was empty and walked faster until the end of it. As he reached the
end, he saw that the next area he must pass had very little cover. He’d have to focus here to not linger
for too long. Gale said he’s probably good for 5 minutes at most, but today wasn’t a day to test out
theories.
Astarion saw a horse cart moving along the direction he needed and this provided enough shade if he
could catch it in time. He had to run just enough and keep up the pace. He managed to get next to it and
kept moving. He was still safe for now. Fortunately, the sun was going down, so the sun was no longer
right above him.
Then he saw his objective, the river and the little shops, carts, and caravan. Many of them had put up
shades for the comfort of the patrons. The smell of folks, the food, the sweat, the fish, all of it was a bit
overwhelming, but he had his goal. He will get that ring and one for himself while he’s at it.
But what is love? I’ve never had a reason to ask myself that, but she’s
certain that I can learn. I swear she trusts me too much. Though, I’m
lucky and grateful she does. After all, she was my first-… like I was her
first. A blessing for both, indeed. Gifts? Is that love? Buying her things?
No, that can’t be right. She doesn’t need much of anything that she hasn’t
already got. Hells, that woman is capable of living in the woods all her
life and never enter a city, so buying her anyting isn’t even something she
requires. So, what does she mean by buying something just because?
Holding the door open? A kiss on the cheek?
As he entered the shade of the makeshift market place, he decided it was best to not
remove his dark-glasses or cloak. He was surely causing a reaction as he was now to add
to his situation. He definetly didn’t want to get the attetion of any pious guards which this
city was known for, especially after recent events.He saw different folks with little tables full of items for cooking, for cleaning, for gardening, etc. He
even saw the freckled young man with a “sick mother” now selling the items he traded with Tav for
soap. Astarion found it a bit commical and decided not to confront the lier. She had accepted the trade
as fair, so the boy was free to do what he willed with the items now.
He kept moving until he saw that at a boat there was a stall with some chains, decorative daggers, and
rings. He was worried about the water, but this was the first spot that had any sort of jewerly. So he
didn’t have much choice at the moment.
So far, what acts of love have I seen? Have I done? Is love a kindness?
Who has ever loved me that wasn’t her?!
As he was conflicted, he caught a glimpse of a mirror at a vendor’s stall. A small panic coursed through
him, for it could blow his cover, so he moved away quickly enough to not draw any attention to
himself. While moving, he finaly noticed his outfit. People mostly ignored him, so he was ignoring
himself, too, until the mirror. He began thinking about how people perseved him right now. Today was
a bright and sunny day, no clouds in sight. Then comes a tall figure dressed for heavy rain moving like
a shadow through the shadows. A curious sight indeed. But his clothes right now weren’t common,
even for him. His cloak was a gift from Gale and Tav. Then his dark glasses and gloves were provided
by the ‘devils’, other ‘monsters’ like himself. They had no reason to even bother. They could have kept
the items for themselves, but they didn’t. When had he ever given them anything other than some help
during battles?
Could it be-… that this is what she meant? They did this for me. This is
the very tarp she used as she ran after me when I lost the parasite. She
fixed the tent to be a save haven for me by taking her own belongings and
combining them with mine. After she was exhausted from using her own
essence, her magic, to keep me safe, she fashioned this cloak. She chooses
me day and night, despite not being easy to love-… Is that what she
means? Do I simply just do without expecting anything? But aren’t things
supposed to be transactional?. . . But what do I give her? What have I
given her other than my presence? She said she was selfish? How so?Every little thing she’s done for me was to keep me safe and happy?… It
makes her happy to serve.
He was so close to seeing her perspective.
Meanwhile as he was on his journey to his own thoughts, she was having nightmares about themselves.
After he left to go outside during the bright daylight, she began to see images of her beloved being
chased by paladins and gur. She couldn’t protect him in the shadows and he just ran while she was
useless. Then he had no choice but run into the light. She couldn’t reach him in time with her tarp. In
seconds, his flesh began to bubble and sizzle. Then small patches of fire started on different parts of his
body. By the time she arrived to his side, he had fallen to his knees as the fire consumed him. Her
screams of anguish were what woke her.
“Astarion!”
She woke up covered in sweat and disoriented. She looked around the small room and realized she was
alone. She called his name. Nothing. She decided to stand up and look outside the room. Nothing. She
headed back inside and looked for his gear. She was terrified that he had simple left without saying a
word. What this it? He finally broke and abandoned her like she feared?
Where have you gone, love? It’s still light out? Could it be-…? We-… You
can’t leave me like this, dammit! You just can’t-…
She tried her best to control her emotions but she felt like she was suffocating. She double checked and
his pack was still there, but his coin purse was gone. Her’s was still there, but-… Where was the cloak?
She looked through his pack to find the glasses and gloves. Those were gone, too. She needed to calm
down. She needed a clear head. So, she sat down, put her head between her legs and breathed. Inhale,
exhale, inhale, exhale. Then she sat up straight and continued her controlled breathing while keeping
her eyes shut. She didn’t want to cry and the lump in her throat made her very aware of her fears.
Though she wasn’t sure if it was because of her dream or because of the fight they had had earlier.
Either way, she needed to calm down before she made her next move. Minutes felt like eons for her
right now, but it couldn’t be helped. She had to calm down.Once she was steady, she put on her shoes and headed downstairs. He was impossible to miss, so
perhaps she might get some information. She felt like she was floating, barely existing. It was difficult
to keep a cool head, but she had to try.
“Hello again.”
“Hello, Miss. Are you looking for your husband?”
She was surprised which helped because it grounded her to the now.
“Uh, yes. I took a nap and just woke up.”
“Oh, well, he asked me about the shopping district. I told him he should try the docks. He left about an
hour or so ago. He was dressed for the heaviest rain, yet it’s the sunniest day we’ve had for weeks!”
The man still had a pretty happy disposition and didn’t push the obvious idea of the tall man he had
aided. Everyone knew they weren’t simply some travelling merchants. They had the vibe of what they
were, a vampire and if not a druid then certainly some type of forest witch who claimed she was a
ranger and merchant. The inn-keeper wasn’t about to question anything or anyone. He was just happy
making coin and that these two ‘randos’ would be out of his hair by the end of the day. Hopefully, they
would be gone way before any righteous nut job took notice and brought trouble to his business.
“Oh, that’s a first! He usually hates shopping. I’m the one that ends up going, but then again I am the
one selling my wares, so yeah. Well, I thank you, young man. I’ll just head back up and wait for him
then.”
The man thought it was curios how they kept calling him ‘young man’ for he was clearly older than
either of them, or was he? It didn’t matter. He had patrons to attend and his new bear on the wall was
causing quite a commotion still. He was already making stories about how it was aquired. No one
needed to know that Astarion had actually fed on it some days ago, and that Tav worked her magic to
release the lingering necrotic rot. Hell, she even left a strong blessing on it for good measure.
While walking back she felt how the tears streamed down her face. He wasn’t gone, but why did he go
to the market? What was going on? And at this time of day? Should she go find him? She worried that
if she did, he might take it the wrong way? He did fight her about her being so caring? Could he befeeling that he was not man enough to take care of himself? Was that it? Was she babying her man? So,
instead of spiraling like an idiot with questions she had no answers to, she did something better.
“Karlach? Can you hear me? It’s me, ri-… Tav.”
“Hello, Tav! What’s the news?!”
“I was just missing my sister. I miss you so much.”
“Oh, you’re just the sweetest, but-… wait a minute. You sound sad. What’s going on? Be honest.”
A male voice could be heard in the background getting closer.
“Is that Tav?”
“It sure is Wyll. But something’s wrong.”
“What?! What did he do?”
“I don’t know. She’s about to tell us.”
Tav gave a little laugh. She missed them both deeply and was sad she couldn’t go and help them over
there, but she had a job to do here, even if her feelings complicated things.
Tav: I’m fine. I swear. Well, fine enough.
Karlach: That doesn’t sound fine enough to me. Spill it out, will ya.
Wyll: Karlach’s right, Tav. You can trust us. We care as much for you as you do for us.
Tav wasn’t expecting her friends to read her so well and she cried a little while she tried to speak.
Tav: We had a stupid fight about Cazador-… again. And I’m afraid he will let that ghost win. I don’t
know what to do. I do nice things for him and he’s unsure about them, but I can’t do anything else. I
don’t know how. I don’t think I am his maid or servant. I do things for me, but now I just add him to
the mix. I mean nothing bad by it. I swear!
Wyll: Well, that does make it difficult. I mean, anyone else wouldn’t mind being taken care off like you
do. I sure miss your cooking and the little things.
Karlach: True. You were a riot and such a mom to us most of the time. I miss it. I mean, I am thankful
and all that, but you sure were always doing things to help all of us, not just him.Tav: I know! That’s what I was trying to tell him. I don’t do it because I will get something out of it.
Well, I do, but that’s just happiness. I felt happy to give things to my friends. I don’t have a lot of
money, so I couldn’t buy you blades, but I could buy flour and lard and I could pick berries. I made you
things that I know how, but this idiot cannot eat.
Both Wyll and Karlach laughed at this. For it was true, Tav did use food often for gifting, but Astarion
was the only one that ate Tav and not her food.
Wyll: I’m sorry, but he eats you instead.
Tav laughed, too. Her heart was starting to calm down and her mind, too.
Karlach: So, have you talked to him? I mean, do you know what’s going on in his head?
Tav: Not entirely. He said some things, I reacted and sent it right back. I was so mad, but not at him. I
know he’s hurting and that he is learning to be a person again. And I’m honored to be beside him in
this, but I lost my temper. I was tired, I was hungry, and I shouted at him. I told him I was still fighting
Cazador and that he wasn’t helping me fight him off.
Wyll: Ouch. Yeah, that-…
Tav: I know. I don’t know who hates that ghost more, but I lost it. And now he’s gone.
Karlach and Wyll: WHAT?!
Karlach: Where to? Did he just left whithout saying a word?!
Wyll: No wonder you’re in such a state. Oh, Astarion now you’ve done it!
Tav: No, well, I mean, yes, but not like that. I thought that too. The thing is that after we told each other
off, I went to sleep. I needed a nap. He left when I was sleeping. But I was woken up.
Karlach: What woke you up?
Tav exhaled. Her heart was still not over the nightmare she just had.
Tav: I was dreaming that he was being chased through alley ways and that I couldn’t reach him. Then
he was chased out into the open street in broad daylight. And he burst into flames. By the time I got to
him, I was too late. He was nothing but ashes.
Wyll and Karlach: Shit!Wyll: No wonder you’re in that state. It wasn’t directly Astarion, but surely one of your biggest fears.
Tav: Exactly. I spoke with the inn-keeper downstairs and he told me Astarion had asked about the
market.
Karlach: That’s strange. He was never the type to go anywhere unless is was a bar or a brothel. But to
the market, alone? It’s not him. This does paint a better picture.
Tav: I know. That’s why I am trying my best to calm down. He never made a mention of wanting to go
to the market either. We arrived before sun up today, and not once did he say he wanted to go check it
out or anything like that.
As she spoke with her friends, she added more distractions to her mind. She took the opportunity to
groom herselft. She wasn’t sure when she’d be able to have a calm moment to cut her nails and do
other little things. So, she found her nail clippers and began to cut. Besides, she had turend her stone
into a necklace, so she was hands free.
Wyll: Well, I hope he wore his sunglasses and the gloves I have him.
Karlach: Yeah, or he will be in big trouble. I don’t even want to think of it and I dind’t have the
nightmare.
Wyll: I agree. So, Tav did you check for his things? Are they still there?
Tav: They are. His pack is here. He took his coin purse and all the gear to protect him from the sun, but
I’m still worried. This town is nice and all, but-…
Karlach: Where are you guys now?
Tav: Elturel.
Wyll: WHAT?! ELTUREL! Oh, Tav, you guys have to be very careful.
Tav: Why do you think I’m such a mess? The inn we’re staying at right now is right on the edge. They
know we shouldn’t be here, but gold does wonders. But, now he’s out there in some market doing I
don’t know.
Karlach: Oh, Tavy. I’m sure he’ll come back once he’s done what he got in his crazy little white head
of his.
Tav: I sure hope so, or I will burn this whole place down myself. I will finish what was started if I see
one spec of singed cloth.
Wyll: Now, now. Let’s calm down. I’m sure that won’t be necessary. I bet he’ll be perfectly fine. Just be
a little more patient.Tav: You’re right, Wyll. Thank you. Well, my loves. I need to leave you now. I have to use the restroom
and it’s outback of this building. I love you guys to bits and pieces.
Wyll: We love you, too, Tav.
Karlach: Oh, Tavy! I love you to the moon and back. Chin up, eh. Keep it together, soldier.
Tav: I will do that. Thanks. Talk later. Bye.
Karlach and Wyll: Bye, Tav.
Tav dried her tears then walked to the wash basin for some water to wash her face. She grabbed the
washcloth they had used and thought about it. She instead hugged it and placed it down and instead
used the clean one. She headed out down the stairs and nodded to the “young man” before stepping out.
As she went outside to use the restroom, she met with some Companion paladin coming right next to
the building. Her stomach tightened. She felt the sort of danger this lot caused to those they didn’t
deemed worthy, and she was most likey in that mixed group. Her face hardened to match theirs. Never
had she felt taller than Astarion. She felt like a tight spring about to release, but she wouldn’t. Or better
yet, she couldn’t, not now at least. She had a vampire spawn to protect and they weren’t attacking
either, at least yet.
The saw her with a face of disgust. Perhaps they smelled her scent, forest with undead. Or perhaps the
fact that she wasn’t high born. She walked proud right beside them about to enter the little cabin with
the restrooms and showers. That’s when one of them called her.
“Hey, you! Wood-elf!”
It took all her power not to shoot a needle at him. She took a deep breath and turned on her charm, or at
least what she could manage for charm.
“Yes, child. How may I help you?”
He was taken aback and reached for his sword. She looked at him defiantly. She didn’t need to reach
for anything. The needle was already in her hand. It would be lodged in his neck before they knew
what happened and she’d be gone. But the other guard stopped him and spoke next.
“You people better watch yourselves. Step one toe out of line and you’ll be in trouble.”“Well, I’ll mind my manners as I take a shit, young friend. May I? Or do you need my assisstance for
more show?”
“No, carry on. But, we’ll be watching.”
“I sure hope not, but then again, the divine loves to see wood-elves take a shit here. I’ll keep it in mind.
Have the day you deserve, gentlemen. Now, if you’ll excuse me. I really must go.”
The third guard couldn’t help but laugh. A short wood-elf had just told them off for keeping her from
using the toilet. And all of this because their jumpy-er companion couldn’t do his job properly and
loved pestering visitors. They then just kept walking.
She finally breathed as they left. They put her in a jumpy mood, but she had to keep her head cool.
Astarion wasn’t back just yet.
By now Astarion had been to the little boat with some jewelry, but wasn’t convinced. He’d been to a
second one and though they also had a good variety of items, nothing caught his eye. So he kept
moving. The sun was now beginning too turn orange. That was her favorite color, he recalled. She just
said one day that it made her happy.
Mmm… I think I should get her something extra, too. I don’t think it’s the
right time to propose, not after today’s fight. I’ll just keep a look out for
something that she might like. Oh, there!
He moved to a little stall where a tiefling couple was selling their wares and an orange something
caught his attention. Once he arrived he saw that the orange thing he saw was actually a little pumpking
plushy with an embroidered face; two large round eyes and a large toothy grin. Also, beside it was an
owl-bear cub plushy. He was certain that she would love those. But then, the little box near them
caught his eye, too.
“Excuse me, I’m interested in the children’s toys you’ve got there.”
The tieflings who had been chatting were startled by this tall figure covered from head to toe.
“Pardon? The children’s toys? Are you sure? I mean, really? You don’t look the type-…”His partner, the female hit him on the ribs with her elbow to shut him up. Astarion waited patiently, he
didn’t want to cause a scene. Fortunately, the woman took over the conversation.
“Excuse my husband. He didn’t mean anything by it. The toys are 5 sp a piece, but if you’re interested
in both, I’ll take 8 sp for both.”
“Mm, seems fair. Very well. I’ll take them. I’m sure my girlfriend will love having them on her bed.”
The tiefling man raised his eyebrows. He was surprised that this mysterious stranger had a girlfriend
and just bought two children’s toys. But, he was smart enough to keep his mouth shut this time.
Then Astarion looked at the woman, tilting himself just enough so he could see her with his eyes, right
above his glasses. She gave a little jolt, but tried to remain calm.
“By the way, I’ve been looking for a jeweler or any place to buy a ring or set of rings. Would you
happen to sell or know of a place where to-…”
“Oh! You want your girlfriend to be your wife! How wonderful!”, the woman exclaimed with
happiness.
Now it was him who was startled. He was sure these folks saw the monster in him. Surely, he wasn’t
marriage material, but despite his current garb.
“Well, if you must know, yes. I am planning on proposing-… soon.”
Now the man spoke. Well, that little blue box has a set of rings. They are a matching set. Perhaps that
could interest you?”, he said a little nervously.
Astarion took the box from the table and opened the box.He saw two rings, they were silver and black in color. The band for the female was not too intricate nor
very plain. It had a design that reminded him of vynes, but there was an onyx gemstone right in the
middle and it was big. On the side of the onyx there were two small red rubies, one on each side. As for
the male’s ring there was a bit more of an intricate desing. It had an inlay that was meant to mimic a
shooting star. Where the star was, there was a champagne color moissanite.
He tried on the man’s band on his ring finger and what do you know. It fits. Then he tried on the
woman’s band on his pinky finger. There was a moment he remembered when Tav grabbed his hand to
measure their hands. He thought she was just finding an excuse to touch him, but luckily, it gave him
her ring size. It fit, too.
“Oh, will you look at that.”
As he returned the rings back into the box, he finally paid attention to the top of the little blue box.
There was an owl etched into it and on the side of it you had a repeated pattern of Selune’s symbol.
Astarion rolled his eyes in annoyance, because he was too stubborn to accept this was meant for him.
“Seriously?! Fine. I’ll take the bait.”
He turned to look at the merchants.
“And what about this box with rings?”
“That’s a set. They go together.”
“Of course, they go together. I’m asking how much for both and the box.”
He was starting to get annoyed, but was trying his best to keep his cool.
“They are 20 gp each so that makes 40 gp. I’ll through in the box for free.”
“So, 40 gp for the box of rings and 8 sp for the toys. That makes-…”
He decided to not bother with the money. He just took 50 gp and handed it over to the woman.
“Keep the change. And if anyone asks, you never saw me.”“What?! Oh, thank you sir. May many blessings reach you and your soon-to-be wife.”, said the woman
as her husband handed Astarion a paper bag with the two toys. Astaroin had already stached the box
inside his pant’s pocket. He thanked them and left.
I’m starting to suspect interference here. But, I still need to go to one
more spot.
He went back to the first jeweler, the one in the boat. He had seen that this one had some
tools to engrave rings. He reached this one while taking care of not standing in front of
the mirror. He was almost done with his quest and didn’t want to ruin it by causing a stir.
So far the pious ones were none the wiser about the presence of a vampire in their
beloved city and he wanted to keep it that way.
“Hello again. I was wondering if you offer engravings?”
The man looked up from his book. His eyebrows raised in surprise, for he was sure he wouldn’t see this
one mysterious stranger again, yet here he was.
“You found something you like after all. Well, I charge 5 gp per phrase of 3 to 5 words. Had you
bought it from me, I offered discounts.”
“Not an issue. Your price seems fair. I’ve got two rings I’d like engraved.”
“Very well, hand them over.”
“First, I want this one to say ‘I chose you.’”, he said as he handed the man’s wedding band.
The half-elf jeweler took it with care and examined it.
“Mh, lucky man, you are. There’s seems to be something special about this one.”
As he handed the jeweler the box with the woman’s righ he said, “So it seems. The second one will say
‘You saved me.’”
As the jeweler saw the box, he understood. He take extra care while engraving both rings in delicate
Esprurar script. He did’t ask Astarion, but he took and educated guess. And Astarion didn’t bother in
specifying anything as long as long as it was done with care.The jeweler worked quickly and in less than 5 minutes all was done. He placed the rings in the box and
closed it.
“That’ll be 10 gp”, the man said as he outstretched his hand to receive payment.
Astarion gave him 15 gp instead.
“Here you go. Keep the change. I’d appreciate if you forget I was ever here. Thank you for your work.”
He took his box and placed it back in his pants’ pocket and headed back to his Tav. He took great care
in not catching any more attention, espeically from the guards that were about to make their way into
the market. He quickened his pace, back to the first dark alley.
Back with Tav, she had since returned to the room and was now talkig to Gale while shaving her legs.
She was now in a calmer mood, though she was still a little nervous. Astarion was still gone and it was
starting to get dark. It would be a couple of hours until they had to leave the inn.
“And how’s your mum, Gale? How is doing now that you work as a professor?”
“Well, she’s doing fantastic, for the most part. I did move out, again. She wasn’t too happy about that
but Tara has been keeping her company.”
“Oh, my Tara! I miss her. She’s just the most perfect and bestest! Say hello to her for me. I swear, as
soon as I can, I’ll ask Astarion to go with me to Waterdeep. I want to meet mum and scratch Miss
Tara.”
Gale laughed. This was the reason why Tara really took a liking to Tav. She treated her “like she was
supposed to and more properly than most”, according to Tara that is.
“Well, I’m sure they would both love that. I’ve chatted with mother and she can’t wait. And to be
honest, she’s a little annoyed with me about you.”
“Why? What did I do?”
“Well, I may or may not have told her that a certain vampire-spawn caught your attention.”They both laughed as they recalled that Gale and Astarion had a bit of a rivalry the first month that their
party of misfits formed due to Tav. While both were flirty, Astarion started first. Gale always thought
that if he hadn’t doubted himself, he’d been first. Then again Wyll said the same thing. But today, they
were fine with the outcome. Tav was happy for the most part and surprisingly enough, to everyone’s
shock, so was Astarion.
“Oh, that! Well, tell her that I am stubborn and selfish. Maybe like that she won’t be mad at you.”
“I have, but she doesn’t believe it.”
“So, how’s our too pale elf doing? Is he with you right now?”, Gale said with a little panic in his voice.
“No, he went to the market for god knows what. He’s been gone a while.”
“I’m guessing he went with the protective gear?”
“Yes. He took all of it and coin. He left his pack here, though.”
“Are you doubting he won’t come back, Tav?”
“I was a while ago. Oh, Gale! I’m scared. We had a fight before, then I went to sleep and I-.. I was still
mad. What if someone tries to harm him and I was an idiot getting mad and-.. and-…”
“Calm down, young miss. Relationships can be hard sometimes, but knowing you, I’m sure you’ll fix
the situation if it was indeed broken.”
“Thanks, Gale. I’m just nervous. Before I called you, I had gone outside and I almost got into a fight.”
“Really? I thought you had gotten your anger under control by now?
“Well, sort of. The thing is that one of those stupid guards wanted to start a fight because I’m a woodelf. The idiot reached for his sword and everything.”
“What?! Tell me everything and don’t skip anything.”
“Well nothing terrible happened, really, but I was already not in my right mind. So, I went to the
restroom and as I reached the entrance, I saw 3 goons. They were right next to the entrance, so I wasn’t
about to run away. I paid for my services fair and square.”
“I wouldn’t expect any less. So, they confronted you there?”
“Yeah, the jumpy one wanted a fight, I guess. He was rude to me like he was trying to start a fight. But
a second one told him to calm down.”
“That’s good to know. We don’t want any unncessary quarels in-… where are you right now by the
way?
“Elturel.”
“WHAT?! TAV! Why on goddess green earth would you consider that? Most folks there hate you and
they certainly hate Astarion?”“I know, I know. The thing is that I wanted to sell my pelts and wares, so I convinced Astarion. He
knew about it, but he humoured me. To be honest, I’m conflicted as to regreting coming or not.”
“Because of the fight?”
“ Yes. It’s just that-… I feel I am now the one fighting Cazador’s ghost in him. He keeps doubting
himself and whenver I’m not paying attention, I feel like he starts his pitty party of misery. That’s why
I’m not mad at him entirely, but still, I was annoyed.”
“Mh. I’m with you and with him. Though you knew he’d be a challenge, because of his past, that is.”
“I know. It’s just that I would like to fight my enemies in the flesh, not the echoes etched in his skin.
which reminds me, hows the favor going?”
“I’m still searching. As soon as I have a breakthrough, I’ll let you know.”
“Thanks, Gale. That means a lot.”
“Though, getting back on topic, this means you’re almost there.”
“Yeah. I’m anxious. If I find that we’ve lost a babe, I just can’t-…”
“Well, you kew that was a possibility, givent the circumstances. Also, there wasn’t musch you could
to.”
“I know. I still hate the feeling. They deserve the world for they were stolen from it. I just want them to
have the same chance to choose, to live, perhaps even to love. I want to be selfish and think that
perhaps we are two pebbles in a lake and our ripple will touch more than the seven babes.”
“And I wouldn’t expect any less from you. I am with you, though. Every step of the way.”
“Thank you, Gale. I love you so much, and Tara. I know she’s listening.”
“And pretending to be asleep by the window. And I love you, too, Tav. Both of you.”
“Well, Gale. Thank you for taking the time. I’m sure you’re too busy, yet you made time.”
“For you, any time, my dear. Besides, Tara would not allow me to ignore her favorite one.”
They both laughed as Tara made a noise in agreement.
“Talk to you later, Gale.”
“Will do, Tav. Take care. And say hello to Astarion for me.”
“Of course. Bye.”
By the time she finished talking to Gale, she had shaven her legs, and cleaned her boots, as well as
pack up their things. As she had done all of this, she hand’t noticed Astarion had arrived and had heardpretty much all the conversation. He didn’t want to interrup her call, but it had given him a lot to think
about.
I’ll just give her a moment to finish up then. But who is she talking to?
Gale?! Perhaps I’ll just stay then. I wonder what he’s plotting.
As he listened in to the conversation, his mind drifted back to his thoughts in the market. He was so
close then, but perhaps he needed a little push.
Acts of kindess? Not asking for things in return? Gift giving just because
you feel like it? It doesn’t make any stupid sense?! None of it! I just don’t
under-…
Then he removed his sunglasses and his gloves. The same ones given to him by people who at first
weren’t sure about him, would have killed him even. Wyll was certainly in that group to not give him a
change due to his food preferences or in this case, necessity. Yet, they were there at the fall of Cazador.
They didn’t asked for anything in return out of him. They simply tagged along because he and Tav
were dead set on ending his reign once and for all.
Then Tav told the group to take that which they needed, wanted, or even desired for there would be
nothing left after that night. And she was not kidding. Once again, Astarion remembered her after he
collected himself as Cazador’s body lay there. That was the first time Astarion saw hatred, raw and
unfiltered in her eyes. She wasn’t a wreck like he was. She was determined. She was silent. He’d never
seen her without her smile, even in her eyes. Those eyes weren’t hers, were they?
Astarion, my love. I need you to get yourself together. We can’t stay here.
It’s over. Come on. Halsin, help him up, please. There’s something I will
do. As for the rest, as you leave, if there is anything you are taking, do so
quickly. We dare not linger in this hellscape. Let’s go.
As they started to move, Astarion looked back at her as she kneeled over Cazador’s dead
body. She kneeled in his blood and whipered to him.Into my fire, I’ll swallow your hate. You will not win. He is with me. I
claim him for my own, Cazador Szarr.The hells will freeze before I let you
win. I lay claim to him. You will be forgotten. I will set the world ablaze if
only to keep my Astarion warm. Igne Furia.
He finally was able to remember what happened after. That’s what she said, word for word.
Oh! Tav! Even then, you weren’t ready to let me go. And the rest of the
misfits?! They found the bounty and still thought of me when I wasn’t even
thinking of myself. The gloves, the glasses, the cloak, even the tent?! She’s
been letting me feed on her all this time. She even changed her diet for the
idea that it matters? How in the hells?! Me? All for me? Is that what love
is to her? I don’t-… But maybe I don’t have to understand. She said it
herself, she does it because she wants to, not because she’s forced. She
laid claim to me way before Cazador’s Palace. She’s been fighting him for
my sake all this time just because-… Yet, she doesn’t want to possess me
like he did. She let’s me choose and hopes to all the gods I choose to stay.
I don’t make it easy for her, but she chooses me every day and every night.
Has she thought of giving up on me? I wouln’d blame her, but then she
does all of this-…
Then he finally saw the paper bag on his lap. Two toy plushies without a purpose. 8 sp spent on added
weight to their packs, bought because they would make her smile. An orange pumking with a devious
smile like his and an owlbear cub because she missed owlbear. And then the rings. The realization
washed over him like the strongest winter wind he’d ever encountered.
Tav! You mad woman! You knew, you saw-… Gods! You beautifu wild
beast of a woman! How can I-…? And you’re mine. I will choose you, too.
Every morning and every night. You are mine, woman. I lay claim to all of
you for you’ve been doing the same to me after all this time. And you’re
right, I can’t let him win. He’s dead. He’s gone. I’m free-… I’m free to
choose and woman, I choose you, too!He stood up in one swift move and opened the door just as she stopped the connection with Gale. She
looked startled while reaching for her dagger. Always the fighter, she had weapon at the ready. Then
she realized who was looking right at her.
“Astarion?!”
“Tav! I choose you. Every morning and every night. It will always be you.”
“What?”
“Doesn’t matter. Come here, woman.”
He reached her in a breath and claimed his heart wich had been walking beside him all this time. He
kissed her as if the world might stop if he didn’t. She kissed him back with the same passion. Their
tears rolling down their cheeks as the relief washed over them. He was home.Chapter 12
Helen Wheels… and they’re never gonna take her away
Once they both calmed down they were ready to start their chat. It was getting closer for them to head
out, but there was still time to bury the hatchet.
“You went to the market?”
“I did.”
“Without telling me.”
“Correct.”
“Why?”
“You were sleeping.”
“Miss me with the bullshit, Astarion. It’s a dangerous town for us. Why?”
“I had to get some fresh air, and I didn’t want to wake you. I needed to clear my thoughts.”
“Thank you. You good?”
“I’m good. I swear. I’m better. I got you this.”
He handed her the crumpled paper bag where you could only see an orange-… thing.
“What’s this? You?”, she said with a surprised look on her face.
“Yes, me! Woman. You’d think I was always against giving you anything.”, he said pretendeding to be
hurt.
“Well, you don’t. If anything, you give me a song and a dance when I give you anything, so-… yeah.”
“Enough about me, open it. Go on, darling.”
She gave him a suspicious look, before tearing open the bag to see what was inside.
“AH! IT’S A PUMPKIN! AND AN OWLBEAR! They’re so cute! Mine?!”
“Of course, my sweet. Anything for you.”, he said releived he got a better reaction than what he had
anticipated.
She walked towards him and gave him a tight hug. She was smiling from ear to ear. All worries and
woes forgotten for now. Perhaps this was not the time to talk about what happened earlier today.
“Oh, Astarion, I was so worried for your safety. I mean, there were some paladins that were-… but then
they left, but-… I want to go now.”
“I agree. I see that you’ve already packed up, so what’s keeping us here?“Nothing. The sun has set. Let’s go before the paladins bring trouble to the young man.”
He giggled but agreed with his head. By now, she had dumped the dirty water from the bucket under
the water basin, made the bed and removed the leather straps from the window. Everything was left as
it had been before their arrival. The only clue they had been there was the smudge on the floor from her
charcoal. He goal was to not bring trouble to this business, so she did a quick blessing to try and mask
any residual necrotic engergy left behind, especially on the bed.
“Have I got the news for you, Astarion.”, she beamed up at him excitedly.
He raised his eyebrows as he allowed her to pass through the door first.
“I got my cart. It’s outside. It’s the best!”
“Oh, dear! That excitement is beginning to worry me.”
She pouted her lip in fake annoyance at him, but her eyes gave her away. She felt happy, and so did he.
Both trying their best to not rock the boat lest they fall over again. They walked downstairs heading
towards the inn-keeper. It was time to part ways.
“Young man, thank you so much for such hospitality and help. May many blessing befall on you and
yours.”, Tav said with a cheery mood and bright smile.
“How much do we owe you?”, Astarion asked now free of his previous gear. This time the coming
darkness of the surroundings was trully showing his real nature.
The man gulped, trying to hide his fear.
“Um, well, with everything consumed, and the room, you-… you’re pending 5 gp.”, he said while
fearing for his life.
Astarion reached into his pocket and gave the man double.
“Here you go, and for your troubles. I’d ask that if anyone asked, you have no idea what they’re talking
about.”
The frightened man took the gold with a hand struggling to hide a shake, but agreed to the request. As
this was happening, Tav had given a last blessing to the bear and to the establishment. She took a bow
towards the man, and gave him another smile in gratitude.
Astarion opened the door and allowed her to head out first. He followed and the door shut closed. The
man was relieved they were finally gone for some paladins were indeed starting to poke their noses too
close for comfort. He was hopeful that the witch’s blessing would be enough to keep her lover’s
lingering energy hidden. Also, we was relieved that he found out Astarion’s nature now that he was
gone. It’s not everyday that you house a vampire in the most anti-anything you can think of town. with
any luck, those two would never return and carry whatever ill burden with back with them in case
necessary.
Lucky for him, he was safe from paladin questioning. They arrived at the Inn at night, when you would
expect monsters to come out and play, of course. But by then, our unlikely duo was long gone and wellenough away from this city surrounded in myth and magic, and heading into the woods, The Reaching
Woods.
“You’re going to hate her! I’m so excited!”
“What? Hate who? Tav, what did you do?”
“I bought my little wagon push cart, and I love her. I named her Helen.”
As he turns from her and sees what she is looking at, he finally realizes what she meant.
“I hate it.”
She basically cackled.
“I know! That’s why I love her. And they’re never going to take her away! Let’s go Helen.”
He just rolled his eyes, but secretly he was liking the idea of not having to carry his pack with the tent.
It weighed heavy on his shoulders. Besides, her happiness was keeping her from bringing up the
previous fight. For now, he was happy about that too.
“So, I’ll push her for a bit or pull her for a bit. Then when I get tired, you’re next.”
“What? Why on earth would you ever think I’d touch that thing?”
“Because you love me and because I said so.”
Now the little cart was packed properly. With several leather straps she had in her own pack, she tied
her iron pans and her little pot. She placed her cooking utencils on a sack along with the lid for her pans
and pot, “just the one lid, because it fits the three”, she had told him when she packed them back when
they first started travelling together. It seemed like forever, but now there wasn’t a parasite in their
brain.
Most items were water proofed, the tent, his cloack, the sacks. And inside the packs were the useful
items that made their life possible a long with other things that made life bearable. She hung her water
skins, too. So far she was working with 4: 2 large water skins made from the bears he’s killed and 2
smaller ones she killed. Several meters of rope and leather straps of several sizes.They even had a pack with books and ink. The basically had a mobile home on their backs and now it
was on this cart. And spearheading their journey, two plushies: a little pumpkin with a grimace and
scowling eyes, like Astarion, and an owlbear cub. She loved them.
“Let’s go!”
And she took off running, her weapons jingling as she gained speed. She didn’t care for paladins, or
nosy villagers. She only wanted to try our her little hell on wheels. Astarion just stared at her in awe.
Lucky for me her stride isn’t wide or I’d be in trouble.
He just quickened his pace to catch up to her which didn’t take too long. But, she was right, leaving
that city quickly felt good. Their religious stuffiness and holier than thou energy was suffocating
without realizing it.
Once they were a little further away from the entrance to Elturel, she began to slow down. She was
ready to check the map again, or better yet, have Astarion check them. She was never good with those
things anyway. She’d send them to Avernus if he allowed her to lead the way. He thought it was
curious how she could track almost anything, but a point on a map.
“My beloved. My reason for being. My beautiful yet delicious partner in crime.”, she chimed trying to
get into his good graces.
“Just hand me the map, woman.”
She laughed. He liked being praised, but she loved to mock him for it whenever she could.
“Well, this map isn’t the best, still, but I think I have an idea.”
“I trust you. Lead the way, king.”
“What’s with all the praise suddenly?|
She shrugged her shoulders while looking at the horizon.
“Should I stop? I like telling you sweet nothings-… especially because you give me that look. It’s
hilarious.”
His face indeed look incredulous. His eyebrows raised, mouth open, just a little shocked.“But don’t you dare go crazy with your thoughts. I enjoy telling you that I love you outside of doing
the nasty, that’s all.”
She’s right. I never tell her that I appreciate her or that I love her. I
mean, when we are-… Should I start whispering sweet nothings? Does
she want that? But, that’s just so-…
She realized he stopped walking and had that look he has when he’s lost in his thoughts. She wished
she could read his mind right now, to snap him out of it. She snapped her fingers at him to get his
attention.
“Hey, not here, babe. We’re too exposed and we must get a move on-… where are we going to be
exact?”
“What? Oh, yeah. We need to keep south then south-east. We will need to cross the River Chionthar at
one point. I’m not looking forward to it.”
“Same. But we’ll figure it out, love. We always do.”
They kept walking while little by little they began to remove themselves from the main road heading
towards the city they were leaving.
“First, we need to head towards the narrowest point in the river, so we can corss it safely-… that
includes-… Helen.”, he rolled his eyes while looking at the cart. It looked like a fat pig with many
things hanging from it and on it.
“Don’t worry, Hellen. He likes you. He’s just sour to pretty things.”, she teased.
As they kept walking, they were very weary of their surroundings. Tav was still not sure about the
encounter she had with the paladins. She had the feeling the one who spoke to her first was looking for
a fight, and she wasn’t too far off. A couple of minutes more and they would have encountered five of
them dressed to the nines in arrongant splendor. Fortunately, her blessings worked well enough for the
inn-keeper. They found nothing important enough and had no way of pinning anything on the business
or the owner.
“So, let’s say you have an opportunity to acquire a home. Money is not a problem. What kind of place
would you like? I’m curious to know? A small house-… I doubt it. A big one?”
“You know. I’ve never really thought obout it. Let me think.”Tav kept pushing the cart and keeping up with his pace, albeit she was going a little faster than her
normal. Not having all the weight on her back really sped her up.
“Well, let me tell you about mine. Maybe you get an idea of what don’t want or do want.”
“Mh, sounds fair.”
“Back at the clan house, the homes were more like tree houses with spiral stairs leading up and rope
and wood bridges connecting the houses in branches. Other houses were on the ground. But I didn’t
like it much. It was beautiful and a sight to behold, of course. But, there was no privacy.”
Astarion remembered their last outburst when Tav finally allowed herself to reveal parts of her past.
This was the first time she was painting a picture of where she was born, and eventually banished
from.
“So, I think I want something smaller. I would like a place that perhaps in near the woods, but not in
the woods. Or maybe try my luck at civilization this time. But something made of stone and wood. I
want the door leading outside to be at the kitchen and have a fireplace in that room. And next to this
room, I want a room with chairs and pillows, so our friends can sit on them or the floor, like we used
to and talk about things. And a restroom with a shower space. I’d like to wash myself inside the house
and not outside. I don’t like bug bites. Also, a nice large bedroom, but not very large, I think the size
of the tent is fine.”
“Well, that’s surely specific. May I ask why?”
She blushed a little for her reason as she was a little embarrassed that in reality that’s what she wanted
to have, but with him.
“For cleaning. A large place means cleaning is a lot of work, or you have to hire workers to help with
everything and you don’t-…”
The rest she mumbled more to herself.
“Pardon me? I don’t what?”
She mumbled it again, looking at the cart while turning an even darker shade of red which was
impressive since it was night out. He smiled.
“You mean, I don’t like to have many people inside my home?”
She shook her head to agree. She dared not look at him.
“Well, I see your point, and you are correct. I don’t want strangers moving around our home, even if I
paid them.”, he smiled as he said this.
She let out a breath she didn’t know she was holding. Then looked up to him with a quizzical look.
“You-… I mean-… our-… home.”
“Well, of course. A life time of palace that were never mine, I’d like to give a smaller home a try.”
“You really mean it?”“Certainly my dear. Besides, you said it yourself, ‘Misery loves company, and I can’t get rid of you
Mrs. Misery, my fake wife.”, he laughed at this.
She was surprised that he had a fantastic ear and memory when it was convinient for him, ever the
rogue. But her heart did skip a bit.
He will stay. My moon! He wants to give us a chance! I promise I’ll do my best to make this work-…
and that he doesn’t change his mind.
“Well, my Mr. Misery, I’d like a garden, too. I’ll work it, so your precious hands don’t get dirty, of
course.”
“Well, I’ll leave you to that then, dear. I couldn’t stand the dirt under my nails, but on you, I’d take it
any day.”
He reached for her and picked her up in a hug. This was the first time he’s done that. She was beyond
belief that perhaps he was trying to do something out of his character, but was willing to try. That was
enough for both. More than enough.
“Tav. I believe that in your joy for Helen, you forgot something.”
As she enjoyed his hug, she didn’t want to let go just yet, she moved a little back to see him.
“What?”
“We never did take that shower.”
They both cackled at the thought. She was so mad at him at that time she said it. But then with what
happened with the paladin, it was fortunate they both forgot. They’ll just have do what they usually
do, a rag, a bowl, and some soap. Just rub, rub, splash, splash.
She began to wiggle to get lose, but he held her more firmly while laughing. He knew she disliked
feeling dirty and sweaty and they hadn’t had a proper change to bathe or shower since the lake with
Halsin. That was some days ago. In part, visiting Elturel was to sell or trade, but also to take advantage
of the accomodations, a bath or shower room.
“Oh! That stupid paladin! May he always feel wet socks and itchy butt!”, she screamed as she shook
her fist back at the city.
“Now, now, my dear. I like your stench. It smells a little like me.”, he said with a coy smile.
“But, now I’m going to feel itchy all over the place. It’s starting already.”, she began scratching her
neck.
“Careful with that, love. That’s mine.”
“Fine. But when we rest, I will use up the waterskins, and you need to clean up, too. Even if you don’t
smell like onions like I do.”, she blushed as she laughed.
“Disgusting description, but fine. We’ll shower together.”, he winked at her while finally kissing her.His happiness could not be contained at that moment as he spined her around to get her dizzy while he
kissed her. He knew she wouldn’t apreciate the spin for she already got dizzy when he hugged or
kissed her. He was also capable of her teasing games.
He set her down and sure enough, she had to keep hold of Helen, the beast. But she laughed as she
did. You don’t jyxn happiness when you are heading towards danger. You enjoy it while you have it.
They kept walking in good spirits being midful of the road and anyone or anything that may be lurking
around. They both were aware that gnolls and paladins were two of the many things they didn’t want
to spoil their fun.
“How many?”, Tav asked while pushing the cart, her grip showing her knuckles tightening.
“Perhaps 3, maybe 4. Human.”
“Guards? If it’s that one, I will take him out. He’s starting to spoil my fun.”
“It might need to get that far, but we’ll have to take all out, not just your one.”
“Let’s keep walking, then. See if they are after us or just patrolling.”
Their mood shifted. Now it was a tense situation. They weren’t looking for a fight, at least not today
and especially not now. Tav wasn’t in the mood. So, they quickened their pace to test them out.
“Halt! You two, over there.!, shouted one of the paladins.
“Perhaps, I’ll do the talking.”, said Tav as she handed him the glasses.
“Very well. I’ll let you to it, for now.”
“Just know, we’re married. I’m pregnant, and we’re heading home to my parents for the pregnancy.”
This again? She keeps bringing it up as a tactic. What in the hells is she doing?
Tav was loosening her pants and sticking her stomach out as much as she could to fake being
pregnant. If they were paladin guards, they might go lenient on two weirdos walking at night in the
wilds. She was betting on their ‘righteous’ beliefs and their religious bigotry. Families are meant to be
a man and a woman and they should be breeding.
“Just play along, husband. Let me talk first. I don’t want them to see your fangs.”
“Fine.”, he rolled his eyes now covered by his dark glasses.
Perhaps this would be enough cover. But then, Tav grabbed a glass vial and removoed the wax seal.
She threw its contents to Astarion while pretending to fall on to him. A dizzy spell perhaps? Some
pregnant women had those. Then she poured the rest of the liquid on her.The strong sickly sweet smell was overwhelming. But, it might be enough to hide them. The would
definitely need a shower and clean clothes if they convinced the guards to buzz off. She’s pregnant
after all and she’s not in the mood.
The guards caught up to them. Indeed there were 4, and one of them was the one she did not
particularly like. How typically persistant for some children of a god to be that way.
“Yes. How may we help you?”, Tav said while forcing a friendly smile. Her stomach under her light
armor clearly showing.
The guard who she had met earlier took notice of this and wondered if he had seen that before. This
changed his plans. Why on earth would a woman in this state be up to something suspicious. Besides,
he was told that she claimed that was her husband. Perhaps the rumors that he was a vampire were
false. Vampires can’t breed and she was very much with child. Perhaps 3 months? It wasn’t showing
much, but enough to know life was happening in there.
“I’m very sorry, ma’m. We are simply patrolling and were looking for 2 suspicious strangers.”
“Mh. That means us?,” she said this as she winced and touched her stomach.
Astarion just stood, but when she did that, he reacted. He reached for her to steady her.
“Oh, I’m sorry. You’re clearly not-… If you don’t mind my asking, but in your condition why are you
guys walking at night? These wilds aren’t the safest for anyone, especially for someone like you.”
“I know, dear. But the thing is the sun makes me sick. I get nauseated and too hot. We’re on our way
back to my parents home. Night time is my choice-… I prefer it any day.”, She smiled at Astarion who
smiled back.
“Oh, very well then. But do be careful, there are gnolls around some areas. Steer clear of going east.
We’ve seen suspicious movement. If you need assistance in your journey, make sure you reach a post
along the road.”
“Well, keep that in mind, young friend. But, it won’t take is too long to reach Berdusk. Perhaps my
father is already heading towards us as we speak. For sure my brothers are. They know I get impatient.
Thank you for the warning and aid. Do you need anything else from us?”
She was starting to get impatient, but she needed to keep her cool. After all, the baby might want to
come out and fight.
“No, that was all. Safe travels.”
“Thank you. Likewise.”
The paladin guards turned around and headed back to the city. It was clear it was them who they were
after, but who would want the sin of attacking a pregnant woman, even if her husband looked
strangely familiar. If he only knew he had just questioned part of Faeruns champions, perhaps his
arrogant attitude might lessen. But that was doubtful. You had to be when the gods chose you.“That was-… annoying.”, Tav said as she fixed her armor again.
“Pregnant? That’s twice you’ve-…”, he said more to himself.
“It worked. I wondered if it would, but it did. Ha! It’s all right baby. Once we rest, I’ll let you go.”
She patted her stomach while giving a loving smile. Astarion was very confused about her behavior.
Then she looked at him and gave him an evil grin.
“I haven’t pooped. This walk is helping. That guard, too. I’ll name it after him.”, she cackled.
Now it was Astarion who stop holding his breath. His woman was imposible sometimes. He made no
comentary lest she start talking about bodily fluids and the like just to annoy him.
“Anyway, where were we? So a cottage or perhaps a cabin. Not in the woods, but near enough.
Anything else you want to add, love?”
“Mh, let’s see. A wash room! And perhaps hire someone to help with making a cistern or something. I
would like to not have to carry water back and forth all the time. I can’t imagine having to go to the
river to wash. Not for me, thanks.”
Astarion would not have thought of that. But it was true, not everything was armor. They had
underwear, socks, and wash cloths that needed cleaning. Especially now, he needed all of himself to be
washed. That sicky liquid she used was getting annoying, but it might deter other fiends hiding on the
fields. If it were up to him, he’d steer clear of himself too if only to avoid the stench.
“Speaking of, what was that liquid?”
“Oh, that. It’s disgusting isn’t it? It’s a mix of nasty and nice. Some animal urine, flower petals, honey,
water from the river, animal fat, and rotten meat. A little of the forest mixed in a vial. You reckon it
can work on the gnolls? I mean, these goons made no mention of vampires, so-…”
“Well, gross, but I think so. I can barely stand it myself.”
She smiled, proud that her theory worked enough. She have to make more, despite still having another
three vials at the ready.
“But, I think that’s it. I figured a library can also be where the chairs and pillows are, or the bedroom.”
She was smiling from ear to ear while describing her ideal little home. He vision was quickly growing
on him, but we wondered if that meant here or the Underdark. There was a lot uncertainty in their
wishes as of now.
“Library. Got it.”
“But what about you? You reckon we will be settling in the Underdark forever? I would like to find a
place where we could make a settlement for our kin, you know. Like a little village of like-minded
folks that want to work together to make life worth living. You know what I mean?”
Astarion’s shocked face was almost caught by Tav.What? Is that her plan? That is certainly a bold move even for her? That’s
a lot of my kind together without a master to keep them in check. Does she
think they can even control themselves? Could they? She certainly has a lot
of faith in them, more than I. But, her kin? Does she want to become a-…
“Huh? Oh, I don’t know. I mean, the sun will be an issue always, so-..”
“Well, I don’t mind to be down there then. The thing is my babes deserve a chance. They were stolen
from life. It wasn’t heir fault. And no one is in your corner, ever. I get it, but still-… I just want them to
have a chance. Give them a choice. They aren’t animals. They are people, like me, like you. I will fight
for them, too.”
She said with such conviction as a tear rolled down her cheek. She was perhaps wrong in her ideals, but
she was stubborn enough to try. She had claimed them too back at the palace.
“I don’t think it will be easy to get them to get along, especially with me around, but I know that you’re
dead set on it. I will help you in your insane plan. Besides, a lot of your insane plans have worked
before.”, He said as he was trying to find her same conviction.
Since they had set out, they didn’t talk about what they would do once they arrived, but now she was
showing at least a snippet as to why she chose to come. She claimed the vampire spawn as her kin and
will fight for them to have a right to exist. But in what way? They are monsters? Do they deserve a
chance to live and love, too?
“Hear me out. What if my babes-… what if they can be convinced that they deserve a chance at life,
even now. That we could establish a land where we can thrive together? I mean, you were a magistrate
before, you may still have some of how to manage rules and things like that for a town? I don’t know. I
mean, I’ve lived alone for most of my life, but I’ve been to cities. Sure, it gets bad, but rules can help
folks behave and get along-… can’t they?”
“To be honest-… I have no recollection of my past prior. I was 39 and I was from an afluent family. If
anything, I’d think I was pretty rotten. Most of my kind were because we held money and power. I
wouldn’t be surprised that the Gur that attacked me were dealing with their kind of justice or perhaps it
was Cazador’s doing. I may never know.”
“What about books? What if, given the chance, we read up on the topic? I can contact Gale. Like, we lay
the ground work to have a basic understanding on how to handle a community or something. There must
be something, anything for that. You civilized folk have books for just about anything, why not on the
topic of how to build a village for vampires or something?”
Her frustration was not lost on him. She was really going to push it. Perhaps it was time he pushed for it
too, after all she was dead set that they deserved to live after being stolen from life.
“You have a point-… I think. At least about the books. Perhaps you should contact Gale at some point,
and why not, Lae’Zel.”, he laughed at the last suggestion.
Lae’Zel was no nonsense and though she wouldn’t like the idea of gathering a lot of spawn together tor
establish a town, she was the best when it came to rules and order. The only scary thing was that, so wasTav, but she didn’t show it as much as Lae’Zel did. Perhaps that was why they had a mutual liking and
respect for each other.
As they kept moving the occasionally saw moving shadows in the distance, but not near enough to react.
They knew they were in dangerous territory and would have to fight at some point. Though, Tav was
starting to show that she was spent.
“I think we should set up camp over there, it’s just enough away from that paladin post which may help
keep other things away.”
Tav yawned and agreed.
“I’d like that. I’m spent. I didn’t get much sleep after you left.”
“Why was that? You were gone once you hit the pillow.”
“I had a nightmare. I woke up and you were gone. I had a bit of a panic, so I busied myself with
whatever I could. I cleaned my boots, I fixed the packs, I threw out the water. I also called Karlach and
Wyll. They say hi by the way. Then I called Gale. They calmed my nerves. It worked. I was about to go
find you. I get nervous if I’m alone, still.”
“Well, I’m glad I don’t make you nervous then. And would you mind telling me about your nightmare?”
“You and I both know what it was. It is either you dying and I go out with you or I die and you do the
same. Let’s get real, Astarion, I’ve been alone most of my short life, which means I will probably make
stupid decisions, especially regarding you. I don’t want to keep fighting the good fight if you’re not here
with me. So, deal with it. I love you and I want to stay with you for the rest of your days or the rest of
mine.”
“Mh, curious. I’ve had those nightmares, too. So, that settles it then. You were very honest about
sticking around if only to spite me. Then, let’s set up home, then. By the way, I know I don’t say this
often, but thank you. I’m glad you chose me that night. Even if my motives were the wrong ones. I will
spend the rest of my days making up for it.”
“Don’t bother. Just be, but let me just be, with you. I don’t ask much. I just want your company. I like it.
I like you. I feel safe. My mind calms down when you’re around. That’s why I keep telling you my love
is selfish. I think we both get something good out of our situation.”
“I think so, too. And, you’re right. It is nice. Well, here we are. I’ll begin setting up tent, then I’ll help
you with the warding stakes.”
“Sounds like a plan, love. But let’s hurry. The sky is changing color.”
So, they began their now common ritual of setting up camp, but now it was home away from home.
They hurried with their tasks and set up all the little things they had to. Tav kept her Helen near the
entrance, tied to a stake. Astarion also took care of setting up a small fire for Tav. She might need it later.
Once inside, with the light of some candles and an oil lamp, they continued their chat. But this time, Tav
thought up of another idea, that Astarion would have to help with.“I am wondering if I could-… I mean, in theory it could work. You from inside and I do the outside bit.”
“Woman, what on Faerun are you on about?”
“I’m thinking on expanding our house! Look, I want to attach my poop tent to this side of the big one
and in such a way that they can be separated and folded as usual, but I could have access and you, too.”
He rolled his eyes and gave her a grimace showing his fangs.
“Well, what is your plan then, out with it.”
“Attach it here like a little flap door, but it needs to be connected with leather straps. We can access it
from inside the tent, and maybe keep the other flap-… so that makes 2 entry points-… mmm, perhaps
just enter through the tent and keep the rest closed-… the idea is to attach it so you can shower right
now without needing to step outside to enter it.”
He said nothing. He clearly was coming up with either a counterpoint or a complaint. Either way, that
was very much him. But he found none. Her logic was solid enough. He had his cloak and he could use
that, but here she was again trying to accommodate his living space for his needs and hers, too.
“Very well. Seems logical. What do you need me to do?”
She gave him a giant smile. She was grateful he also was accommodating to her quirks. When they
traveled in a larger group, it was rare for him to fully notice her little quirks. They were all busy in their
own little worlds together that there was little reason for complaints. Well, except when she licked the
spider. Perhaps Gale still has nightmares about that.
So they worked quickly, but they did it together. They were more in sync now than they were before the
parasites destruction. This meant that they didn’t have the chance to hear or feel each other’s mind, now
they had to pay attention and make a wild guess. By now, they were getting better at guessing right.
By the end of it, she had her extension ready with the proper branches, trenches, holes, and the leather
straps to hold the water skins.
“Very well. It’s ready. So, I’m going to need you to-… test it. I’m sorry, but we have to see if it will hold
or not. I’m right here to help if it doesn’t work properly.”
Tav pointed at the new hole on the side of the larger tent that now connected to the smaller one. She had
a worried look, but was trying to be enthusiastic. It would either work fine or cause him some pain and
discomfort.
He exhaled slowly. He wasn’t terrified of checking if it would hold or not, but he also wasn’t to keen on
feeling pain.
“Just do the one hand.”
He agreed and pushed his left hand through the flap and held it there. They counted to 60. Nothing. No
pain, no blisters, no smoke. She was holding on to his right hand. She counted loudly to another 60.Still, nothing. He was safe. No burning. No blisters. They both finally exhaled and looked at each other
and smiled.
“Guess who needs a shower?”, Tav said while walking towards her pack.
She grabbed a new pair of everything from underwear and socks to a new top. She had at least 2 sets of
armor but 5 outfits that went under. This allowed her to stay clean and dry and to wash the clothes, too.
Living in the woods let her understand that keeping clean and dry is the difference between surviving a
cut or dying of infection.
She left her things on the bed of pelts, took off her boots, and simply stripped down. She was still
blushing, but she figured he’s seen her many times now. Then she turned around and he was there,
looking at her, also bare and ready to share the space. After all, she had said they were going to shower
together back at Elturel.
“Let’s go my love. You’ve got to rest.”
“I hate that I love when you beat me to the punch.”
She got on her tip toes to give him a peck on the lips. Then she stepped into the smaller tent.
“Did you bring the wash cloths?”, he asked her.
“Yeah, they’re right next to the skin hanging right there. Just pour some water on the basin first. I’ll add
the soap.”
So, they helped each other lather their backs and he scrubbed her hair then bent down for her to do the
same. They giggled and at times even laughed. It was a tight space, but they made it work for them. This
time she had thought of putting rocks on the little trench and on top of it she fashioned a little mat of
sticks and grass-rope. This allowed the water to collect down the trench and into a later hole he had help
dig. Like this their water wouldn’t pool nor go into the tent.
They ended up using the 2 large water skins, but that was fine. The river was still walking distance and
they were heading that way tonight. But if she needed water before that, she could take Helen and make
a run for it and come back in a pinch.
When they finished rinsing the soap off, Tav laughed.
“I forgot to grab something to dry off.”
“I don’t think it matters.”, he told her as he picked her up and carried her out carefully.
He walked to the bed of pelts and lay her there. She felt a little too bare, so she tried to cover herself.
“Please, don’t. I want to lay next to you like this. Would you let me?”
“Oh, that sounds-… that sounds nice.”
She moved over to let him lay beside her. His cold touch to hers was lovely. She was very hot right now,
but his lack of heat balanced her temperature to something comfortable.
He snuggled on her bosom and she began to run her fingers through his curls.“Astarion?”
“Yes, Tav?”
“I love you.”
He squeezed her a little more with his arm on top of her stomach in a sort of incomplete hug.
“I love you, too. More than I dare to admit myself.”
“I’m fine with that.”
“Thank you.”
“Thank you, my pale elf.”
They stayed there, in their own thoughts, hugging each other without saying a word for a little while.
Then Tav’s breathing slowed down and deepened. Her heartbeat slowed, too. She was asleep. Astarion
smiled and simply stayed there, his head on her chest as best as he could. His new favorite melody had
become Tav and her humanity. He wasn’t sure if he longed to be alive or to just be able to keep her
forever. Either way, right now he was grateful he had her and she wanted that.
They slept about 4 hours, well Tav did. He meditated or at least that’s what he’d want us to believe. She
ban to stir. She felt a pain on her leg. She sat up straight in a panic.
“Crap!”, she shouted while reaching down to rub her leg.
Astarion was startled, too.
“What’s wrong?! What’s going on? Are you hurt?”
“Sort of-… ah-… stupid leg. I’ve got a cramp. Get my pack will ya. I’ve got a little green pouch on the
outside bag. Yeah, that one. Hand it over.”
He gave her the pouch and she took a little metal tin with a lid and opened it. It smelled very minty. She
took some of the substance that looked a little like clarified fat and crushed mint leaves. And began
rubbing her leg quickly. She needed to make friction to create heat. Her legs where tired and she was
now too cold. That was a recipe for cramps on her legs and feet. Unfortunately, she had many cramp
recipes, but she had enough ointment to help soothe the muscle.
“Feeling better? That thing smells-… pungent.”
“Sorry, but it helps. My leg’s are tired from all the walking and I got cold enough that I got a cramp. At
least it wasn’t my toes. I hate that.”
“Mm, I am sort of glad I don’t have those then. But, perhaps we should get dressed. Will you go hunting
for food? You last ate at the inn.”
“I think I still got some food. I bought some at the inn before we left. I’ll just eat that and once we get
closer to crossing the river, I’ll perhaps do some fishing.”
“Sounds good.”
“Are you feeling a bit peckish? Please let me know, love. I need you in your best shape.”He thought about it. He didn’t always want to use her, but she was right. She was right that her blood
cleared his mind and also that wasn’t using her, despite his belief. She gave herself willingly and that
was her choice. She saw it more as a gift she was wiling and able to offer.
Fair to say it was a complicated dynamic for both, but she was never forced to feed him nor she forced
him to feed. It was just facts. His mind was clear if the blood came for a thinking individual and she
didn’t want him feeding on anyone else but her and animals. She always has said her love is selfish after
all.
“Perhaps before you feed. Like this you have some food in you then.”
“Sounds good.”
Tav noticed he was looking doubtful about his suggestion. She was aware of his emotions better now
and knew that he could spiral again. After all, they had been avoiding their conversation from the inn.
“Hey, look at me. No. And also, stop it. No. It’s my choice and I am never forced. The day I don’t want
to, I will say no. Until then, suck it up. I mean, deal with it.”, she told him this while pointing her finger
at him.
She hated to do it this way, but he was stubborn, too. But he said nothing, he just stood up and crossed
his arms. There was nowhere he could go right now. The sun was bright out and unless she stepped out
of the tent, he was stuck in there with her.
She kept looking at him with a stern face. It seemed that they were gearing up to dish it out again. They
were rested, yet hungry.
“Perhaps you can eat first.”
“Clever. But don’t change the subject. You won’t be able to charm yourself out of this one. So, either
spit it out or knock it off.”
He tilted his head back in exasperation. She wasn’t going to let it go yet he was the one who was making
a big deal about it.
“Fine. Just stand up then.”
She did as was told, wearing only socks and a thin knitted blanket. She walked over to him, which
wasn’t much. The tent wasn’t very big.
“Which side? Left? Right? Up? Down?”, she smirked.
“Funny.”, he rolled his eyes.
Then he grabbed her wrists and pulled her arms up. Her blanket dropped, and she gasped. If he was
going to do this, he was going to make the best of it. He moved her to the side of the tent to serve as an
aid to pin her. He placed his keen between her legs and gave her a little growl. Then he moved her wrists
to one hand while he lifted her with the other. Now in his arm, he let her go and held her. With his knee
he had moved her so that she was straddling him.
“You done? Come on then. All you do to avoid it. Stop playing.”, she rolled her eyes.He laughed a little. He was stalling. Then he stopped being stubborn, but he was going to pretend he
didn’t like this nor that he enjoyed having her.
“Left.”
“Fine.”, she whispered as she tilted her head to leave her neck better exposed.
She inhaled a sharp breath as his fangs sinked into her skin. He could feel how her nails dug into his
back a little. By now, she had learned that she needs to keep taking deep breaths while he fed. This
helped her not be very dizzy after. He also learned that 4 large gulps were enough, 5 if he was injured,
but if he slowed himself, he could stay like that a little longer. Today, he was taking it slow.
“Mmm.”
Well, as long as Tav didn’t ignite his baser instinct which she very much could, especially right then and
there. Then her hands reached up to his neck, like a soft caress of feathers on his cool skin. Then she
found what she wanted. The soft velvety texture of his hair, his curls, the coolness of his scalp, she
would get as much of it as she could. Besides, he’s the one that put her in that position and started to
play with his food.
Then he finally let go. He licked her neck to help heal the two puncture wounds and set her down.
“How do you feel?”
“Hungry.”, she said back with her now too familiar grin.
She leaned in and bit his waist. She didn’t do much, but it did startle him enough to lose his balance in
shock.
“What in hells, woman?!” he said in disbelief.
She cackled as she went for another bite. She was aiming for his butt, but he kept moving.
“Stop moving! Let me eat you!”
Tav laughed and kept chomping the air. He wasn’t sure how to react, so he just kept moving out of her
bite.
“No, you stop it.”
“No, you stop it.”
“Stop mocking me, woman!”
“Never. Come here, snack!”
Her trick worked. He didn’t notice her position to trip him. He fell back and landed on his butt. She then
threw herself at him, now pinning him down. Now, she straddled him while he was beneath her.
“What are you planning to do, Mrs. Misery?”
“Play with my food. See how you like it, Mr. Staller.”She laughed and leaned in to kiss him. She wasn’t mad at him, but she was in a good mood, enough to
bug him a little before heading out to the cart.
“You are impossible. My impossible woman. Gods, I love you!”, he said as he pulled her in for another
kiss.
She couldn’t help but laugh as he kissed her. Then he let her go. She nuzzled his neck and gave him a
kiss. Then she got off him and stood up.
“Okay, my love. I must go over there. I will be back shortly. Keep away from the flap. Please and thank
you.”
He rolled his eyes, but gave her a smile. He placed his hands behind his head, crossed his legs, and
closed his eyes.
“Good feast.”
“Thank you.”
She walked to the tent flap and wiggled her way out to minimize the light from entering. As safe as the
tent was, she knew it was still a delicate shelter.
Once outside, she had to wait a minute to let her eyes while adjusting her blanket as a makeshift dress.
All she had now was Astarion’s shoes on, her wool socks, her blanket, and a giant smile from ear to ear.
Just knowing that god made flesh inside that tent wearing nothing more than a smile which she gave
him, was enough to make her sprout wings. She would fly to the moon and back if only to thank her for
leading her right to that beach. Tav gave a silent scream out of joy. She did a little shimmy to control her
emotions, and began to get her things to prepare her food.
She placed her small pan on the fire which had died down. She added a bit of wood he had left for her.
She did another shimmy. She was giddy, but perhaps it was due to the blood loss. She got out some
cheese and dry meat. She cut up the meat to fit in the pan and added water from her drinking water skin
and put the lid on. She took a pinch of salt from her little leather salt pouch and added it to the meat and
water. Then she took a sprig of rosemary and placed it in, too. She waited for it to evaporate the water.
As she waited, she went around the tent to do a bit of scouting. It was too bright out right now. If
anything would to attack, it would probably wait for night. In the far distance, she saw glints of light,
like little mirrors reflecting the sun. Probably the paladin scouts doing patrols. She paid them no mind.
She then took a chunk of cheese and added it in and covered the pan again. She waited less now. Finally,
she put four slices of bread on top and put the lid. Now it didn’t close properly, but she just needed the
bread to be a little warm, not to make toast.
Then she removed the pan from the heat with a piece of nubuck leather to not burn herself. Then placed
the little pot on the fire and added some water. She then rummaged her pack again to find her herbs
pouch. This time it would be a nettle with dandelion root with a pinch of bloodrose berry. Once the
water started to boil, she removed this from the fire and added her herbs and a dash of honey. Then she
poured some of this into a wooden cup. She then got her fork and stabbed it in her food, took her cup,
and grabbed the pan with the leather piece.
“I’m going in.”No answer. He was probably asleep after feeding, too. She smiled at the sight.
That is the most beautiful man I have ever seen.
She sat down at he edge of their bed of pelts and began to eat. As she ate, she began to sway from side
to side. She did this when she was eating and happy. Like the shimmy she had done prior, sometimes
you just need your body to let go of excess happiness lest you pop.
As her back was to him, she didn’t notice how he was watching her sway as she enjoyed her food. He
smiled.
She’s the first person I’ve ever encountered that enjoys her meals as much. Perhaps this is part of what
she wanted me to observe. Not all love needs to result in sex, I guess. Pity, I’m quite good at it, but-… I
like this-… intimacy. She is an impossible woman. I’ve seen her in battle and she’s quite vicious, even
for me. No one would believe that she sways in happiness for eating peasant food. No banquets, no
feast, just rehydrated meat, cheese, and stale bread. No one would believe she just fed a vampire and
now drinks a tea to help her recuperate faster. She’s a sorceress and she’s none the wiser about it. And
she’s mine. Perhaps I will learn to be alive again if only for her.
His train of thought was interrupted for Tav had moved herself to have her back touch the soles of his
feet.
“Keep them there or perhaps-… can you step on my back, like push a little hard?”
“Would you like me to give you a massage instead?”
“Sure, but first step. I want to know how your feet feel on my back. I dunno-… I’m curious”, she
giggled.
She really had no real explanation for it other than, it must feel nice to have his cool feet pressed on my
back. She was right. It did feel nice.
“Are you happy now, my little weirdo?”
“Yes. Very much. I’m happier. But, perhaps I’ll take you up on the massage later. I just ate and if I lay
on my stomach, it may come out.”
“Disgusting, but fine. So, what’s the plan?”
She said with a disappointed look.
“I think we need to take the time to double check our gear and weapons. Can you sharpen mine please? I
need to get dressed and make a run to the river bank for some supplies.”
“I don’t like the idea of you going alone, but I suppose there are patrols right now and it is day time, so-
… remember you are-… pregnant.”, he said that last word with a bit of hurt in his voice.
“There it is. Yes, I will be careful and mindful, but I need to have extra arrows, just in case. I’ll fill of
with water. We need to wash some stuff and there’s no water left. But, Astarion, we will need to have
that talk sooner than later. It’s been looming over us and I need you focused.”
“Fine. Let’s talk when you come back. Be very careful.”As she stood up, she began to get dressed, but decided to not wear armor. Instead she put on her own
boots this time, her undergarments, her leather pants with cloth lining, and her short sleeved blouse. It
looked more like a green uniform than something Astarion would wear. She only got her bracers on for
these had her throwing needles. She fixed her utility knife on her belt and kept a smaller coin purse
attached, too.
“Get dressed my love, we’ve got a lot to do before we head out tonight.”
He kissed her forehead before she went to the side tent to use the restroom and get her water skins. She
was glad she wast taught how to make the necessary items to keep up her hygiene no matter what
function needed it. After all, she did have to name it after the paladin, but feel clean and fresh
afterwards.
“I’m off. See you in a bit. I love you.”
“Be very careful, my love.”
She then wiggled her way out again out of the tent and waited a little to get her eyes adjusted to the
light. She decided to just go in a straight line. She removed the other pan from Helen- the cart, to reduce
the noise. She placed her water skins on it, and took off running.
With the speed she gained, she was able to jump on it and ride it.
“I really wanted to do this! Woo!’
It was the bumpiest most uncomfortable ride, but she needed this. She couldn’t shimmy right now. At
least for right now, they were safe despite it all. Just safe.CHAPTER 13 From road bumps to baby bumps
Her trip on her cart was short-lived. She must have advanced about 2 meters before
losing momentum. She laughed some more, for she thought it was silly to do so, but she
had to be careful. She was pregnant after all.
She got off her little cart and began to push it again. It wasn’t heavy for her, but the
terrain was not ideal. She needed to focus on her lie in case she met any patrol, she
could see movement in the distance despite the hot sun baking everything in sight.
Mm-… I’m guessing the pregnant thing will have to stick. What else can I-…?
She laughed at the idea, but she thought it cleverly fitting.
I’m so sorry, my love, but your albino condition should suffice to keep you in the tent
and out at night. But, what else?
Her mischievous smile from ear to ear couldn’t get any bigger. She was clearly enjoying
adding layers to her lie and use her supposed fragility against them. Who? The Paladins,
of course. The ever self-righteous lot. She was really hoping to be right about them
sticking to their guns and protect the weak and defenseless, like her albino, frail husband
and her.
After all, she was on her third attempt.
Let’s see. Before, I said we have family in Berdusk, so I’ll just keep that. Then, this is
my third child and hoping it makes it. I buried my babies last year? I guess-… Maybe, adoctor told me that I’m the problem, but I think it’s both of us. His curse and my-… bad
blood? Bad blood-…
Her lie broke a little. She did feel like she had bad blood. But she wasn’t going to allow
her mind bring back the family she was born into. They abandoned her, and her blood
was hers now. And it was magical. She thought of Astarion stuck back at the tent and
smiled.
He’s going to hate the albino thing. I can’t wait! Let’s see-… I think that should be
enough and some water works if needed. Now, I just have to perhaps wobble? Mm-…
Perhaps that is too much. I’m just sticking out my belly and it barely shows anything.
She laughed, for making this story up was too much for her. Sure, some of her lies could
be linked back to her truth, but it was of no consequence. Her lie needed to protect them
enough to cross the River Chionthar from Berdusk, and then they would head north to
the Emerald Grove first. She hoped with all her heart that they would be doing well.
She kept walking forward and was starting to feel like the river kept moving further and
further away. It was a hot mid-summer afternoon, and it felt like the sun had a personal
vendetta with anything it touched, including her, especially her. But she was a woman
with a mission: must wash socks!
After a couple more minutes, she finally got near enough to the river to smell the smells
and to see the Paladin Patrols, too. If you can see them, they can see you. So, she began
to play up her physical discomfort. She was such a poor, unfortunate soul right about
now, while Astarion was fresh at the tent.
“Stupid rogue-… how dare he get me pregante?”, she giggled to no one.As she kept moving forward, feeling the bumpiness of the road, and how the cart just
jiggled happily away as it was pushed, her mind wandered away into memories of her
most recent adventures. Never had she imagined half of what she lived through. The
Nether brain? Being chosen to be part of it? Her of all people? But, in a way she was
thankful.
She was thankful that despite such a horrid situation with a parasite in her brain and the
impending doom, she met who she now considers family. She’d still be living moving
about from the Forest of Lethyr to Rawlinswood and back again. But now she was really
off her known map. She’d stared off in The Great Wild Wood where her family’s home
continued to cause strife. She’d walk as much as her legs had allowed her from town to
town and from river to river. Never easy, but at least better.
Once she came back from her thoughts, she had finally arrived at the river’s edge. The
river looked nice enough. She only knew that there was going to be a lot of movement
because this river happened to be important to this region of Elturgard. So far, her
friends had simply warned her to be very careful because of recent events with Elturel
resulted in its people being even more suspicious of her kind and of Astarion’s. Lucky
for her, she was stubborn enough to defy their whole world to find safe passage through
their land and into what would soon become hers.
It had been a lingering thought in her mind. What was the Underdark like? She paid
attention and when they went the first time, she was too busy with the errands they took
that she didn’t get time to really notice. Minthara talked about her view of it, but it was
limited and strange customs similar to the ones from her own blood-kin. Tav had no
intention in joining that again. She was free and was going to keep it like that. Not even
the parasites in the sky were able to strip her from her hard won freedom.Freedom and choice. Her mantras that have kept her alive and on the move. In a way,
this was the core of her love for her pale elf. He had none. He received it on accident.
She was there to bare witness. In truth, she knew her gang of misfits had a similar
situation of freedom and choice. All of them had lost theirs and the parasites in a way
pushed them into it. The difference was that Astarion was more active in his wooing.
She was hurt when he revealed that he only gave her the attention in an attempt to gain
her favor and protection. He used her for personal gain. But while he had been using his
cruel behavior of years to ensure his survival, she genuinely took a liking to him.
Perhaps it was her years of solitude that allowed him to weasel his way into her heart
then, but she did like him. A lot. And possibly more than she should have.
It was even obvious to her that her other friends in a way also took a liking to her,
though she didn’t truly understood why. It wasn’t until Karlach sat her down and told
her.
“Listen, soldier. You have something about you that people like. I guess for me is that
you’re very forgiving. Even when you don’t know a person. I mean, you gave me a
chance and even fought Wyll because of it and you met him first.”
“But that’s because he was wrong. He didn’t even know you. He just said horns equals
bad. That’s stupid.”
“Yeah, it is. But then Gale. You stuck your hand on a portal in a rock. You could have
died. I don’t know if I would have done it myself. I’m glad you did, though. He’s a
pretty great guy, a little weird, but great.”
“Yeah, I thought that was going to be a trick, but if I had been in a similar situation, I
would like someone to throw me a rope. I like Gale. He’s like a brother to me.”
“Hahaha! Much to his dislike. But I think he has gotten over it.”
“What do you mean?, Tav said, cheeks flushing red.“That face tells me you know what I mean. But Astarion beat all of us to the punch, I
guess. Lucky thief, but he is a rogue, so-…”
“WHAT?! YOU KNOW ABOUT-…”, she shut her mouth, her hand shutting it for her.
Karlach cackled while almost dropping her bottle of wine.
“Oh, Tav. I’m sorry, but yes. We all heard YOU specifically. He was trying to not make
a lot of noise himself, but we heard him, too. He didn’t take you far enough. Lucky, dog!
Hahaha But, he was quicker to get your attention. Had we placed bets, mine would have
been on Wyll, but you’ve been so aloof. It’s like you are new to this world and
everything catches your attention. Then Astarion moved ever so swiftly to catch your
attention and that was it. You locked on him.”
“This is embarrassing. You heard-… I mean-… I-… He was my first everything.”
Tav revealed her embarrassing truth. Now she doesn’t find it so, but then she was new to
feelings, intimacy, and friends to talk to about it.
“Really?! Well, now I am really jealous! But, as long as you are happy and he treats you
well.”
“I think so. I don’t know-… I don’t know what ‘well’ is, though. He is certainly nothing
like my family back in-… I’m just saying that so far I don’t feel that he is forcing me to
do anything I don’t want to. And I like his attention on me. The way he looks at me
when he thinks I’m not looking-… it makes my heart race.”
“That could be because he is a vampire. Not gonna lie, the fact that you keep offering
yourself, so he keeps off our necks-… you are truly something else and completely mad.
Never change.”
“Karlach-… Thank you for being my friend. I love you.”Karlach was a bit surprised of the L word, but felt the same. She knew that whatever
happened, Tav would always be there to help or just be.
“I love you, too, soldier.”
Tav had been walking along the river’s edge lost in her thoughts while lazily scouting
the area. She saw some potentially useful herbs and some rocks that caught her attention.
As she had been pushing her little cart, she was using it as a sort of crutch. She was very
much ‘pregante by her albino husband’ that she needed the support.
She began to practice her scenes under hear breath while checking that no one was near
enough to hear her. But, I spoke too soon. She saw a trader barge with two fishermen
getting closer to where she was and a little over, there was a Paladin Patrol. From being
alone to having way too many guards was certainly uncomfortable. It was time for her
best performance.
As she slowed down, she put her hand on her stomach and winced a little. In reality the
banishment brand that had been placed on her by her mother with some arcane magic
did actually hurt a little when she placed her hand over it. An unfortunate reminder that
perhaps she would never have the joy, but she didn’t kid herself.
What does it matter? If I can’t because of this-… it’s not like Astarion could do it
anyway. And the thought of having any other-… I’d rather set myself on fire than be
taken by another. It’s fine-.. It’s-…
She felt how her eyes started to water, so she took a deep breath to steady her thoughts.
It was show time.She let go of her emotional support “Helen Wheels” and wobbled to the edge of the
river. She was a sad sight what with her hand on her stomach and her worried face baked
by a relentless sun. Her boots splashed by the water, just a woodland creature doubting
about bending down to drink or just drown in the water.
She lifted her right arm to get the attention of the barge. She had her first idea. If they
were any kind of merchants, she might get lucky. She wanted buckets and as gods as her
witnesses, she was going to get at least one.
The first to take notice was their guard, their Hellrider armor very obvious, tiefling
female, very stern looking. She was the first to speak.
“M’lady-- you’re looking ill. Perhaps the river isn’t safe for you lest you fall in”,
shouted the guard as she motioned the fisherman to move a little closer.
Tav winced as she gave a friendly smile, then exhaled and took a step back.
“Nothing to worry about, friend. It’s just this little one is causing a stir. Say, would you
happen to be merchants, too?”, she shouted back as she kept touching her stomach while
trying to keep a smile.
“Aye! We have if you have coin!”, shouted one of the men.
Scruff looking, with a no nonsense look about him. Skin like leather due to the hot,
baking sun. All of them had the same look about them except their hired guard. She
wasn’t too friendly looking, but at least Tav felt safer trying her ruse with a woman first.
“Aye, I do!”, she said as she bent over a little wincing in pain.She then recuperated. As she looked at them again, she saw that the man who last spoke
and the guard where now boarding a smaller boat to reach her, worried faces clearly on
them. It was working, sympathy points. She’d sure bless them after this, for she still felt
bad about needing to use this ploy, but Astarion and her safety depended on it.
As she grabbed on to the cart again, breathing heavy, she shouted, “Oh, I’m sorry for the
inconvenience. I could have-… swam to you.”
The guard was now paddling towards her with the fisher man helping. They moved
quickly fearing they might have a sick woman by the river or worse. Fortunately, they
arrived quick enough to really see what was going on.
The Hellrider guard, ever vigilant, got out first and moved towards Tav. She looked like
a lioness on the prowl assessing curios prey. Tav did her best to look helpless and weak,
as a proper commoner female with a cart by the river.
Here we go. If this doesn’t work, I can always take a swim. Hopefully the parasite didn’t
affect my swimming skills.
“M’lady, are you sure you sure be here at this time of day. You clearly look ill.”, said
the guard as she stepped in to try and aid her.
“Oh, I know, see I have very little choice. This little one wants to come out and be with
his brothers when it’s not yet time-… Just like them.”
Even Tav surprised herself at the single tear that rolled down. She’s never been with
child nor was there one in there, but they didn’t know that. That was the point.The fisherman looked at her with a grim look and asked her, “Have you no husband to
aid you with your task, ma’am?”
“Aye, that I do. But, my poor dear, I have put him in a difficult predicament. You see,
his family was cursed and he took the brunt of it, my beloved.”, she held firm on the cart
to give a pregnant pause.
She continued, with the saddest ‘woe is me’ look she could imagine, “For you see, my
beautiful husband, was cursed the ‘ghost-man’ back at the village and this sun might
take him faster than our child might take me.”
She tried to give a light laugh. The guard couldn’t help herself and had to ask.
“Ghost man?”
“Aye, he was cursed albino. Pale skin like the moon’s light in the darkest night, eyes
pink on a good day, but when he’s in pain, red as rubies. But he’s a good man. He does
what he can for us. Problem was my wretched womb. Can barely keep a hope alive. Tis
our third try. Bless his soul, he keeps trusting I can do it. Anyone else would have gone
after our first.”
As Tav looked down in emberrasment, tears fell and splashed on the pebbles on the
ground as if the souls of her lost progeny would finally buried by the water. Now, her
face in such a sorrow, she directed her attention to the fisherman.
“Look at me. A mess. I apologize. My troubles are not of your consequence. I don’t
want to waste your time, but I am looking to buy.”
“Not a problem, ma’am. My own woman and I too suffered a loss. It’s not easy to
recover and I’m guessing for you this was recent.”“That it was. We’re heading to my parents home, hoping their blessing might help our
plight. May your wife be blessed with never having to go through this again, fine man.”,
Tav touched the man’s hand while smiling.
He felt an odd calming warmth, like a breeze that filled him up with peace as she did
this. Like an enchantment meant to bring him joy rather than pain.
The guard was really starting to look more concerned, likely remembering how her own
kind always struggled by things out of their control. She placed her hand on Tav’s
shoulder and spoke next.
“Listen M’lady, you should really go to Berduks, you don’t look so well. Perhaps it is
your best and safest choice right now. I can arrange for pick up of you and your illhusband?”
“Bless you, warrior. Bless you. But you see, we must pick up our belongings first and
we move slow. Right now, I am looking to buy buckets, preferably metal. My sickness
has me needed one, especially in the morning. The other-… well, I-… I cannot go in the
grasslands. My husband helps, but my dear Rupert, he can’t help me during the day lest
his skin becomes red like a cooked shrimp.”, Tav giggled at this.
Poor Rupert might have his ears turning red or at least itchy right about now.
The fisherman finally perked up. This was the sale he was looking for and the first in the
day, too. As much as he didn’t want to take advantage, both needed something: he
needed coin and she needed to get rid of it.
“Ma’am, I may be of service. I so happen to have two buckets of fish available forpurchase.”
“Oh, fine man, I am just in need of the buckets, not the fish.”
“Well, I can offer you as is for 5 gp per bucket.”
“5 gp?! I’m sorry, I don’t have that kind of money. The money I have is for the medic at
Berdusk. I’m sorry for your inconvenience. I will try my luck with another barge. Thank
you.”
The guard gave him the meanest look, and he simply gulped. It was obvious he was
spiking his price to try his luck, but the guard wasn’t having with this one at least.
He stammered his words a little, “Oh,-… Well, given-… given your circumstance, how
about I make you a deal? 2 gp per bucket o’ fish.? How’s that sound?”
Tav winced in pain again while holding her brand to make it more realistic.
“Pardon. The tyke is fussy. Well, I don’t need the fish-… do you by any chance sell salt,
too?”
“That I do. That’s 1 gp for a kilo of the best kind anywhere in Elturgard.”
“I wouldn’t expect any less, fine man. Mm-… How much would you charge for gutting
them? I mean, the smell-… the guts-… I don’t think I can-…”
She held her hand to her mouth pretending to be sick.
“Mm-… I suppose, I can-…”
Luckily, the guard was still holding her power over him. It was likely that she was not
just a hired guard, but friend. Despite it all, Tav was still in luck for this situation. The
Hellrider guard was very helpful with this almost failed interaction.Tav interjected with her brand of odd-logic all too quickly.
“Well, I am offering to pay you to gut them. You and yours can use the chum as bait for
another two buckets and make more profit. And you help a woman with a sickly
stomach, too. What do you say? Please?”
Biggest puppy dog eyes he’d ever seen. She might not have the high-elf’s grace, but she
had her charm.
Maybe that’s why he was head over heals for her despite his constant complaining, too.
The fisherman gulped, the guard smiled, and Tav was jumping from joy inside her head.
Yes! I think that’s a yes.
“Very well, miss. 2 buckets of fish for 3 gold each, that’s 6 gp. The sack of salt is 1 gp.
That makes 7gp, and the gutting of the fish, but not the scales, is 3 gp for the 2 buckets.
That comes to 10 gp.”
“Oh! thank you, fine man! May many blessings fall on you and yours!”
She said this as she looked at them both. The guard seem to like this blessing, as for a
tiefling they were hard to come by.
“Ma’am, perhaps we can help you cross the river once you and your husband are feeling
better.?”
“Oh?! That would be a blessing for us. It’s been years since I’ve visited my parents in
Berdusk, but they’re getting on in years. If you could help us with information as to who
or where for our crossing. I want to cross my little cart, too.”
“There would be no issues. It’s a couple of hours from this point to the proper crossingto Berdusk. Once you get there, we are easy to spot when we’re not in route.”
The fisherman added, “Well, that is if you need night time assistance, then we will be
there at the dock. It’s during daytime that we might not be.”
“Oh, that’s logical. Would I be able to take up on your offer tomorrow at night? Say
after sunset but before midnight? I don’t think I have the energy to make the trek today.”
“Aye. I’ll be there or one of my brothers will.”
“How much would that be?”
“Well, that’s two adults and a mule-… that’s 5 gp.”, he said this time without looking at
the guard.
“Mm-.. well, since you are taking the trouble of waiting for us, I’ll give you 6 gp. Thank
you so much.”
“Done, then. Let me go and get your items ready.”
The guard stayed with Tav as the man took the boat back, while shouting directions
about this sale. Tav looked up at the guard and smiled.
“You’re one of the good ones. Thank you.”
“Just in a day’s work, miss. Folks like us should stick together.”
“Aye, that be true.”
As they continued to wait in silence, they could see the men move about to get the things
ready, but Tav gasped. The guard was startled, and turned to look at her.
“What’s the matter, miss?”
“I forgot to ask them to sell me a burlap sack. I will need to cover my fish buckets. Oh,
dear.”, she said with a true worried look.They didn’t know she wanted the buckets filled with water to wash laundry, not to carry
the fish back in them. At this point, the fish were nothing more than a lucky bonus. No
hunting for her at least. Astarion wasn’t going to be so lucky. He might need to go, but
she didn’t like the idea much. Too many patrols.
The guard stepped forward and gave the loudest shout that frightened everyone
involved.
“Darvin! Add a burlap sack to her sale! She forgot to add it!”
Darvin waved back in agreement and moved out of sight to get it. He came into view
quickly enough.
“Thank you so much. And I’m so sorry for the inconvenience.”
“No harm done, miss. Your things will be here soon enough.”
After a couple more minutes of silence, the man, Darvin, came back with all her items
purchased. Now, she was the proud owner of two metal buckets, a sack of salt, a large
burlap sack, and a lot of fish that would last her a while, much to the detriment of
Rupert. Poor Rupert.
“Miss, let me load the things to your cart. You think it will handle it. It looks-…”, his
face was expectant to have the little cart fall into splinters with the weight.
But he didn’t know that Tav was stubborn and all she touched was given the same give.
It would hold for she willed it so.
“It will hold. I just know it will.”, she said with a proud smug look.“Very well, here we are. There. All done.”
“And here you go, young man. I thank you both for your help. I’ll be seeing you
tomorrow night. Be well.”
She handed him the money and smiled good bye. It was done. She felt her knees a bit
shaky because of the situation, but all in all, she had been successful.
Now I really think I’m going to be sick. This was too much, even for me. But, I have my
buckets and I got too much fish. That one is going to hate either me, the smell, or both.
My poor Rupert.
It was difficult for her not to cackle about her Rupert. If he knew the lies she was
spreading about him now, he’d have a fit. But she felt happy to know that for now he
was safe. That’s her first priority. Keep him safe at day time, keep him company at night
time. She was lucky that she only needed 4 hours of sleep, though. It made it easy to
keep him company.
As she saw the boat sail slowly away towards Berdusk, she moved in the opposite
direction while looking around,“Very well. Now, some plants. Let’s see what you’ve got
to offer, my beautiful.”
Meanwhile, our pale-elf stayed laying in bed for a while right after our bog-witch took
of with her, apparently, mule. He didn’t stay there for long, as much as he wanted to just
stay there and do nothing but brood, he knew he had to help out. Either that or allow his
mind to fester in his thoughts again. He knew they had a conversation pending, and
they’d have to really listen to each other and finally bury the hatchet on it. Before they
crossed that river, they needed to finalize their alignment with each other before the
likely fights in the Reaching Woods.I swear woman, I’d never thought my self the house husband, but here we are. But, I am
thankful of how much you do for me to be comfortable in our-… uh, palace.
He looked at the modifications she had thought, with his help of course, to make the tent
more comfortable. She was really enjoying having a more ‘stable’ home when compared
to just living in the forest alone. He remembered a conversation they had when they
were looking for some random sword in some ruins for coin. She liked to compare her
old life with her new life, as if everything was a wonder to her. Then he realized the
reason why. She kept moving. He always had the feeling that she was running away
from something, or someone, but now he wondered if it was from herself.
“Back in the forest, I’d stay in a good sturdy tree during the day. But with the gang, you
all like to stay put for longer. I like it”, she beamed up at him as she kept rummaging
through some barrils.
He raised his eyebrow in question, “Huh? What? You didn’t have a tent or-…?”
“Oh, no. I didn’t have money nor the idea of how to make one. Before, the houses were
already made. I was just there, but then I wasn’t. So, I just looked at the animals and
other beings and copied how they moved. The forests are not very forgiving to those
alone, even worse if you stay put.”
“Mh. And I’m here thinking you probably had a cabin hidden somewhere.”
“Nah, all I have is usually on me-… was usually on me. Then the brain thing happened.
When I woke up, all I had was my clothes. I don’t think I’ll ever get my old pack back.”
“You had something important in it?”
“Nah, I’ve got better gear and skills now-… because of you-… I mean-… all of you.”She backtracked. By now, she really enjoyed his company, but couldn’t help get a little
flustered. She didn’t want him to feel weird if he found out she was taking a liking to
him at that point. But, he did take notice. She smelled sweet, flowery, but with an earthy
tone. And when her cheeks turned red, she smelled the strongest. He also enjoyed that
she felt embarrassed when she let it slip that she was taking a liking to him without him
trying. This was new to him, too.
And to think that I, who seduced thousands upon thousands of unfortunate fools, ended
up falling for the dumb girl who still blushes at my gaze and touch. Yet, being covered
in gore and guts doesn’t faze her. What an impossible woman. But you have kept my
daggers after all this time.
He smiled at the thought for it was these little things that he needed to accept as acts of
love. Perhaps to him it was nothing, but to her it was special. She had no good gear, just
skill. So, together they all began to rebuild their armor, weapons, and even creature
comforts. He had found those daggers and thought they were pretty, a little plain, but not
too heavy. Tav was using a knife with a serrated edge on one side and a smooth side on
the other. It was more for doing tasks in a forest, not for battle.
So, he thought of her and her size. They were perfect, light weight, pretty enough, and
deadly in her capable hands. Even then, he knew that she was very capable of fighting
and defending, which was in part why he was swift in getting her attention at first. His
best defender or best protector depending on the situation.
He even remembered when he couldn’t help himself that night, while she was sleeping
under the stars. She was there, peaceful and happy. This was the first time he realized
that Tav tended to smile when she slept unless she was feeling ill or angry, which wasrare.
That night, he lost control enough to get close, so close. She smelled wonderful and was
deep asleep. He bent down, he exhaled and his cool breath was the reason why she
woke. When she did, she was shocked, but for the wrong reason. She revealed to him
time after that she thought he wanted to kiss her.
To his surprise, she bought it. She was the first thinking being that fed him in 200 years.
That level of trust is impossible to find anywhere and yet, she hasn’t stopped since.
She’s certainly been created to be my ruin.
Now, properly dressed, looking dashing as always, he began to gather the things he need
for his first house-husband task: sharpen and oil their weapons. The had to be ready and
nothing was too small today. Everything must be checked, mended, sharpened, or oiled.
Besides, it gave him something to do before he went stir-crazy. But it won’t be long
until he does, the tent is only 5x5 m.
Rummaging through both travel packs, his being the bigger one, he got his things: a
whetstone he joinked from Lae’Zel, strops which Tav made months ago, oil which he
also took, but this form Wyll. Always, a rogue after after all. He cackled at this. He
suspected they took notice, but said nothing. Perhaps it was because the ‘defacto’ leader
had his back or perhaps because they did take a liking to him. At least, that’s what Tav
swore on.
“I wonder how much longer that woman will take? How long has it been? 5 hours?”
It hadn’t even been one, 30 minutes tops. As he was brooding in his little home cage, hedecided to sit on the bed of pelts to first sharpen all blades. He started with hers, and
took great care in his work. After all, he was perfect, so his craftsmanship must be equal
to him. But, he had no choice but to let his mind wander to all the spaces he tried to not
visit.
“Today, I will teach you how to make arrow shafts. Astarion, pay attention!”
“Oh, fine. But why must I learn this menial task? I don’t shoot arrows. That’s all you.
And may I say how delicious you look when you do?”
She blushed at that, but she wasn’t going to fall for his tricks. He was supposed to be full
in more way than one.
“Be-… because, I need your help. You work faster than I do. And you are great at
making them straight. Also, they end up being better than mine. But, fine. Go and run
along. You don’t have to learn.”
“Well, I do have superior skills than most. Of course, I’ll help you. What do I have to
do?”, he swatted his hands and arms like the arrogant idiot he pretended to be.
But by now, he had learned that she would flatter him to get him to do a difficult task.
Unfortunately for him, it was part flatery and part truth. He was faster working the
wood, but her quality matched his. She just liked having them be made by him. Then he
recalled another time when they had just finished their fun after a short fight with some
gnolls.
“Now, what on earth are you doing?”
“These are free. What do you mean? Help me collect them!”
“You got me to ruin my perfect hands, and now you are collecting-… trash. I’m
insulted.”
“Insulted or not, they still work. And free! Oh, move it over, Mr. Perfect.”
“Well, that I am. But, fine. Here.”“Besides, these I don’t mind losing. Yours I always have to get back. They’re my
favorites.”
“Mh-… I’m glad to hear you appreciate my superior skills.”
She kissed him on the cheek when he was distracted collecting arrows from bodies or
the ground.
“Thank you, my beautiful. You’re superior everything is always top notch.”
Back at the tent, he kept working the blades with a slime on his faces. His fangs the most
prominent feature of his alluring smile. A smile which sure got a certain little someone’s
heart to race, but not out of fear.
Before long, he was done with this task. He picked up the things he used and then
inspected his work.
“Polished to perfection, too. But of course-…”
He looked toward the entrance flap which was fastened with a leather strap. She left
nothing to chance.
“Oh, must’ve been the wind. Any who-… what’s next?”
What was next was laundry. Not very grandiose for our Fearun’s Champion, but socks
should be washed in between the calmness of battle.
He rolled his eyes as he pulled the travel packs closer. He dumped his things on the bed,
for he knew what was in there, but he took out the things little by little from hers. He
never knew what kind of odd bottle, tin, or pouch might fall and drop it’s contents. He
learned that the hard way.As Astarion covered his nose and mouth, “What is that god awful smell?!”
Shadowheart shouted at him, “If you don’t know what she keeps in it, stop grabbing her
things, Astarion!”
Tav came running, “What did you do?! That took me a week! Now, I’ll have to make
more.”
Then Gale almost puking managed to cry, “More?! Why in heavens-…”
His stomach gave. It got worse.
Astarion cackled at the memory. The only good thing of that situation was watching
Gale losing his lunch. But, Tav did make Astarion help her collect the ingredients of her
liquid. It was the first attempt at masking a scent. Now, she had perfected her brew, but
back then was potent enough to almost kill Gale.
So now, all he needed was to grab all the clothes to wash them. From socks to wash
cloths, nothing would be spared. He decided he would leave the laundry for washing
near the entrance flap. Then, once again, there was nothing else to do. He put whatever
he could away and laid on the bed of pelts. Their softness on his skin made him close his
eyes in joy. These were made by his Tav. She always took great care so they would be
the softest for him.
“Better than the best silk, my love.”
Then a noise startled him. He stood up in one swift move, dagger in hand. It was just a
snake that slithered too close. He was getting more jittery being here with only his
thoughts as company.
As he was going slowly mad, Tav was still at the river collecting plants like a lunatic.She didn’t pay much attention to what it was or how much of it. She would deal with
that later, but for now she just grabbed, stuffed in her sack, repeat. The only care she
took now was to not touch the poisonous ones.
Her objective was simple, anything goes and everything is good. Once she’s back at
camp she’ll see what she can make, but for now, no time should be wasted. As she
walked the river’s edge, she’d grab cat tail, and bog myrtle; right in the bag. Then she’d
move away from the cart to get some dandelion: right in the bag. Then the stinging
nettle would catch her attention and grab that, too. Patch of mint? joink. A bit of yarrow
root? Take that, too. Watercress? Why not cress?
She was busy collecting her plants that she didn’t notice the Paladin guard who’d notice
a “suspicious female collecting herbs”. His kind is very much into everyone’s busyness
except their own. So, obviously, she had to be stopped lest she offend some god with a
penchant for disturbing your happiness.
The paladin shouted at her to get her attention.
“Woman! You there, ma’am! Halt!”
Tav was mid-scavenging session with her plants and stuffed sack. She was bent forward,
so she just placed her hand on her back as she lifted her self up slowly. She wiped her
forehead and winced a little.
“Who? Me?”
“Yes, you. What are you doing by the river’s edge?”
“I didn’t know I need a permit to be here. Where do I get it?”
“What?! No, I mean-… commoners don’t have permission to collect witch herbs.”“Witch herbs? What do you mean? Which is which? Witch herb?”
The paladin was stunned with the sheer stupid question she just asked. It took all of
Tav’s power no to laugh at that. She thought it sounded funny, but had to look just as
confused as him. His companion did laugh at the sheer absurdity of this random
interaction.
“What I mean, you people have no permission to be collecting herbs to make your witch
craft”
Cue in her pregnant woe is me act. She touched her brand to get a realistic wince and
perhaps a little tear.
“Young man,”, she panted, “I’ll have you know that tea is helping me and my child
survive. I can barely keep anything down. It ends my nausea.”
“But-…”
“But nothing, young man! I will not allow your crazy ideas kill this one, too.”, she bent
over holding her stomach.
The other guard got closer to help her while holding a hand up to interrupt the
conversation.
“Pardon us, ma’am. He’s new and young. He’s learning the ropes. You say this is not
your first?”
“No offense taken, but I-… the doctor said this is my last chance-… and tea helps. I’m
hopeful my dear Rupert and I get at least one blessing. They say third luck’s a charm.”,
she said this with a pained voice and tearful eyes.“I’m s-...sorry, ma’m. I didn’t-…”, the first paladin said looking very embarrassed and
very red.
“Why would you? You just saw me and judged me like everyone else! Tyke killer, they
whisper. You think I want my beloved gifts to go to the heavens before I get to name
them?! My poor husband blames himself, with his family’s curse, and now my wretched
womb can’t even hold a whisper. Then I get blamed by strangers-… I just want tea to
calm my nerves. I’m at my wits end here, soldier.”
“I’m very sorry, ma’am. We have a decree that we inspect the herbs folks collect. We
must keep an eye on improper worship and my partner, just thought-…”, tried to explain
the second palandin before being cut off.
“Of course, copper skin, pointy ears, walking in the river’s edge. She must be one of
them. I’ll have you know my mother was bewitched by a wood-elf and then was left to
raise me alone. We’re not all like, them.”, she lied.
She was one of them, one of the worse kind of them. She couldn’t help it. Her voice
broke and her tears escaped her soul this time. She knew her kind were hated, but to
remember you hate yourself on the spot while trying to lie to stay alive, it’s a little hard.
Both Paladins were now clearly uncomfortable and wanting to be anywhere but there.
“Ma’m, we’ll leave you be.”
She did her best to compose herself. Now wasn’t the time nor the place for her real
troubles to surface.
“Sure, but before you go, I’ll accept your apology if you help me. I need those skins
filled, and that log secured to my cart with those straps.”, she commanded while lookingat them defiently.
She then took her fish and placed them in the burlap sack. Now the cart was starting to
fill up. She took the buckets to the river, too, and began to give them a quick rinse.
“No, you. Help me with these buckets. I need water to bathe. Doctors orders. The 2 on
the cart.”
She was like a stern grandmother who was no longer tolerating nonsense from her
misbehaved grand kids. The second paladin helped while laughing. Never in his mind
did he imagine a short human hybrid would first take offense at being called a fey,
second get scolded by one for ruining her tea leaf scavenging. The fact that now he was
repenting by helping her carry water and a log back to her camp was priceless. And it all
started because of the new guy.
As for the new guy, he sure had learned his lesson. Never pester a pregnant woman, fey
or not.
“Here you go, ma’am. I’m really sorry.”, the first paladin said while he placed the
second bucket in the cart.
“Ma’am”, said the second while walking away backwards. Keeping his eyes on Tav as if
she’d sprout fangs.
Well, she couldn’t, but her Rupert sure could.
“Thank you, gentlemen.”
She waited a little while to make sure they didn’t change their mind and come back to
finish their job for they weren’t too far off the truth. Thankfully, Tav had gotten ratherconvincing today.
My goodness! That was the worst! I need to go home and just lay on the floor for a
couple of hours. Maybe 2, no less, 5. Well, time to get back to my Rupert shrimpstarion.
I’ll keep that to myself.
She smirked while she slowly pushed the cart back. But then she stop dead on her tracks.
“My rocks!”
She turned left the cart and walked back with her wooden tray in hand, scouted the area
and found a good spot. She sat down not minding the water and began grabbing
whatever was useful. Free outweighed quality in her mind. Besides, she’s been using
nature since she lived in the forests.
Then, carefully standing up like how she thought a pregnant woman sitting on the floor
would stand up. She was surely committed to the bit. That and she didn’t know who else
might be lurking around. So, she wobbled her way to her Helen-cart, placed her tray on
top of the buckets, and began to push.
But this was not going to move. At all. It was far too heavy and without Astarion here,
this cart would be just as stubborn as a mule. So, change of plans. She pushed over her
elm drift wood to the floor. It landed with a soft thud on the dry grass.
With an annoyed looked, she told the wood, “We’re dragging ass, my love. But I’m not
coming back for you. You best roll.”
She began pushing the cart at a snail pace, while she looked around. She could see somearmor glint in the distance and a boat. She would have to fake it for a little longer. Push
the cart. Stop. Drag the log with the leather strap. Stop. Rinse. Repeat.
She was already spent, and sweaty. Her back hurt from trying to stick out her nonpregnant belly in her bit.
How do women do it? Heck! How do wolves, they have more? I have nothing and I’m
already tired.
She did this for about 5 minutes and advanced just enough to not be able to see folks. If
you can’t see them, they can’t see you.
I’m going to have rock hard everything by the time I get home. But, now let’s kick you
on over, love.
She began to kick the log with enough force that it would roll a couple of times before
stopping. Now it was to rinse and repeat.
Makes me wonder if my Rupert is busy. Times like this I’d like the parasite, so he could
help… Nah, Astarion tentacles is not it. Ew.
She cackled at the thought of his drama show if he had turned. We’re glad he didn’t.
As all these overly nonsensical moments that happened to Tav, our dear Rupert was
none the wiser back home-… the tent. Doing what little he could, but mostly going stircrazy with his thoughts inside a cloth cell that wasn’t rather small at now 5 by 5 meters,
even for Tav. But, it couldn’t be helped. She wanted a poop tent and sacrifices had to be
made or at least that’s what she claimed. They just had to work their magic fingers torearrange the canvas material from her Tent and his.
Back at the tent, he dragged himself off the pelts he was lying on and decided to
something to keep busy again. He was getting even more restless. He was fussing over
the clothes and armor pieces they had decided to carry with them. He inspected the clean
items that could use a little mending.
He took some of his clothes and placed them on the bed to fix up little threads that had
come lose or torn. Then he took some of Tav’s and winced.
Honestly, this woman’s fashion sense is criminal. But then again, she’s still in
the habit of making her own. Well, I suppose it is useful to blend in with the
environment-… but, must she always be so tight-fitting? My imagination gets the best of
me with this one.
He was examining one of Tav’s oldest vests made of black dyed leather, which hugged
her curvy body in all the right places. To him, she had her wild charm. Her caramel skin
for starters. She wasn’t tall by any high elf standard and had dark brown hair in soft
curls. Her eyes dark as night, a button nose, soft thick lips, and a smile that would make
his heart explode out of his chest, were it to beat again.
But she was a warrior, a fighter, so she had strong arms and legs. She could take on
Karlach on a fist fight despite the terrifying height difference where Tav stands at her
glorious 1.5 meters tall and Karlach is an amazing 1.92 meters tall. Tav would still give
her a run for her money. Her legs where strong, thick, yet obviously not very long. She
would be able to beat a mule in a kicking match. He thought that was because of all that
walking, but when they were intimate, he’s taken notice that she was stronger than what
he initially thought.“I swear this woman was made to ruin me.”, he muttered as he smelled her vest.
He placed it on the bed and collected all other items that were clean to double check
them. The things that were dirty were already waiting in the pile by the entrance flap to
be washed later. So, he got his mending kit: needle, thread and some scraps in case he
needed to make patches.
This kind of busy work allowed him to focus and minimize his wandering mind, but
today was not his lucky day. He had a lot of things on his mind, not just the areas of Tav
he found alluring, Perhaps he was just hungry, or maybe he simply didn’t like to be
away from her anymore.
While on the bead, he saw the pumpkin looking back at him. He finally saw what she
meant about ‘reminding her of him”, it did have a coy smile. He liked that she found his
smile to be one of the many things she love about him. She shouldn’t in his opinion, but
he had stopped trying to dazzle her long ago. It wasn’t necessary, just being present, or
an accidental touch was enough for her to get giddy to this day.
He remembered when she told him that in one of the many jobs they picked up for coin.
“Why do you try to dazzle me with your sensual ways? It’s-… I don’t know-… I mean,
if you need something, just ask. I’ll probably say yes, anyway.”
He saw her turn around pretending to look at a wall that suddenly became the most
interesting thing in the world.
“Mh-… you’re no fun. But, very well. Tonight, would you care for a bit of fun?”“Fun like fun? Or, fun like you want sex fun?”
“Gods! Must you be so crass? Yes, sex, Tav. I’d like for you and I to have sex. Tonight.
Your tent. Yes?”
She forced herself to look at him before she gave an answer.
“Yes. Tonight. Feed, too?”
“What?! I mean-… well,… that is-…”
“I have no issues with it. I want you-… I mean, you don’t have to if you don’t want to,
but-… but if you need, we can.”
Both, couldn’t help themselves, but they were starting to get embarrassed. Tav didn’t do
well with flirting. She was very direct and practical back then and Astarion, despite
seeing everything as transactional, he found her very peculiar. She clearly didn’t
understand how people usually initiated intimacy. She was too direct. “Do you want
sex? Yes. Me too. Let’s do sex.” It was horrible in his opinion, but he liked her
company. She liked to copy his actions, too, so that made him enjoy himself more.
Perhaps it wasn’t the best that he was teaching her his depravity, but he secretly thought
she was just at bad, but was still honing her skills.
But not all memories brought a smile to his face. The lingering conversation still
loomed, and knowing her, she was not going to drop it. So, while he was working the
needle and thread, he allowed the events of the tavern flood back in like an angry river.
That wretched woman and her nosy disposition! I mean, sure right now I don’t have the
economical means to buy a steady home, but I’m a traveling journey man. What use is a
house to me, now. Besides, like Tav said, this is our home and together we’ve made this
livable. Hell, it is more comfortable than what mine was before. Sure, I preferred hers
back in the day, but to think of it, she would have let me be there without the fun. It
doesn’t matter. As for children-… I mean-… would I-… could I? I can’t even remembermy own parents now, and-… But, what if she wants them? I don’t want to rob her of the
chance like I was. Perhaps, if-… Who am I kidding? That woman would never consider
it. If it is not me, it’s not going to happen. I just don’t understand why she’s so-…
giving. No one has a heart like hers. And out of all of us, she chose me! Why in the
hells?! I was horrible with my game of seduction and now look at me, the house
husband to a fiery fey.
Something slithered outside and took him out of his trance and thoughts. His eyes
snapped open, hand on his blade. It was just a snake slithering too close to the tent wall.
Luckily, there had been no other things that could cause a bother.
But in the distance, he heard rattling and perhaps kicking? He couldn’t open the flap to
check yet. It was bright out. That just got him more annoyed. Then the noise stopped
and he got nervous.
“Tav, don’t scare me like that. Why did you stop moving?”, he said with a nervous
glance at the entrance.
The reason Tav had stopped was simple, she was picking up some grass. She was
working on her little flowers non the wiser. Now, with little flowers on her hands, she
was trying her best to push the cart and kick the log to get home faster.
Then he heard the cart pick up speed again, and the kicking was now closer.
“She’s almost home. Good. I was getting nervous.”
But we know that is a lie. He was nervous for her safety. She practically went into
enemy territory because he needed to do laundry. A mad woman, in his opinion, butthankful of her practicality. He wouldn’t have gone through all the trouble.
“There’s home. I’m so close, and tired. I think I want to clean up and lay down for a bit,
before I get to my fish. Or maybe the fish first then the rest-… I hate that plan. Fish
first.”
The minutes felt like decades the closer she got, but she got there. She got near the tent
so he could hear her.
“Astarion, I’m back. There is still a lot of light out. I need to do some work outside first.
Try to calm your mind. It will be sunset before you know it.”
Astarion was standing right at the flap, shoulders tense. As he heard her, he relaxed all
the tension he had on his shoulders.
“Fine. Welcome home, my dear.”
“Thanks. And Astarion, I missed you. Here.”
She stuck her hand inside with the saddest bouquet of flowers he’d ever seen. Yellow
grass twisted into a ball trying its best to look like a rose and two yellow dandelions that
were a little bent. His smile could light up the darkest reach of the Underdark. She
usually gave him acts of service but this was her first thing she made. It was ugly and it
smelled of dry grass and dandelions, but she thought of him when she made it with her
hands. And all because she missed him. They were 10 minutes away if running. They
were surely insufferable.
“Thank you, my love. It’s beautiful.”, he told her as he leaned in to kiss her hand.She blushed. “I’ll be inside as soon as I can.”
Tav began busying her self with the fish. She had a knife on her and used that to remove
the fish scales. They began to fall in a little pile at her feet. The fish smell now very
obvious, after all she had bought about 2 kilos worth of it. It would have been more, but
now they had no guts.
I got lucky. I don’t want to fight Gnols tonight because of my
food. Maybe Astarion needs one, though.
Astarion tried his best not to burst out of that tent, but at least she was outside.
“Beloved, can you leave the green pack near the flap, please? I need some things.”
“It’s there.”
“Thanks.”
Her hand reached in and took it, as he made sure to step back just in case light got in.
“What are you doing?”
“Well, have I got a story for you. I had an unexpected purchase and I’m cleaning it
before it spoils.”
“Is what I smell anything to do with it?”, he asked while making a face in disgust.
“It is. Two kilos worth of it. I am descaling it. I will dry it. I am not a fan of it either, but
food is food.”
“Indeed. Food is food for you.”, he rolled his eyes.
“Of course. On the bright side, I don’t have to worry about food for a while. The
downside, it’s fish.”She giggled at this. Neither were very fond of fish, but it was a blessing to have food
without the hard work of catching it, or gutting it. So, for the next 30 minutes, he
brooded inside as he paced like a poor trapped lion, as she worked as fast as she could
removing the scales into a little pile.
“There! Done! The sun is still out, but it won’t be long until the sun sets. Hang in there,
sweetie. It’s almost over. Now, I just have to salt it and-… Let’s see-…”
She decided to tie the burlap sack from the tightening rope of the tent to the side of the
cart. This made a sort of makeshift table where she placed the now salted fish. She’d
leave it here for it to start drying. She added an extra layer of salt for good measure.
She smugly looked at her mess and said, “There we are. I think it will hold.”
Then she finally headed inside with caution. She was exhausted and thus clumsy.
“I’m going in. Stand back, please.”
First she grabbed one of the water skins from the cart. For now, she’d keep the rest of
the water to counter balance the fish. She wanted the sun to do it’s job. Then she would
smoke it on the fire. Finally she took off her messy boots and left them a little to the side
of the entrance. She’d do those later. Now barefoot, she brushed one foot on her
opposite leg and stepped in, then did the same for the other. She stood there for a bit to
find him. He looked like she thought he would, stressed.
“Hey, my love. I just need to wash up. Give me a minute. But can you put this in there,
please?”She handed him the water skin with a smile. His eyes showed longing, but he did as
requested. She felt dirty and smelly and she would not accept his touch. He had to wait
until she felt decent. So, he stepped in the tent for now the sun was on the other side and
no light could affect him. He just closed that flap to keep the breeze from coming in.
While he was in there, she saw the pile of dirty clothes and simple stripped down to
nothing. So, when Astarion came back into the main tent, he looked up and was
shocked. His beautiful naked woman was walking towards him.
“I’ll wash that later.”
“Uh-… of course. Later.”, he managed to stammer.
You can’t do this to me woman. You smell of fish, but-…No, it’s too much
even for me. I’ll wait.
He instead decided to sit down on the bed and wait for her to come out. Poor Rupert. All
he’s done today, during daytime, is do nothing but wait.
Tav took this time to not just wash up, but to think on how to, like we said, bury that
hatchet. She was tired, and annoyed and didn’t want to give this topic anymore time to
keep festering in her head. She figured it would be worse for Astarion.
Should I tell him what happened or just finish our talk? I mean, they are
connected, so… But, mmm-, let’s see, how do I start? Parhaps-… I have an idea.
She let her ideas merge back and forth as she cleaned up. She had poured some water in
the small basin she usually kept in the pack, which was a bag of holding. It was still
curious witch craft for her, but She thought it hilarious when Gale almost ate it. Lae’Zelgave him a look. But Tav gave him some gloves instead. She thought he probably likes
the leather taste. It wasn’t very good, but we all have our preferences. She loves a
vampire, Gale eats leather gloves, and Lae’Zel likes to give mean looks.
She used the a new washcloth that he had left her just like the basin. She added the soap
to her wet washcloth and began with her face, then a little more water and continue
down her body. She tried her best to not finish up the water now, for she wasn’t in the
mood to go again for more tonight.
As she was almost done, she poured the remaining soapy water on her head to quickly
scrub her hair. With soapy eyes, she tried to get more water to rinse off, she almost
slipped, but was able to finish up.
“Oh, I forgot the towel again.”
As Astarion heard that he stood up and was heading to the packs to get her one, she
stepped out of the tent soaking wet. She took a deep breath and exhaled while looking at
the floor. Astarion heard her but was still focusing more on getting her the towel. She
looked up to see him.
“Astarion? Look at me.”, she said with a quiet determination.
It was time.
“Tav? Is everything all right?”, he said quizzically.
Deep inside he knew it was time, but he didn’t think she would do so now. She was
exhausted.“Maybe-… Look at me. See this? I told you about my branding before. Do you-… Do
you remember what I said about-… this-… mark?”
It was difficult to keep her emotions in check. She didn’t want to cry. Not yet. She
needed to be clear with her thoughts and emotions.
“Uh-… yes. It carries a lot of-… Yes, I remember.”
“I don’t know what it has done to me physically. I was not there long enough to learn
about it, but when I touch it-… when I touch it it burns, but not on my skin. It-… It
burns deeper inside me.”
As she said this, a tear rolled down. She was afraid to confront this truth she kept from
herself for years.
“Oh, that’s-…”, he moved to comfort her.
He hugged her wet body and kissed the top of her head. Then he let go and stepped back
to look at her once more.
She looked at the floor and with a faint whisper, she revealed a truth that scared her.
“I have not bled since.”
As his mind raced to remember that night when she revealed her past to him back in the
woods, his face revealed his shock and sadness. He fell to his knees and reached to hug
her stomach. His cool skin made her give a little jump, but she didn’t step back.“Oh, my Tav. Were you robbed, too? I’m so sorry.”
Her hands went to his head and she began to run her fingers through his hair.
“I don’t know for sure, but I’ve always felt that it wasn’t normal. But, who could I go to-
… how can I check if-… I didn’t know. I still don’t know.”
He turned his head up to see her. His sadness was clear. They had gone through so much
alone and with each other and now, his inadequacies he’d been feeling started to feel
irrelevant. She was broken like he was.
“Astarion, I know you haven’t been out of that demon’s hold for very long. I understand
that you will struggle with your own self because of it for who knows how long. But I
need you to understand that I don’t see the truth in the brand he left you. Your scars will
forever be part of you, both the ones on your skin and the ones inside. I know, because I
have my own.”
He hugged her again to no see her. He didn’t want to hear it. He was scared to admit it.
But she always knew how to be direct and blunt about the things she saw. She always
chose truth, even when it hurt.
“I have to come clean. I really hate when you continue to choose to hate yourself. You
hate the man I love. You hate the man I want to be with-… the man I choose to be with.
It hurts me when you doubt yourself because you also doubt me. That hurts me, but I
understand why you do it.”
He squeezed her a little tighter. He didn’t want to listen, but the bandage had to be
ripped out in one go. He had no choice now.“You have been free for such a short time and I know it is frightening to learn to be
again. Especially you. I was lucky. I was a child, but you were consious of your torment
for centuries. That’s why it hurts me because I can’t get mad at you for not believing
your worth. But, I do and I’m so sorry.”
“Oh, Tav! You don't-…”
“I do. I know sometimes I am not patient. I know that I am quick to anger. I know that
part of that is because of my father and my clan’s doing. I came from rot and that is in
me forever. My anger is part of it. That’s why I am convinced that you can come from it
but choose to do better, be better.”
She took another deep breath; she had to get it all out before this day was done. They
both did for they knew distractions tomorrow night will result in death for either or both.
Today was all or nothing.
“I try my best to allow you to choose and I hope to the gods that you choose me, too.
But, it gets exhausting that I am afraid you will let him win. That you will break your
resolve and I wake up one day and I will be alone. Without you-… without you, I’m
nothing. I don’t want it. If It’s not with you, I choose not to be anymore. To me you are
my light in my world of darkness. Astarion, I love you more than I love my fun. I love
you more than my wish to erase my rot. I don’t want to be with anyone else. I want you
and you alone. I know I’m selfish but I told you once before, and I tell you again, I still
feel that energy, I still feel my stomach go crazy, I still feel like you are the missing
piece I didn’t know I was missing. I don’t know how it happened and I still don’t, but
my soul needs you to find peace. My chaos inside calms down when you’re around. I
don’t want to go back into the darkness, I will fade and I’m terrified to face away
because you’re gone.”She was done. She wept. He stood up and held her tightly, letting her head rest on his
chest. He felt her hot tears run down his chest in a way cleansing him from the poison
Cazador had fed him for so long. As he held her fearing that she would disappear, he
remembered what she told him many moons ago.
The night was calm and everyone else had gone to sleep. It was just them two sitting at
the camp fire sitting in silence. She was lost in thought observing the flames, but
occasionally she would give a light smile at no one. As he stole some glances to look at
her, his mind wandered.
You’re not a victim and you’re not a target, so what ever in the world could you be?
She saw him looking at her with eyes full of longing.
“Astarion? Are you alright?”
“Huh? Yes-… No,-… I don’t know.”
“Oh. Would you like me to go and leave you be?
“No, please. Stay. I want you-… I want you to stay.”
“I want to stay too, with you.”
“Thank you-… Tav?”
“Yes?”
“What-…”
He turned his face away from her. He was embarrassed to ask, but he needed to know.
“What do you think about me? How do you feel about me?”The question startled her. She was expecting anything but this. She hadn’t really thought
about it before, she just did.
“Well, that is a loaded question-… questions. I don’t know-… I mean, let me think
about the proper words.”, she quickly said when she saw how he recoiled as she said she
didn’t know.
“Well, there are a lot of things I like about you. I think you are very smart. I have
learned a lot from you, especially how to talk to people. You are very un-apologetically
you, and I love that. I know that I talk like an idiot sometimes, so I like how you move
about. What else? I like your sense of humor and when you lose control when you laugh.
I enjoy your mischievous laughter when you are about to do something bad.”
She laughed at this for she too had a dark sense of humor.
“I like when you help me with things like how to throw daggers and when you help me
understand what some books say. That’s very nice of you. I really like when you tell me
your funny phrases to get me to notice you. I always notice you, so there’s no need, but I
think you like to talk like that, so I don’t mind. It’s just a little confusing sometimes and
then I clarify and you give me a sour look.”
Then her cheeks flushed red and she looked at the fire instead. She continued.
“The thing is that-… I don’t know how this happened. I never felt this before, but I don’t
feel this for anyone else. Not Gale, not Wyll or even Halsin. They sometimes look at me
the same way you do. I don’t mind it, but with you it’s always been different. You ever
feel that energy if you get a really thick coat and you rub it on your body. You have that
zap of energy when you touch something else. That’s what I feel with you. When I look
at you or when I find that you are looking at me, I feel this energy jump in my heart, andmy stomach. I like it. When you are near me, I feel a tingle on the back of my head, like
I’m dizzy, but I’m not. I-… I feel like-… like I was missing something and I didn’t
know it. But then, I met you and I found it. I like how that makes me feel. I’m sorry.
That’s selfish, but it’s true. You don’t have to do anything and I just feel at peace to
know you are here-… with me, even if we aren’t together. But to know that you are here
and you are safe, it calms my heart. Like my heart was working at half capacity, but now
it’s working at full capacity because it thinks of you. I don’t know. It’s stupid, I guess.”
She then looked at him in a panic moving her head and arms to show her negation.
“I mean, I’m not asking you for anything. I just feel happy that you are here and that I
have the chance to be here, too. I don’t want to imagine what will happened when we
are done with the parasites and I have to go back the any woods alone.”
It was a lot for him to take in. He was expecting, hoping even that she would say she
liked his body or hair, but this girl, this impossible girl poured out her soul to him. Him!
The man that became her first intimacy for personal gain and protection, was now the
reason for this girl to not want to go back to her old life.
He looked at her with a bit of a shocked expression, then his eyes softened.
“You have no idea how much I needed to hear that, Tav.”
He stood up and walked to her. Then he sat beside her and took her hand. They just sat
down for a little longer in silence. He felt the same about her, but at that time, he wasn’t
ready to admit it. But today we was.
Back at the tent, he let go of her and turned to get her a towel. He helped her put it overher body, and led her to sit on the bed. They sat together in silence for a bit.
Then he found the courage to continue the conversation.
“Tav, time ago, I asked you what you liked about me, what you thought of me. You
gave me an answer I was not able to understand then, but I think I am ready now.”
She looked at him with sad eyes but an honest smile. He smiled at her and began to give
her the answer she had been waiting for.
“This is not easy for me. Give me a minute. I love your resilience. I love the passion
with which you defend anyone, and everyone, especially me-… from myself. I love how
you smile when you sleep. I love your scent of wild flowers and earth after rain. I love
that you are clever and find ways to complete a task despite the set backs and you do it
with an honest, friendly smile. I love the wild fierce look you have about you like the
untamed wilderness that raised you. I love that you don’t laugh, but cackle as if you
allowed your soul to release your happiness. I love that you don’t force me to choose
you and do what you want me to do. All my life, I had nothing, no choice, but then here
comes you, begging in silence, so I would choose you, but then you do so many
impossible things for me and I choose you day after day, too. Perhaps I am selfish, too. I
mean, I get to live through you. The way you are so human without caring about other’s
opinions. I love how life is exciting with you around. I love that you inspire me to
choose to be me, who ever that may be, but that you don’t push. You let me flow at my
own pace, despite my set backs. I love you. You did allow me the space to figure out
who I am and what I want. After all this time, I realize that I do want you. You had been
by my side through all of that and even through all of this, and you keep choosing to do
so. You’re still patient. You still care. You continue to trust me and that hasn’t stopped
being an objectively stupid thing to do. Before I felt safe with you, but now I know that Iam safe with you and because of you, even from myself and my past. I feel seen. I don’t
want to lose that. You told me then that whatever may come, you got me. And you still
do! Gods, you still do! Thank you. I told you that I had been dead in the ground long
enough. That I’d try living again, but I haven’t, have I? I’m sorry. I love this home
we’ve made for ourselves in the middle of peril. I still want it all-… with you. You still
see something in me. Someone else I can be. Someone that can break that cycle of
power and terror that started centuries ago. You saved me back there and you continue
to save me now. I really appreciate that. You’ve believed in me. Believed I was enough.
That I am enough just the way I am. You have fought me to save me from myself. Even
when I lose control. I understand that I am free and that you help with that despite my
cursed circumstance. This is a gift. You are my gift. I too feel that jolt of energy when I
look at you, when I see you, when I smell you. You complete that side of me that was
empty. I guess it was empty because I was also waiting for you and I didn’t know it.”
“Astarion.”, his name escaped her lips as she saw him struggle coming to terms with his
own truth.
“Tav, I know I’m not easy to love. But, I ask you to keep giving a chance to prove to
myself that I am worthy of being loved, of being seen, of taking up space. That’s what
I’ve learned from you. I am enough and I am loved. And perhaps, we may not be
conventional in by any means, and we can’t have children, and I don’t have the coin to
buy you a house, but, I want to be with you even if we have to live in a tree or a hole in
the ground.”
“Beloved, my Astarion, with you to hell and back. I would set the world ablaze if only to
keep you warm. I need you here with me. Can you gift me that? Please?”
“I won’t leave you, Tav. Not now, not ever. Now, I understand what you’ve meant
before. There is no life after this, is there?”
“No, I don’t think so. You are my life, Astarion. I love you.”“I love you, Tav.”
She leaned in to kiss him and pushed him on the bed, feeling free. Perhaps now, he
would not forget again. He is worthy. He matters. He is loved by many and by no one
more than her.CHAPTER 14 In your marks, get set,…
As she’s kissing him, the fire lives inside her ignited ten fold. His energy was
reciprocal. They had just buried the hatchet on a topic that had been lingering
since before Baludur’s Gate exit.
They had been in a back and forth about their true feelings for months now,
and you can only carry on for so long until you have to stop playing and
address it.
What we now know, she loves a man that’s been cursed. She refuses to let
him go. She acknowledges it will be difficult for them every single day to be
together. She understands that her love is hard work, but for her it’s
rewarding.
As for our Lord Astarion Ancunin, it will be a difficult journey ahead. You
can’t fix trauma in less than a year, but you can take it one day at a time.
Now, he’s come clean about his actions and feelings, so it’s up to him to put
in the work to help himself. No one can do it for him, not anymore. She
already threw him a life line. He took it. He will need to climb out of the hole
he was trapped in, but for now, all is well.
He allowed her to take control of the moment. She pinned him down and
stradled him as she kissed his lips with an urgency, as if he was going to
disappear if she didn’t take him now. As she laid her kisses, she placed them
on his forehead, on each of his closed eyes, on his cheeks, on the tip of his
nose and once again on his lips. As if each kiss was a blessing from her to
ensure he never forgot he was loved and by no one more than him.
She slid down to kiss his neck. She could smell his faint scent. It was clear to
her what all the stories said about his kind, but to her, he was home. She
loved her home and the scent of home. And he enjoyed being the one beingloved. Years of torture and servitude, be dammed. Now it was him who was
going to receive the attention, because to her, he was worth it.
She stopped and sat up straight as she was still on top of him, her strong legs
pinning him down on each side. Her whole body on top of his strong
stomach, with his hands grabbing her by the waist.
She needed to look at him there, being loved by her. His soft white curls
messy now. His ruby red eyes looking up at her beaming up with joy. His
soft smile with a hing of fangs. He was the most beautiful man she’d ever
seen. There she swore that anything and everything she would do from this
point onward was to erase the demons of the past and focus on the brightness
of their future.
It would become her life’s work to ensure he never felt less than nor dream of
his torture. He will live. He will be loved. And he will thrive. After all, she
was the impossible woman and that was her expertise; to to the impossible.
Tav with a loving smile told him as much.
“Astarion. You are the most beautiful man I’ve ever seen. Let me love you.
Let me share my happiness with you.”
He was shocked for despite everything that had happened recently and
months back, he’d never expected those words to come out of anyone’s
mouth, even hers. His face showed as much.
“I will never leave you, my moon and stars.”, she said as she leaned in to kiss
him again.
As if her spell was almost complete. Her touch, her kisses, her words, all
meant to become a barrier on his skin, on his very essence. As if her soulfinally was ready to take him in and give him back the soul which had been
stolen. Now they would share one spark. One could not exist without the
other. That was her claim. He was hers. She was his. And that’s how it had to
be.
As a tear rolled down the side of his eye, he spoke, but it wasn’t easy. He was
overcome with emotion for this woman was showing him that he was there.
He exists. He is loved. He matters. And no other woman will ever love him
more than her. His Tav.
“Tav-… thank you.”
“I’ll take that as a ‘Yes, I concur.’ That’s all I needed to hear, my Astarion.”
She kissed him again with even more urgency. Her lips traveled from his lips
to his neck, shoulders even. At one point, she lightly nipped at his skin. Small
little bites not intended to hurt, but her dominance was obvious. She was
ensuring that he understood that he had been claimed and the only way she
knew how was how it was done in the wild. Animals bite.
Every time she had a little nibble, he’d giggle for he never thought of doing it
himself, on her. Besides, she was rather ticklish and at times he had to pull
back a little or she’d not be able to breathe from laughter. But now, no tickles
seemed to faze her.
She kept moving down, going back up and going back down again. Every
surface available would be kissed or nibbled on. She started on his right side.
His cool skill touched by fiery lips from his shoulders down to his arm. She
kissed his wrist, turned his hand over and kissed the top of his hand. Then she
kissed his knuckles. Finally, she took his right hand and placed it on her
cheek. The coolness of his touch felt like a delicious caress of a winter
breeze. She closed her eyes and smiled at the feeling. Her face full of bliss.
Then she carefully placed his hand down. He moved it back to her thigh and
began to massage it softly moving his thumbs in a circular motion. He wasenjoying this more than the other thousands of bodies he’d been forced to
seduce. This time he was the one being seduced, loved, taken care of.
“Mm-… Tav. Don’t stop.”
“Shush. I’m busy.”, she said as she started kissing his collar bones and neck
again.
She was enjoying this as much as him, perhaps more. This was the first time
she dared take the lead for real. And she was doing everything that felt good.
She bit his left shoulder a little to hard and he winced a little.
“I’m so sorry!”, she said in a panic.
“Don’t stop.”, he purred with his eyes closed. He certainly didn’t mind.
She kissed him extra where she had bitten him a little too hard and he gave
her a little moan. He was really feeling his oats right about now. She
continued kissing his arms, as if every muscle line he had must be kissed lest
they demand it. Finally, she kissed his left wrist, turned his hand over, kissed
the top of his hand and finally kissed his knuckles. Then again placed his
hand on her cheek. The happiness this caused her was overwhelming.
“I love you my star.”
He smiled in full bliss with his eyes closed.
She placed his arm down carefully once more and he placed this hand right
on her thigh. Then she leaned forward to kiss his chest, kissing every part of
his chest from side to side. The feeling of his skin on her hot face was the
best feeling, like she was burning, but he couldn’t, so he kept her fire
contained. This meant, she could enjoy this feeling for longer. She even
nibbled on his nipples causing him to open his eyes in surprise.
“Oh! I wasn’t-…”
“Shush it. I’ll move down”
She did just that. Kiss after kiss, she was memorizing his every fiber, everyscar, every blemish, nothing was going to be left unattended. She needed to
memorize him all from top to bottom. And then she got to his waist line. By
this she was no longer on top of him, but she could smell herself on his skin.
This was still warm. She looked back at him.
“My love. Can I?”, she said as she tugged at his pants, which was the only
thing he had been wearing. That and his underwear.
“Yes, my love.”
He didn’t bother opening his eyes. He simply aided by lifting his body just
enough to slide the pants and underwear off. She did this slowly for she
didn’t want to hurt him. Not that she could, but he deserved the best care.
Then she continued her map of kisses, through ever valley and hill that she
could find. She first did his right side from his hip bone down to his little
white toes. The knee nibble made him give a little jolt. It’s not every day that
your knees are kissed. Then his right side was given the same care.
“How can you be so beautiful my star.”, she said as she looked at him with
his arms behind his head and a stupid happy look on his face.
She nudged him to turn around. He was reluctant. She bit his calf hard. He
obliged.
“I’m memorizing. Let me work.”, she said.
As she saw his broad back covered in the horrid scars, she wondered if one
day her plan with Gale would work. It was her hope to offer him the removal
of this if he wanted, but for now, they were working on it.
She got on top of him again. She wanted to smell his hair. It smelled likeyou’d expect a vampire to smell like along with the soap they had at hand. It
smelled like citronella. Then she kissed the tip of his ears and he bounced a
little as he laughed into the pelts. Then she whispered into his ear.
“You are my beautiful.”
She continued kissing the sides of his neck and she once more went down to
kiss his scars on his back. Once she got to his butt, she couldn’t help herself
and bit him. He jumped a little again.
“Sorry. It’s just there asking for it. Don’t worry, I’ll bite the other so they
don’t fight.”
He laughed as she did just that. Not a bite to cause harm, just light enough for
him to feel it. Then she continued down to his legs and to the back of his
knees. Here she blew hard. And laughed. She like how it felt. Him not so
much.
Every part of his body was covered in her soft kisses and he was finally
learning what pure bliss felt like.
Then she nudged him to turn over again. He did so without protest this time.
“My love? May I-… try?” she asked shyly. She was about to try what he had
no issue in doing for her, but for her, it was another first.
“Are you sure, Tav? You don’t have to.”
“Are you enjoying yourself yes or no, Astarion?”, she said with light
annoyance.
“Yes.”, he said while stifling a laugh.
She wasn’t experienced, but she was thorough and creative, he gave her that
much.
“I’ll take that as my ‘yes’.”She took her inexperienced hands and took hold of him and began to move
up and down his shaft slowly. This time she was more careful not to hurt
him. He gave a little moan. She kept doing this.
Then she leaned in to kiss the head and the shaft. She was still in memorizing
mode, so she had to lay kissing on the missing area. As she did this, she took
notice that he surely noticed the attention.
Now she was ready to do what she had planned. She opened her mouth
tentatively and allowed him in little by little. She used her tongue to caress
his tip first. Then she went down the shaft. He felt cold, but hard. He was
ready, but she wasn’t. Not yet.
She took her right hand and cupped his testicles and softly moved her fingers
to let them move just enough. Another moan escaped his throat.
For someone that is copying my moves, she is surprisingly good. I’ll
make her better.
This thought made him smile wide. She mistook it for an invitation, so she
took him in fully. Aided by her hands and her inexperienced tongue, she
moved her head to go deep and back.
“Oh, Tav-… Mmm-…”, he moaned in pleasure.
She was thrilled. He always did these sort of thing for her and now she felt
the courage to gift it back. She focused on his taste. Everything was to be
memorized today. She needed to make sure he was real and she wasn’t
dreaming.
He placed his hands on her head to guide her, but with his strength, he was
able to move her faster and faster. Enough to not let her move fast enough.
She took him and swallowed.
“Oh, Tav, I’m sorry! I got carried aw-…”She laughed, “It’s okay. It’s all in a day’s work.”
“A lunatic.”, he mused.
“May I, my love?”, she asked. She was ready to take him.
“Mm-… Yes.”, his voice barely a whisper for now she was on top of him.
She took his hands and placed them on her hips.
“Steady me. I’m going it.”
He smiled and rolled his eyes. You’d think she’d be more sensual, but she
was exhausted before. Now, she was like any drunk, inhibitions be dammed.
She was free of her mind to feel pleasure and offer him her pleasure, too.
Their temperature difference was now truly obvious. His undeath was cool
but her fire was untamed. She lifted her self just enough to guide him to the
correct position and allowed him to slide in slowly. She gasped. She clasped.
He gasped. He buckled. He was in. She took a deep breath and exhaled.
“Steady me.”, she whispered as she began to move allowing her body to feel
that jolt of energy she always felt with him around. Up and down, then in a
circular motion.
This is new. Circular motion. I’ll keep that in mind, my love.
He thought right before she began to pick up speed and he couldn’t help
himself.
“Oh, gods! Tav, don’t stop.”
“Mm-… yes, no… mm”
He saw how her skin turned more red the faster she was moving. Then she
grabbed his hands and placed them on her breasts.“Astarion-… Mmm-… Ah-… Yes! Yes! Yes!”
He had begun to play with her breasts and squeezed her nipples lightly. Her
speed didn’t slow down. She was almost there. But, looking at her, eyes
closed, smile on her face, wet curls bouncing, her caramel skin, like a
goddess gifted to him, he felt how his body had a mind of its own and joined
her rhythm. He was singing right along with her.
“Tav-… Mm-…”
She’d push down, he’d push up, and they would meet half way. Her body
choking him. And as he thrust and she hugged him tight, they began to feel
that burst of energy that comes one your bliss is no longer contained. And
like a chorus in unison, they let their bodies become one. They let their soul
finally complete their merge. As her back arched and his hips went up to
meet her, the felt the release of their passion. Her fire finally consumed him.
They were one.
She finally gave him the last ounce of energy she had. She smiled at him and
leaned in to caress his cheek.
With a sleepy voice, she crooned, “You’re the most beautiful man I’ve ever
seen-… and you’re mine. I love you, Astarion Ancunin.”
“And I love you, Tav Storm.”, he said in a softest voice.
But she gave a little jolt. A sort of little panic, swift enough for most to
simply ignore, but he wasn’t most. She smiled to try to cover up that reaction,
and instead gave him a light kiss on the lips.
She removed herself from his body and laid beside him. He was feeling too
much bliss to ask him ‘what was that?’, but he’d keep a note about it for later.As they lay there, he listened for her breathing. He enjoyed her life. He
noticed how her heart beat slowly went down and so did her breathing. To be
the one that caused that in her was surely the gift he was grateful for. So, with
her, he allowed himself to relax and fall asleep.
Tav was the only person that managed to make him fall asleep as opposed to
the common trance of his people. But he wasn’t complaining. He liked this
bliss. His home, his woman, just two naked bodies that now will share one
soul until the end of time. What more could a man ask for?
Besides, by now it was around 6pm and sunset wouldn’t be for another our.
They could rest now. He fixed his arm around her to allow her a more
comfortable position. Then he too closed his eyes. No dreams. Just rest.
As the time progressed, she could feel a little colder. She began to stir. She
saw him in his peaceful rest and smiled. She moved in to give him a peck on
the cheek. This woke him. He opened his eyes.
“Mm-… Hello, darling. Is it time?”, he asked a bit groggily.
“I think so. But I feel well. How are you feeling, my love?”
“Better than ever. Amazing, I think.”
“Good, because we have work to do. I bet is dark out now. Let me go see.”
She stood up, wearing nothing for her smile and walked over to the flap. He
couldn’t take his eyes of her. She carefully opened it and sure enough, he was
free to move about. It was dark out.
“Let’s get dressed! It’s night time.”, she chimed.
“Great. I need to stretch outside. But first”
He patted his hand as he moved a little back. He looked at her seductively as
he told her to get back to bed. She flushed but gave a little giggle and quicklywalked back to lay beside him.
He embraced her with his marble arms and she rejoiced in the coolness of his
skin.
“Mm-… You always feel so nice.”, she said as she wiggled her body to be
perfectly nestled in his.
“Likewise, my dear.”, he whispered in her ear.
“Careful, Astarion. We’ve got work to do. No distractions.”
She said as she kept wiggling her body into his, enjoying the skin to skin. He
tightened his arms around her to keep her from wiggling so much. She
laughed.
“For someone who is claiming no distractions, you surely are distracting.”
“Fine. Let go and I’ll get dressed.”
“No. I don’t think I will.”
“You won’t, will ya?!”
She wiggled some more and he laughed. Then he kissed her neck. His touch
there always did the trick. It was his spot after all.
“Mm-… Astarion.”, she moaned as she gripped to his forearm so tightly that
her nails left indentations on his skin.
“I thought as much, beloved.”
He nuzzled his nose on her hair and took in her scent. She was clearly
enjoying herself. She had been exhausted before, but now rested, her mind
was clear, and she clearly was into relinquishing her dominance back to him.
He moved his right hand to her thigh and began to caress her skin. Clearly
intent on leaving goose-pimples on her skin due to the coolness of his touch.She smiled, eyes closed and she shifted her body backwards, further showing
him that she wanted to be close and stay as close as possible. This was his
cue to move his hand forward and find her belly. He left it there long enough
for her to react. She lifted her right leg on top of his. He caressed her belly in
circles as he breathed in the scent in her hair once more.
They were now free to love each other like any healthy couple does. So, yes,
they want to have a bit a fun again, and we’re going to let them. Stop being a
prude. If you don’t’ want to watch, skip ahead. For the rest of us, let’s enjoy
their love unfold.
Her scent was an aphrodisiac to him. She smelled alive. She was the sun
made flesh and she was his. What joy for him to have the sun back in the
form of his woman, Tav. He moaned as his senses were hightening and he
could feel how her heart beat was faster, her breathing was heavy, and her joy
could be felt on his own skin.
He moved his hand from her belly, some centimeters lower, finding what he
was looking for. As soon as his cool fingers found her little bump, she her
hips buckled backwards and she giggled, then allowed her body to feel the
pleasure her man was providing. He was an expert after all, but now retired,
thankfully. He smiled and then decided to nibble on her ear.
“Astarion! Mm-… Like that. Mmm… Yes… Yes…”, she managed to say as
her own hips were starting to move on their own accord.
He let her move, for her friction was rubbing on his own pleasure. Their
movements were soft, with intention. The had all the time in the universe
right now, because now, the universe stopped time to let them be. Let them
be in love, feel their love.
Gone were the days of the corruption they suffered. They were elves, of
course they like to make love, it is in their nature. But now, they are free toenjoy like Halsin once said, “enjoy the freedoms of nature’s gifts.” And now
Tav understands what Halsin meant, though to Halsin’s detriment, she was
only for Astarion and Astarion’s touch only. Wop Wop for Halsin.
As Astarion’s expert fingers moved in circular motions, he enjoyed his song
bird’s son. There was nothing better than his name on her lips, especially like
this. But his concentration was short lived, for he felt her pushing back. She
was getting desperate. Or in other words, he had her right where he needed.
“Astarion-… Mm-… please.”, she pleaded as her right leg pulled him closer
to her.
“Anything for you my love.”, he whispered in her ear.
He used his hand to position her properly to be penetrated, but he was going
to take his sweet time doing so. This was his “signature” on the soul contract
she signed four hours ago. Now it was his turn to finish this dance, but he
was going to enjoy every second of it.
Besides, he already knew that her tightness would end his efforts all too
quickly and he wasn’t about to let her finish him too fast. Not right now.
So, he positioned himself outside of her first and began to thrust. His friction
felt and noticed by the song she kept singing. Much to Tav’s surprise she
didn’t expect herself to be so, should we say, noisy. Not shouts, but soft
moans of pleasure that she wasn’t able to hide, nor she should. He loved her
song and she couldn’t help but sing. So, don’t judge them, you prude.
Besides, right now the Drow twins back at Baldur’s could take a note or two
on seduction or singing classes.
Then Astarion finally moved himself enough to enter. She used her own hand
to guide him in correctly, but her body was making it difficult to hold on. She
was pretty much out there, somewhere in the universe watching the stars, forher body was on fire, for him.
He felt as her tight walls enveloped him like a tight fitting glove. It felt
amazing, he thought. He placed his lips to her shoulder to stifle his own
pleasure. He didn’t want to let lose, just yet. So once he was in, he stopped
moving. He had to collect himself, first. Too bad, Tav didn’t get that
message, for her own hips began to move.
“Careful, Tav. I’m not done, yet.”
“Mm-… ss-… sorry. I can’t stop it.”
“Gods! I love you woman!”
As soon as he said this he began to thrust. He was done keeping control of his
body and just let his hips do the dancing. Hers were keeping up with his pace.
Then he moved his hand back to her belly and pressed hard enough for her to
feel, but not enough to hurt.
“Astarion-…”
“Tav-…”
They quickened their pace, as she held on to his left arm hugging her from
under while his right hand kept a firm grasp on her belly.
They both understood that they would never be able to bring forth life, but
they could always pretend, in the privacy of their home, that perhaps they
would some day. Different folks will deal with their grief in a way that works
for them, and for these two broken love-birds, this was fine. A hand on a
barren belly that would never hold life, and the seed of a cursed man robbed
from giving it. But their love for each other will help them navigate their
truth.
As he quickened his pace, he held on just long enough to let her reach it first.
He knew that his reward would be far greater if he managed to hold on. Andtrue enough, she climaxed first, he hips buckled back, her walls tightened
further. If he was snug before, now he was practically choked, he reached as
far as she would go, and finally let go. Both felt how their bodies, as sensitive
as they were, enjoyed becoming one. He felt his release inside her, and her
body took in as much as it could. The rest, would have to run down.
Their bodies went limp. She was the first to speak.
“My love, we’re not going to get anything done like this.”
“Oh, I know. Is this you complaining? You are doing a horrible job?”
“You wish I’d complain. Heck! I’ll not complain just to spite you.”
“Is that so, Tav? We’ll just see about that.”
He have a little thrust forward. He was limp, but he wasn’t out just yet.
“Oh-… Mm-… You win. You win.”, she breathed.
If she let him convince her for another round, she’d have to sleep another 4
hours and it was 10 pm by now. As much as she wanted to stay like that
forever, they had to finish up their preparation.
He laughed and kissed her shoulder. Then he slid out and finally let her go.
She sat up and looked back at him. She touched his face and smiled.
“The most beautiful man.”
He just closed his eyes as he allowed himself to be caressed and be told sweet
nothings. It was pure bliss.
“Very well, let me get dressed. You need to get dressed, too. I need your
help. It’s ALL HANDS ON DECK!”, she said with fire and determination in
her eyes.She had used up 2 hours of prep time, and they had to make it up.
“Mm-… I love this side of you, Tav. So, Captain, my Captain, what is on the
log tonight?”, he teased her.
“Well, lots of things and gossip. I haven’t told you about my shenanigans.”
She said this as she was now rummaging her pack to find a fresh set of
clothes for herself and for him. She got what she needed and walked back to
him. He was mesmerized by her. If he didn’t know any better, he could swear
he could see sunlight radiating from her bronze skin. She truly was her sun in
the darkness. And he was her beloved moon in the middle of the chaotic
darkness. They were meant to be one.
“Here you go. Hey, did you know that I love you?”, she said with a bright
smile as she handed him his clothes.
“What-… Yes,-… and I-… I love you more than life itself.”, he said a bit
shyly.
“Well, don’t forget it. I do. Now, come on. Off the bed. Get a move on.”, she
ushered him of the pelts.
He stood up and began to get dressed, too. Socks, underwear, leather pants,
shirt. He was done. She was not far off, either. They weren’t going to wear
any armor at the moment. She took her favorite vest, yes, that one, you know
which one. She put it on without a bra, decided against that, took it off, put
one on, and then put the vest top back on. He just looked at her, very
entertained. She noticed and blushed. After all this time, and she will
probably never stop. His loving gaze will always have that reaction on her
and she will always feel that energy jolt when he does. Mr. and Mrs. Misery
have evolved their love language and we bore witness to it. Isn’t that lovely.
Once they were done getting dressed, Astarion opened the tent flaps and
fastened them to the inside with some sewn straps on the inside. Like this,
they could go in and out freely. So, now they were ready to begin their day…
or better yet, their night.Tav said with unconstrained enthusiasm, “First of all, I got us a trip across
the river! It’s paid for and everything.”
“Really?! That’s fantastic. But, how exactly?”, he closed his eyes a bit
skeptical.
He knew her well enough to know some shenanigans indeed had to take
place for her to be so excited to talk about it.
“Oh, you know. I little of this a little of that. And Boom! Got us a ride!”
She laughed.
So, she proceeded to tell him every little detail from when she headed to the
river with her little cart and everything after that.
“When I got to the river, I was scouting what was in the area, plants, my
rocks, boats, patrols, everything. So, as I was there, a fishing boat was
nearing me heading towards Berdusk. I got their attention and there was a
Hellrider guard, a woman tiefling, with them. She got into a boat and a
fisherman, Damian-… Diego-… I don’t recall, got into the boat and came to
shore with me. I gave them my shpeel about being this poor peasant woman
who was with child, but needed some aid.”
“I’m sure you are. So, what was your lie exactly?”
She blushed and looked at the floor instead for this part.
“You are my cursed albino husband named Rupert. Your affliction has you
shy away from sunlight. You’ll need to wear your dark glasses once we
leave, by the way. So, we have been married for a bit, we have been trying to
get pregnant, and we have had 2 lost babies. We are on our third attempt, but
I’m delicate. You do what you can, but can’t do it in day light. You blame
yourself for my losses, but in reality it’s probably my ‘dry’ womb.”
His mouth fell open, his eyes widened in shock. Then the air managed to get
back into him so he could talk.“Tav! That’s-… I’m-… I mean-…”
He couldn’t help himself, he began to laugh and then to cackle. I mean, she
didn’t lie, but she did lie. Clever woman. He continued.
“Well, it worked-… But, RUPERT! OF ALL THE NAMES! RUPERT!”
“I also, said you get all red like cooked shrimp in the sun because it burns
your skin.”, she sheepishly said this while still looking at the floor, but trying
to find her flowers.
She figured this was a good time to recycle them to apologize. She found
them. He was too stunned to speak long enough for her to grab the flowers
and get on one knee in front of him offering the sad flowers while smiling at
him.
“Shrimpstarion, my beloved Rupert. I apologize. Can you forgive my
insolence in naming you so poorly, my grace?”, she said in a teasing voice.
After all, she had been learning form his theatrics for about a year now. He
was still too stunned to speak.
This woman is definitely the end of me. The sun temple was one thing, but
she took the challenge to improve her nonsensical ways! And I love her?!
His thoughts only gave way for another laughing fit. He took his flowers
again, and helped her stand up. He kissed her forehead and hugged her. He
was finally able to talk again.
“I am too shocked to even have an opinion, but I’m glad it worked. Just,
don’t call me those horrid names. I’m offended.” he teased her while
pretending to be deeply offended.
She smiled and got on her tip toes to give him a quick peck on the lips.
“I won’t. I promise. On my ranger’s honor, I will never call you those names
directly.”, she giggled as she got free from his arms and began to walktowards the outside.
He followed her out and stretched his back and arms. Then took a deep
breath and gagged.
“What in the hells?!”
“That’s my food fish. I don’t like fish either, but-…”
He cut her off.
“Food is food. I know. I know. So, that’s your price to pay for your buckets.”
“You know it. But with the salt and the smoke, it will be fine. I still got some
parchment paper. I just need it to dry as much as possible. Can you add more
wood and stuff?”
“Of course, let me see what I can find around.”
“Be careful, love. I see shadows.”
“I think they are more afraid of us.”
“I know, but we got work to do. I mean, don’t bring trouble over. We’re
busy.”
“Oh, that. Sure thing. Be back in a bit.”
She hated to see him go, but he was more than capable to go and find wood.
Also, it was likely that he was a bit peckish, so he needed the excuse. As he
left, she began to set up little work stations to make the tasks easier.
Very well. We got the clothes pile, the fish pile, the log, my fish scales…
What else? I think first the fish-… Never mind. I’ll go get the water skin first
and the basin. Then the fish pile goes first, so I can free up my cart. I’ll just
ask Astarion to help me with the clothes line before I beg him to help with my
arrow shafts. He’s going to hate it! Ha ha ha
So, she walked inside the tent and then to the little tent on the side. Yes, that
one tent that she gave a stupid name to. No, there’s no need to repeat “poop
tent” for it’s for poop, pee, and bathing. It’s a bathroom tent. You know it, I
know it, we all know it. Yes, we are 13 years old ant that makes us giggle.Anyway, she headed inside and grabbed the water skin from earlier, the basin
which was basically a wooden bowl, and the used wash rag, then walked
back outside. She placed the things on the cart and Helen squeaked a little.
She was heavy, but wouldn’t for long.
Tav went back inside to get a bit of soap to wash the basin. Then she rinsed it
and threw the water away from camp. She placed the salted fish on the large
bowl she had placed on the floor. Then loosened the knots he had made
before and carefully removed the burlap sack to not spill any salt.
As she was working on the fish, she saw Astarion with a bit of blood on his
shirt and carrying several sticks of wood and a small log he clearly had
ripped from a branch of a tree.
“Welcome back my love. How was the menu?”
“Horrid, but it will do.”, he smiled as the placed the wood near the fire.
As he began to move about, she stopped what she was doing to observe him.
That amazing man of hers, read her mind.
“Let me make you a dying rack for your fish. I’ll set it up next to the fire.
Hopefully, it can keep the smoke here and not so much everywhere.”
“I love you, you beautiful intelligent man! It’s perfect! I’ll get going on the
laundry then. But-…”, she pointed to the shirt.
“Oh, yeah. Sure. We don’t want the stain to set in.”, he said as he removed
his shirt.
He didn’t bother putting on another. She certainly wouldn't mind. When it
came to him, she would also outlaw clothing.
He continued to make the simple rack. She had handed him some leather
straps, which knowing Tav, she’d probably have a sack full of them. Straps,rope, and twine. First he carefully pushed down the four main sticks in the
ground. The ones closer to the fire were left a little higher out. Then the other
two sticks would go on each side. It looked like the frame of a table without
the top flat part. He secured the sticks to each other with the straps and placed
some twine in a zig-zag pattern to support the burlap sack once he placed it
there. So that was his next plan.
He took the sack while making faces. He hated fish smell. He tied one side of
it to the horizontal stick, then the other side. Finally, he placed the fish from
the bowl on top making sure that it would hold. He didn’t want to pick out 2
kilos worth of fish nor waste her efforts. Once he was done, like classic
Astarion, he boasted that his work was once again perfect. His gloating
would be short lived though.
While he was fussing over stinky fish, Tav was setting up her washing
station. She had loosed Helen free, and had carefully moved her towards the
side of the smaller tent. Yes, that one. Anyway, once there, she took one of
the buckets down and left it a little of to the side. She also placed the large
water skins on the ground and placed the wooden bowl in the cart. She added
soap to the bucket she had left in the cart too. Then she went to get the
clothes. Then she reached from under the little tent to grab her little twig mat.
She placed the dirty clothes on it to keep the dirt to a minimal amount.
Every so often, she glanced towards Astarion to see his progress, but once
she saw him begin to gloat, she shut that shit down.
“That’s amazing! But, can you help me with a clothes line, please?”
“Oh, fine. One can’t be allowed to gloat in peace.”, he said with fake
annoyance.
She giggled.
“Love you. Thanks.”
“Yeah, yeah. I love you, too.”, he said as he took off again into the darknessto bet more sticks. He had his plan and she would let him figure it out. She
was busy herself.
So, she figured she had to start without the clothes line. She would just have
to leave the soapy clothes on the cart or the twig-mat first. Then once
everything was washed, she’d begin to rinse. By then, the clothes line would
be ready.
And that’s exactly what she did. Scrub, scrub, on the socks, and undies. She
had a hard bristle brush that she used for laundry, so she scrubbed the small
blood stains on Astarion’s shirt. Because they were fresh, it was easy to
remove them.
As she reached down to get the next item, he was back, again with a bit of
blood on his chest, but it was fine. She didn’t have to wash that. I mean, she
could, but she wasn’t going to. No distractions-… for now.
He began to do his own thing. He basically did the same thing that he did for
the fish rack, but now it was with branches that were a little longer. And the
rope, instead of a zig-zag pattern, it was 3 straight lines of rope.
“What else do you need help with?,” he said already knowing it. He saw her
little “stations” around the tent area.
She gave him a coy smile while pointing to the log and tools with her lips
while moving her eyebrows up.
He looked back at her, “Seriously? Right now? But fine. Mine are better.”
She rolled her eyes, but said nothing. They knew they both made fantastic
arrows, but he was much faster working the wood.
He plopped down on the ground and grabbed his tools and the log. As he did,
he remembered the day where he was chatting with Tav. Some of the others
had gone on a job, but Tav and Astarion had decided to stay back and “manthe fort.” Tav, ever the practical one, and Astarion finding something to fuss
about, were chatting, while she was making arrow shafts.
She was busy minding her business, when a curious pale elf looking for
something to do, came into view.
“Oh, Taaaaav. What are you doing”
“Making bread.”, she said as she rolled her eyes, but gave a playful laugh.
“No wonder you’re so thin then.”
“I need to make more arrow shafts. My recovered stash is running low. Also,
it give me something to do. It’s a slow day.”
“Mh. So, why don’t you simply buy more. I bet they’re cheap.”
“Well, true. But, I don’t have that kind of coin. Well, now I do because we
take jobs to make coin, but for years I had to make everything I owned.”
“Interesting. Everything?”
“Yeah, on ocassion, I would make enough coin to go to Bezentil to trade my
wares and I’d get cloth, thread, needles. I’d make my intimates my self,
socks, panties, bras.”
“Oh, so you do mean everything. What you’re wearing, too?”
“Yes. This vest is my favorite. It’s the only item I got left before the brain
worms. I don’t know if I will ever be able to return to Lethyr. Heck perhaps if
I did, properly my pack is gone. So, it’s what I have left of that life, I guess.”
“You’d go back to your old life?”, he said while trying to mask his truth.
“To be honest, no. I like this one better. The people are nice. And the
company is better.”, she said as she saw him
He was a bit shocked at her answer.
What does she mean by that? The company is better? Does she mean me? I-
… She probably means the whole group, or Gale.
She saw his face of slight panic and laughed.“I did mean you. I like your company, Astarion.”
“Well, who wouldn’t? I am the best company.”, he tried to play it off.
Unsuccesful.
“Indeed. You are to me.”, she smiled at him.
He choked a little. He was not expecting her to beat him as his own game.
“So, Astarion, what is your plan right now? Are you busy?”
“Mm-… Well, I am-…”
She cut him off. “Doing nothing. Fantastic! Grab that knife for me, will
you?”
“Uh, this? Here you are.”
“So, look. With the log, you first remove the bark from it. Drift wood is
better, because it makes a harder wood. Ash is my favorite. I mean, ash
wood!”, she said in a final panic.
She hated any and all jokes that could be aimed at his death in the sun or by
fire. She disliked Minthara at times because her teasing was more like
bullying. Tav wasn’t sure why she was so defensive about him, though. They
were just colleauges. He ignored her panic. He took notice now and other
times when she would do her best to incorporate him in the jobs or react to
his dramatic banter. He liked having her as his sole audience, for she had a
dark sense of humor and she always listened to what he had to say.
“Ash. Noted. And what’s next? How long will the shafts be?”
“Well, it depends on the maker, but I like to leave mine at 65 cm because I’m
short.”
“Indeed, you are. No ofense.”
“None taken. It’s true. Even for my clan, I was a small kid. Still am-… I
guess.”
“You don’t always talk about your family. Why is that? I mean, if you don’tmind me asking. That is”
“I don’t mind you asking, but I’d rather not. Would you like to learn how to
make these? I mean, we could sell them, too and you get the profit.”
“Mh-… tempting. But, I suppose there is nothing else to do.”
He lied. There were a million other things he could be doing, including
nothings, yet he was curious about her. He chose to stay and keep her
company.
Look at me now. Proffesing my love to that short woman and now
I’m still making arrows for her. We never did sell any.
He laughed more to himself at that. He knew she played him, but he was
happy to help these days. Back then, not so much. He was different then.
So, he had to modify the standard measurments of arrow shaft making. She
knew she packed a punch for her size, but most would be non the wiser. He
once saw her lick a dead spider. You don’t mess with the woman of a
vampire spawn who also licks giant dead spiders.
As he was reminicing about the past, his diligent hands worked masterfully in
the present. He placed the log vertically against a rock that was half stuck in
the ground. He saw the fish scales on a little hole, so he covered them with
dirt. He knew her well enough that if she saw them again, she might collect
them for “something”. He wouldn’t risk it. He took the hatchet and drove it
along the growth rings. He split the log into 8 wedges. Then he split those
wedges into smaller billets. For this, he instead used the serrated knife to
make it easier.
No wonder Tav convince him to work. His strength made this look easy.
She’d have to put more elbow grease into it. Also, he rather not do the
laundry; the soap dried his skin, too much.Then he began shaving the billets one by one. He’d check his work with each
one. They had to be straight.
As he worked on his own task, he went back to the conversation he had back
then with Tav. It was the start of his relationship with her, at least as friends.
She would always ask him the strangest questions, but he enjoyed answering
them. It was as if she really cared about learning everything about him.
“Astarion, do you have a preference for blood sources? I mean, apart from
people?”
“To be honest, you are the first person that I have taken blood from.”
She blushed and almost dropped her knife.
“Oh, well I hope it wasn’t bad tasting like to ‘gamey’ or something.”
He laughed. He infact did think that. She was more wild then. She has
softened a bit since then.
“No, you are positively delightful, my dear Tav.”
With a sigh of relief she said, “That’s good to know. I-… I mean… it’s just
that-… it’s that the others always get so fidgety when your eyes start to
change and they know you are getting hungry, and I don’t want you to have
to go because they kick you out of the group because they are scared. I mean,
they shouldn’t you are a perfectly good gentleman and you’ve never done
anything else bad, apart from the time you tried to kill me on the beach or
tried to bite me while I slept. But I mean, I understand, if you are hungry, like
really hungry, who wouldn’t do something crazy. I mean, even animals in the
wild will take-…”
“Tav! Breathe!”
She snapped out of it. She’d do this when she get nervous. Emberasingly, thiswould only happen if Astarion was involved. Karlach and Lae’Zel had begun
to notice.
“Sorry. I just mean, if you get a bit peckish, let me know. I will make sure I
eat good food, so I don’t taste funny.”
“Thanks, Tav. I really appreciate that.”
I never did correct that fact my love. Your food intake though it
doesn’t provide me the nutrients you think, it does make it taske like the
finest wine. But, at least I make sure you are well fed, too.
He smiled at the knowledge and wondered if one day, the others would tell
her that it didn’t matter if she ate liver or not.
His work was making progress on his first three shafts, but then he asked Tav
the question he was very interested in.
“Tav? So, what happened?”
“Oh, yes! Well, when I got to the river and the Hellrider guard and the
fisherman came in a little boat near to me, I had to start. I told them my sad
story and I got a lot of sympathy points from the guard. I liked her. I hope
she’s well. So, the fisherman, he wanted to sell me the buckets full of fish. I
said, ‘No, thank you’, but he said take it or leave it. I took it. I just got them
to accept extra work.”
“Oh, that explains the lack of guts.”
“Exactly. I said I was gifting them chum, so he agreed, but no scales. So, I
had to say yes. As we were talking, I don’t remember exactly what I said, but
it came to us needing to get to Berdusk.”
“This is where you lied about me too, correct. Seriously, woman, of all the
things to say-…”
“I’m sorry. I was trying not to go into a panic. But it worked. They know you
are pale and have red eyes. Hopefully it will minimize their nosy nature whenthey finally see you.”
“Thank you. I appreciate it.”
“Oh, by the way, in my pack, in the bag of leather straps, I’ve still got some
sandpaper if you need it.”
“Great. It will make the smoothing faster and easier.”
He got up and walked into the tent to get the little sack. He rummaged
through her bag and took out the sack, but this felt lighter. He opened the
sack and didn’t see what he was expecting.
He poured the contents on the bed of pelts to see what was inside the leather
bag. He had just found Tav’s treasure stash, which was a random assortment
of odd bits. He saw two pieces of parchment paper, likely Gales, but with
very rough drawings of his own face done by Tav. These were pretty horrible
if compared to the current one inside the book she has with her spells and
notes. There was a pinky finger from an old leather glove. He remembered
that.
Gale: Will you be needing that blade, Lae’Zel?
Lae’Zel: Keep your dirty fingers off my new sword, mage.
Tav: Gale? Would the orb like these?
Gale: Why yes, Tav, it would thank you.
He said this while looking offended by Lae’Zel. She just rolled her eyes and
walked over to Shadowheart instead. As he was distracted, Tav cut off a bit
of the gloves. Later that day, Astarion asked why.
“Tav, why did you cut part of the gloves for Gale.”
She stifled a giggle while whispering her answer.
“I wanted to know if there was a difference between a full glove versus less
glove. He hasn’t complained, so there must be no diffence.”
Astation laughed at that. He had forgotten that Tav thought Gale like to eatleather when in reality he absorved the magic embued in the item. He would
still not correct that. The thought of Tav thinking Gale likes to eat leather
would eventually lead her to get him a food basket with fruits and leather
straps. He wanted to see Gale’s reaction.
He kept looking that the things she kept. There was a folded note. He opened
it. In horrible scribble, it said “Piss. :)” And on the back in perfect cursive,
likely Wyll’s it just said “Why?”. Astarion just kept laughing to himself. She
was always rather odd, especially then. This one was after Wyll failed to woo
her. He was trying to teach her to dance. He really tried, but he was doomed.
Wyll was too proper for such a wild little beast back then. Astarion
remembered the conversation they had after Wyll’s fiasco. She didn’t realize
it was flirting which made Astarion laugh harder. Wyll had game, but Tav
didn’t know how to play.
“So, dancing with Wyll, huh? How did you like it?”
“Well, he’s a fantastic dancer, but I just don’t understand the moves. He tried
really hard and I appreciate, but I got confused.”
“I could see that.”
“You were there? Anyway, so I tried to copy his movements, but he told me
that I was not doing it properly. I had to do the woman’s steps. But, I don’t
know what they are. Then he tried to show me, and I tried to copy them.”
“Hahahaha. Wyll dancing like the lady is quite delightful.”
“I agree. He’s an amazing dancer as the man or the woman. But, then I fell
on my bum. I laughed. He laughed. The backpack laughed.”
Astarion burst out laughing. Tav continued.
“It was a mimic.”, she said as she joined Astarion’s cackle.
Poor Wyll. He really tried. Astarion remembered when Tav was feeling
giddy and she wrote “Piss. :)” on the parchment Gale threw away. Shehanded it to Wyll as if it were an infiltration mission. Wyll’s face was of
strong confusion. He wrote back “Why?” and gave it back to her. Her face
just showed disappontment. She was looking for a fun challenge and he
didn’t get it. He was simply too proper.
“Astarion, do you reckon Wyll is like a king or something? He’s always so
proper that it makes me feel bad. I mean, I don’t know how to treat them. I
asked Tara because she said she is a queen, but she only wants me to pet
her.”
You’ve learned so much since then, too, haven’t you Tav. From
being almost feral to becoming our team leader. It certainly was a pleasure
to see you grow and learn.
He saw Lae’Zel’s sword strap which she let her keep. She knew Tav meant
well, so she would go easy at first. Mintharas blade was here, too. Tav kept
too much hair. There was Shadowheart’s black hair strand and a silver one,
too. There were braids, likely Halsin’s and Jaheira’s. There was animal hair,
too. He guessed it was from Fetch and Boo. There was even the piece of
bandage she asked him to get from Withers.
Astarion laughed. It made him happy that she was like this. She kept little
mementos of the folks she considered family. She’d destroy worlds if it
meant she’d keep them all safe. He put the things back and got another
leather bag. That one felt too light.
He opened it. Feathers. He laughed again. He remembered this one best. He
was the one that did it. He was surprised she still had them.
“If you don’t mind me asking, but what are you doing?”
“I’m baking bread.”
“How many do you have?”
“I’ve gotten 3. We can eat the bird for lunch, but I will need more feathers for
my arrows.”“Perhaps I can help.”
“Would you? That would be fantastic.”, she gave him the brightess smile.
He then proceded to steal Gale’s pillow and Shadowheart’s too for good
measure. He placed the feathers in this leather bag and tied it. Tav knew she
should not ask where things came from when he gifted them.
He closed the bag and set it aside. He’d be needing that. Lucky for him, third
try’s a charm. The last bag he got was the one where the tools for making the
arrows was. She kept tools in a wooden box, but the rest in the bag.
“Got you.”, he told the bag.
He finally went outside and now she was rinsing the soap from the clothes.
“Did you find it? You took long.”
“Yeah, I took out all other bags first.”
“Sorry, I have to fix that bag up.”
“Don’t worry about it. I found it.”
“Sounds good then. And Astarion?”
“Yes?”
“Thank you for helping me. I really appreciate it.”
She stopped what she was doing to go up to him. She beckoned him to bend
down. She gave him a kiss on the cheek.
“I love you my beautiful.”
He smiled at her and hugged her. “I love you too, Tav.”
She walked back to her little station and he went back to his. He continued
his work, now smooting over with the sandpaper he found.
“So, what happened next?”
“I got my buckets, the salt, and the burlap over there. Then I was offered helpto cross. I paid extra, but we have to be there around 10 at night. You’ll have
to look miserable. Yes, like that.”
“Ha ha. Funny. So, dark glasses for that one. Go it.”
“Then I started to collect my plants. I just got whatever I could find that
wasn’t poisonous, but then the paladins found me.”
“Paladins!”
“I know. I had to be careful with them. They seemed out for blood, those
two. But I continued to use my lie and I made them really uncomfortable.
Told them that they might be the reason I would lose this one. Scared them
good and proper.”, she said with a smug look.
She continued. “So, I got them to load up the buckets and the log. I waited
until they left for me to start moving. I had to wobble a bit. But, I dragged the
log a bit. Then I kicked rolled it home.”
“Ah, that explains it.”
“Yeah, it was too heavy with all the water.”
By now, Tav was done washing, but Astarion was still working on the shafts.
She checked on the fish first, then went over to him to start helping.
“You don’t have to. You should rest, Tav.”
“Don’t worry. We’ll be cooked up when the sun is up.”
“Very well.”
She began to etch the notches for the feathers and heating the shafts over the
fire. They worked in an assembly line talking about the quality of the
materials and which piece would go best where.
Then she let Astarion continue with the wood and she began to work on the
arrowheads. She had at least 15 left form before, so she might not need that
many today. Either way, it was always good to leave extras just in case.
She took the pieces of rock and inspected what would be useful. What wasn’t
she just threw it into the fields. She had grabbed her dagger before she evenbegan washing, so she didn’t have to use the hatchet that he was using.
With the hilt of her dagger, she made some larger rocks a little smaller. She
grabbed her ‘favorite rock’ from her bag and used that to start shaping the
form of the rock down to the tip. She’d check her work just like Astarion
checked his. He kept looking at her ready to snap at her if she dared use the
dagger’s edge to work on the rock again. She had a knife for that, but she
forgot to grabbed that.
She was about to.
“I swear my dear. Don’t. Go get it.”
She made a face and reluctantly stood up and stomped her way into the tent.
Then stomped her was back and sat down. She made him a face.
“I got it. See.”
“Thank you. I’m glad you appreciate my work.”
She smiled wide at him.
“I always do. You have amazing fingers.”
She covered her mouth with her hands as she realized she had made a joke
with a double meaning. He giggled to.
“You’re right. I do.”
They continued their light banter talking about their day like how he felt so
overwhelmed trapped inside the tent, and she apologizing for taking too long.
They remembered past jobs where they did crazy things like jumping down
to the Underdark. Tav hated that one. Or her spider licking and Gale’s shock
and disgust. They simply worked together and laughed as the night
progressed. By the time they noticed the night sky change, they were pretty
much done. She ended up doing 30 arrow heads. She’d have some left over.
As for him, he’d been able to create 30 shafts. It was more than what she was
expecting. What with the gluing and the feathers, and all of that, she just hadstuck some on her fingers and some on Astarion’s hair. He wasn’t too happy,
but he sort of knew it would be like that. She kept sneezing and scratching.
She was allergic to mixture she made for glue. He kept telling her to change
the recipe, but she liked the final results of the one she used.
When they least expected, they had pretty much caught up with their work.
The clothes was now hanging to dry as was the fish. Astarion helped her
make 30 arrows in total. He even oiled them to make them last longer. He
had checked and mended equipment, armor, tools, and weapons. He even got
to eat himself.
But that was all it took. There was a loud grumble coming from her. He
raised his eybrows as he looked at her.
“Tav, perhaps you should eat.”
“But it’s fish.”
“Doesn’t matter. Food is food remember”
“I know. I am. I will. But, could you go get more water, please. At least
enough to wash up again.”
“Very well. I’ll be back in no time.”
He stood up and stretched he back. Grabbed the buckets and took off.
“Show off.”, she said as he took off running.
So, she went to the fish pile and got 2 of them. Removed the excess salt right
there to not waste it. Then left them on top of the rest. She went inside and
rummaged in his pack. She kept the bag with some spare vegetables there.
Today was wild onion and potatoes. She took one onion and one potato. She
grabbed her little pot and lid. She grabbed the tin with fat, too. Finally whe
went to get her drinking waterskin. She rinsed off the veggies and the fish.
She then checked to see if Astarion was back. He wasn’t. She used her
dagger to cut the onion and the potatoes, but he got back right when she was
on the second potato.“Honestly woman, you’ve killed varmin with that blade.”
“Well, I licked a spider, so what’s the problem?”
“Utterly hopeless, you are.”
“But I’m yours.”, she laughed as she pointed at him with the dagger he had
given her.
They sat down by the fire after Astarion finished picking up or burying the
wood shavings. As they waited, Tav’s fish soup finished cooking and she
finally ate. Then she washed her pot, lid, and spoon. Dried up her kitchen
stuffs and put them away. Then they headed back in the tent. The sun would
be up soon.
“Thanks for the help, my beautiful. We made great progress.”
“You’re very welcome. So, what’s next?”
“Washing up and some rest.”
And that’s what they did. Astarion secured the tent flaps again to keep them
from opening accidently and they took off their dirty clothes. Tav would
wash that in the moring. Then they headed to the side tent to clean up before
going to sleep or trance. It would be his choice now.Chapter 15- Go!
As they finished their rituals, they laid on their bed and closed their eyes.
Perhaps this would be the last time they got for a proper full rest, or perhaps
not, but for now, they take what they can get.
The only benefit now was that Astarion wouldn’t have to prowl like a caged
lion inside the tent alone. This time he had company. And Tav was great at
teasing him for it.
Tick-tock. Tick-tock. Tick-tock.
When they went to bed it was almost 5 am. They slept for four hours. You do
the math.
Beep Beep! Wake up!
This time Tav got up first and headed to the restroom. You’d think that they
didn’t brush teeth, wash faces, and other things, but they do. We just don’t
always talk about it. So, rest assured that even our boy brushes his teeth,
especially him, because if not, ew.
So, after Tav freshened up, she went back into the main tent and Astarion
went to do the same for himself. He too went back into the main tent.“What’s the plan today, my dear?, he said as he dried his hair.
“To be honest, nothing much during the day. We’re caught up.”
“Mh-… I’d thought you would go hunting or scavenging.”
“I did considered it, but I still got some vegetables I need to use up and the
fish. It’s still there and still drying.”
“The fire still going? I’m amazed.”
“Well,… no. But, it is still a little breezy, so the fish will be done by the time
we pack up.”
“Huh. Well then. What are we to do then?”, he gave her a coy smile.
“You can’t be serious?! Again? Just how much stamina do you have?!”
“Is this you complaining, my dear Tav?
“I-… well-… no, but-…”, she was clearly flustered about his suggestion.
He laughed as he got to her and kissed her.
So, basically right now, we are going to play some cards, perhaps chess.
We’re going to go make a snack and a drink, too. We can even go take a long
nap. Because let’s be honest, Astarion and Tav, just like Halsin, are still
elves. Now, search deep down in your media and lore, and well, you know.
They will, and a lot. All over. Yes, that too. That other thing, maybe if she
lets him. But, no. She’s not into that and she did tell him that if he was
willing to also have it done, then perhaps. That shut him up.Now then, they had fun. They rested. Had a bit more fun, etc. I mean, she did
eat at some point, twice even. It was fish. She went outside to get the clothes.
He help fold them and put them away. She still left the fish out. It was drying
nicely.
She removed the branches used as the clothes line, too. They were basically
preparing themselves to get ready to pack up at night. But by now it was 2
pm. So, let’s give them a bit more time. What can I say, time flies when
you’re having fun, huh? But, yeah-… So, how are you doing? You doing
good? I’m doing pretty well myself, thanks. Oh! Will you look at that it’s
now 8 pm and dark out. Let’s go.
Tav by now was looking all flustered with messy hair, but her man was
looking way too smug, even for him. What can we say, he’s got vampire
stamina, but she “don’t”. So, let’s just gloss over the fact they didn’t have
time to shower. They were… busy. They’ll get to that after we all cross the
river.
Tav checked outside to confirm nighttime, and sure enough, it was dark out.
Astarion proceeded to step out. He went straight to removing all the branches
he’s placed to make the clothes line, and also recovered the rope he’d used.
Meanwhile, Tav was picking up the things from inside. Pets all in a bundle
and tied up, making sure that the one that was more water-resistant was on
the outside. She left her toy plushies inside that bundle, too. We wouldn’twant them to get wet.
“Tav, my dear-…”, he pointed towards the fish.
“Oh, yeah. I almost forgot. Thanks.”
She proceeded to take only the fish by shaking the meat to release the salt
clumps and crystals from it. She left them on a little pile, then she grabbed
her food pack from the backpack. She had some parchment paper which she
would layer it with some fresh salt.
“I think I have to leave the sack. I don’t have time to wash it.”
“Leave it in the fire for now, there are still some embers.”
“Good idea.”
She put the sack, salt, and all right on top of the hot coals still burning, and
they saw how some little pops would happen. They continued working. Now,
he took down the rest of the branches he’d used for the drying rack. All
leather strips and rope recovered, except the rope where the fish rested. That
went to the fire, too.
By now, the tents had nothing inside. Everything had been placed either on
the cart or on the floor outside. He helped her remove the fastenings of the
side, then to be the first one to take down.She folded it carefully to minimize a bulge. He took down the larger tent,
helping himself with his strength. This time, he wouldn’t be able to climb up
to take the cloth over the frame. He just threw it from one side to the other,
leaving the frame exposed.
He stared at the frame, marveling at Karlach’s work. She was really clever
when it came to design. She had the idea of making the frame from a metal,
and it would lock in certain joints to allow for minimal space once stored.
This went into his own pack, not that it would be a bother. The use of their
bags of holding did wonders for his back and hers, but with the cart, it was
even better.
Together, they folded the larger tent and tied it up with the smaller one
inside. It was place on top of the pelts. So, by now they were almost done and
it had only been 30 minutes. They were fine.
The hole for the side tent had been covered, she used a fire bolt, which our
baby boy Gale taught her. Those two would certainly be dangerous together
if left unsupervised. Though, Karlach have him a run for his money. Let’s be
honest, the problem is our little chaos gremlin, but perhaps having two
together, balances them out.
They were ready to go. But there was just one more thing. They had to
double-check. Little to no trace must be left behind of this vampire spawn welove so much. So, Tav had to make a difficult sacrifice.
She made sure she had her knife on her belt. Then she carefully walked up to
him. He noticed her. His ears flicked. He turned around and saw her face.
That was a dangerous face she was making. She rushed in towards him.
As soon as he felt the hilt of the blade crack it open, he knew. He gagged.
She cackled.
“That is disgusting!”, he almost shouted.
“I know, but we have to cover our scent. We’ll have to shower after we cross,
but I’d rather not linger in Berdusk. Too many of them, so we’ll have to
survive it and them. I’m sorry, love.”, she said as she tried to stop laughing.
He just rolled his eyes. He’d had his fun all day, now Tav was having a
different kind of fun: annoy the pale-elf.
“It’s still savage running at me like that.”
“You would have jumped out of the way. Anyway, let’s run. It will gate late
fast and we must be over the river by the time the light comes.”
“Lead the way.”
So, they set up at a good speed. Not a lot of talking happened, just the breeze
hitting their skin. They were hyperaware of the area around them. They werelike two lions on the hunt tonight, but in reality they were checking for
threats.
Despite Astarion wearing the dark glasses to hide his eyes a little better, and
smelling of stink from Tav’s concoction, they had a nervious energy about
them tonight. This was not home, it was not even Baldur’s Gate, were he had
lived. This territory had too many pious violent ment roaming about. Tav was
nervious. She could take them down one by one, but a stray arrow or a stake
to the heart would be enough to snuff out two lives who were just trying to
help.
They began to smell fish, so they were almost there. They slowed down and
their ruse started again. Tav started talking to Astarion, and he just had to
follow along. Yes, and…
“Husband, when we get to my parents home, help me wash up, will ya?”
“Mh.”
“My mother sent me a letter telling me the bedroom was ready for us and
they baby if it came this time.”
He was having a hard time thinking what to say, so he kept to one word
answers. But it seem to be working either way, they saw a paladin make
themselves known about 10 meters ahead. So, they stopped to double check
their plan.Tav whispered, she was getting nervous. There were too many patrols in the
city and outside of it and it was just them, too. She knew that they could take
down many, but her goal was to infiltrate and get out without getting caught.
She didn’t want anyone following them to the grove.
“Very well, once we get to Moondown Isle, there will be a barge guarded by
the Hellrider woman and the fishermant I made the deal with. She’ll
recognize us sure enough. We look civilian enough.”
Tav saw her current attire, a plain muddy red robe and leather sandals.
Astarion kept his linen shirt with rubble v-neck and leather pants with boots.
They were certainly not very interesting to look at other than he was a rather
tall, fit albino elf with dark glasses, acompanied by a copper skin wood-elf
that was 1.5 m tall. Surely, highly compatible and not at all noticeable.
Either way, Tav had left her recurved bow and some loose arrows hidden
between the buckets and the pelts. They could be reached in case needed. As
for her bracers, she had none. They only special thing she had tonight was a
hair piece that was actually fastened with 2 poison needles. As long as she
didn’t cut herself with them, she’d be fine. She just had her dagger on its
holste under her tunning which she could reach from the opening of said
dress. She looked safe and weak enough to move about.For Astarion, he had his own dagger on his belt. They both thought that as a
man, it would be logical for him to wear one, but not her. Besides, he has
fangs, and very sharp fingers and finger nails. He is his own weapon.
He whispered back to her, still tingling with her anxiety in his tongue.
“We’ll cross the Riverroad Gate first and keep going straight. From the map,
it’s supposed to be the Uldoon Trail all the way to the other side.”
“Right. That will lead to the Amberside Market, but we should be able to see
the other exit gate out of the city.”
“Correct, that’s the Vale Gate. Then we keep going forward, pretending your
family is somewhere in those farms.”
“Gods! I hope we don’t’ get stopped. I have no idea what names to say for
those folks.”
“I’m sure it won’t come to that. Anyhow, once there, we must keep forward
and then break left and keep going.”
“Easy enough. I think I want to vomit. Let’s go then.”
“Oh, Tav. Are you sure you are ready tonight? We could go around the
wall?”
“I think it will be more patrolled. I just don’t like all these paladins sniffing
us out. Before, we were at least 4 idiots and Gale was a great distraction.
Now, it’s just us. We have a lot to lose.”
“I agree. Well, Tav. I love you. Let’s go.”
“I love you, too, my moon and stars.”He leaned to kiss her forhead and she took his hand to kiss it. She grabbed
Helen the cart’s handle and continued to push. Then stopped.
“Astarion, let’s switch places. I’m supposed to be with child.”
“Oh, right. Come on beast. Get a move on.”
Helen Wheels just creaked merrily along like nothing was at risk. Just two
reagular people and their little cart moving into the city at night rather than
two apex predators pretending to be innofencive little lambs. A sight to
behold indeed.
She took a deep breath to calm herself. She saw the night sky to look for her.
It always calmed her, but the cycle was not in her favor. It wouldn’t be until a
couple of days for her to see her beloved moon guiding her with light in this
darkness. She frawned, but kept moving. She was ready. It was show time.
Astarion felt how Tav’s energy shifted from a nervious wreck to the predator
he had known her to be. He knew their plan would work, for she had her
common wild look about her. Whenever she focused her energy, she was
dangerous. That’s why she was chosen to lead them before they defeated the
netherbrain. But, he always wondered if she knew she did this. She was
basically a loaded spring or a for us like a missle. She had an objective and
she never missed.
They could see the giant rock wall that protected the city of unwantedpredators, but if said predators were pretending to be citizens, then the gates
were open. The nighttime cover was surely useful for them now. Tav though
Astarion looked less like his nature, but…
“Slouch your shoulders. Also, keep your head a little down. Imagine you are
some weak pathetic little boy. You still look too regal. You’re supposed to be
sick.”, she whispered at him.
He rolled his eyes. She just heard ‘tsk’, but he did as told. He knew she was
in the ‘zone’, so she was noticing even the shadows of shadows at this point.
It was rather sexy to him, having this woman being so protective. She was on
the hunt and wouldn’t allow even a moth to touch him right about now.
That’s hot.
“Right then, I see them. It’s lucky they would have it there as opposed to the
other side.”, she pointed to the barge.
They could see the small Moondown Isle. Now, she saw that they could have
simple walked across, but she was unwilling for mistakes. The little road
could still allow water to touch his skin. Barge it was.
She walked forger while touching her brand. It burned hotter tonight. Perhaps
their daytime fun time had a lot to do with it. It made her wince, but got her
into the mindset that she’s a poor frail pregnat woman who is collecting her
ride.
“Good evening, friend. Do you remember me?”The Hellrider guard did recognize her and gave her a nod.
“Ma’am. That I do. Ready to collect your crossing?”
“Indeed. I’ve brought my husband and the mule, too.”
“Certainly. But I need to check your cart to check for possible contraband.”
Tav wasn’t too happy about this, but had no choice.
“Of course, I understand. I must say, I do have my husband’s bow and some
arrows. It’s been a dangerous road.”
The guard indeed saw the bow and arrows and thought they were too small
for him. Perhaps he was indeed as weak as she’d thought. It was insane how
anyone would want to give a cursed albino a chance, let alone give him
children.
“Mh. Very well. Everything seems good enough. Here. This will allow you
entry at the Riverroad Gate.”
“Thank you, so much. You’ve been a blessing.”, Tav told the woman while
touching her shoulder.
Tav knew that sometimes, when she touched folks, she could affect their
energy or emotions. Little did she realize that she began to develop that
peculiar skill after a couple of months of feeding a certain vampire spawn.As for Astario, he simply kept quiet whild loading and helping Tav. She
didn’t need the help, but they were commited to the bit. She moved to the
center of the barge and said hello to the fisherman. He greeted her with a nod,
but gave Astarion a weird look.
The water of the river was surely dangerous to cross swimming, so she was
glad they found a way to cross more easily. They could see the outlines of
drying racks, and smaller boats and all sorts of plant life you’d expect on the
edge of the river.
As they moved, the furthes side of the Triple-Bridge got smaller and smaller,
while the surrounding wall got bigger and bigger. His face was stone, so she
hit him to knock it off. He softened his face and shoulders. He even
commenced to pretend breathing again. She got closer to him, pretending it
was cold, so he held her in a sort of half hug. This would allow him to fit the
role better.
“Ma’am, would you need to be escorted to your family’s home?”
“Oh, bless you, but I don’t think so. See, I’m feeling a bit sick and need some
fresh air. Besides, my brother is waiting for us at the Silver Sword.”
“Very well, Ma’am. Well, here we are. Be safe in your travels. Sir.”
The Hellrider guard noded to Astarionto say farewell as did the fisherman.
Astarion nodded back and help Tav down before moving the cart slowly onto the ramp to get off the barge. Tav gave them a light bow and turned around
to catch up with Astarion who had began walking towards the gate. Tav had
the paper given to her ready to present it in case needed.
The night guard was clearly half asleep, but had seen them just get off the
bardge, so he didn’t move much. As Tav and Astarion got right to the
entrance, he saw the paper and just waved them in while settling himself
better on his stool.
Two down, three to go. They kept moving with purpose. Rule one of not
being mugged or stopped: move with purpose. Rule two: be confident on
your steps. Rule three: if needed be, run.
So far, the dind’t have to run. Tav turned around to see if the guard or anyone
else was looking at them or following them. No one. it was too dark out and a
little cold. Astarion kept scouting forward trying to catch patrols, but the only
one he saw had turn to his left, likely towards a bridge.
As they kept moving, sure enough, the brige was there. The passed several
buildings like stores. They had passed by The Riverbarge and even Ondraer’s
Fine Pages and then The Bellblade Throne. They were close to freedom now.
They kept a brisk pace, her robe billowing in the wind. No onw seemed to be
watching them, so far it seemed.“Hey! You two! Halt!”
Tav and Astarion slowed down. His hand went to his dagger, but Tav put her
hand on his forearm. She knew a fight would be worse, so she had to try the
peaceful way first. The guard caught up with them. It was the same moron
from Elturel. That or he had a twin.
Tav’s hand went to her mouth and slouched a bit. She was pretending to be
sick. She was “pregnant” after all. Astarion moved closer to put his hand on
her back to comfort her. He still didn’t talk. He did try his best to soften his
look.
“Oh, I’m sorry, ma’am. Sorry to bother you. Do you need some asistence?”
“Just let us go to Tindar’s Own. I need something to eat. Anything to calm
my sickness. The baby is hungry.”
As they talked, another paladin aproached. Tav recognized this one, too.
Lucky for her it was dark enough for them to not seem to notice her from
Elturel. The second guard spoke.
“What is it with you and pestering females?”, he said with some exasperation
in his voice. He continued.
“Not all women will be the wood-elf that told you off. Let it go.”
“But, I-… I mean-…”, the young guard stammered.
“No, you are still in training and I will have to write a report. The woman isclearly sick and needs to get a move on. Let them go.”
The second guard, looked at Astarion with weary eyes. Then said, “Besides
they don’t look like they mean any trouble. Just a husband and pregnant
wife.”
Astrion began to make the connection from what Tav told him. He thought it
was hilarious that she indeed was the same woman that told him off. He kept
that to himself. He looked worried still and Tav looked a mess. She’d
managed to get her hair a bit more worse than before. It seemed to be
working.
“I’m sorry ma’am. We’ll let you be.”
The second soldier grabbed the arm of the fires one and basicaly dragged him
off down one of the many alley ways.
“Fuck this city. I’m never coming back.”, Tav said under her breath.
“Likewise my dear. That paladin seems to be developing a personal vendetta
towards him. Jus what exactly did you do?”, he said quizzicaly.
“I’ll tell you later. Let’s go. Just 2 more streets.”
They crossed the market quickly enough. Despite being late night, now closer
to midnight, there were still some stalls and people lingering about. That
worked wonders for their cover.As they kept getting closer, Astarion saw another patrol moving closer. Tav
decided to flick with force another vial forward for it to land in the road. The
stench spread, but as they kept moving forward, they had to cross it. Now the
area and some other unfortunate civilians now smelled the same as them.
They would surely throw the paladins off.
Sure enough, as people were wondering what happened and where the smell
was coming from, these fake lamb kept moving while also looking around to
“figure out” the commotion. The paladins were too entertained. The passed
unnoticed.
Then Astarion saw some barrels that were very near the exit. He swiftly
separated from Tav and the cart. She kept moving it with one hand as she saw
his plan. He was going to let them roll to get the attention of the guards at the
Vale Gate.
The noise had the guards run towards the mess of barrels, and away from the
stinky couple passing by. Though they smelled, some paladins came running
smelling like the same awful stench.
Tav and Astarion made it out.Thankfully, with the little light that existed from torches scattered about at
some places, it provided them with sufficient light to take notice of the
general land. They’ve never been through here specifically, so it was new
terrain.
Immediately outside the stone wall perimeter of Berdusk, you could see some
markent gardens where the citizens could buy fresh produce. Further along
there were scattered homesteads with stone walls and thatch roofing and
barns.
You could smell the farm smells between animals in their fenced pastures,
the animal waste they produced to fertilize the land, and the said crops using
it. It all looked beautifu. This is what Tav wanted, but for her claimed people:
the spawn.
“It’s beautifu, too bad the religious freaks ruin it.”
“What’s that?”, asked Astarion.
“Never mind. Let’s go. Our ruse worked, but now we need to beat the sun.”
Astarion made a face. Talking about this was still a sore topic, so she didn’t
focus much attention on it. To her, it was just something they had to deal
with, but she understood it was still painful for him to have lost his freedom
to move as he wished, twice now.As they kept moving forward, Tav got her coin purse ready. She was going to
do what she like to call “acceptable stealing.” You see, what she would do…
well, just keep reading. She’s going to show us anyway.
“I can smell some things over there. Come on.”
Astarion already knew what she was doing, for he hear the coin purse jingle.
“Do you really intend on overpaying for produce-… again?”
“I don’t have change. Your coin purse is somewhere in the bag, and shut up.
Let me be.”, she said as she stuck her tongue out while moving quickly into a
homestead that had some produce in boxes outside.
As she did that, he decided to follow but keep going. The cart squeaked a
little, so he didn’t want to wake up the owners while Tav was taking what she
could get. Besides, her food stash was down to the fish and some herbs. He
needed her to eat more, and better. That and the fact that he didn’t mind her
taking things. He just minded that she did leave too much coin behind.
So, Tav quickly saw the tings they had. She was guessing prices, but had no
idea, so she just left 7 gold coins and hoped it was more than enough.
“Let’s see, I’m taking this box and these, that, and maybe this. Oh! This too.
Mm-… I haven’t had this in a while-… I shouldn’t-… I should and I will.”All in all her haul were about 6 potatoes, 4 yams, 6 sweet potatoes, 2 onions,
and a bag of wheat. She left the coins right where the missing box was, and
took off running. Astarion gave a little giggle without turning back. He’d
seen her before. She always made a face as if she was stealing treasure.
For you, sepctator, imagine Captain Jack Sparrow running away from the
other pirates at that one beach. But this time it was a short brown elf with a
crate of vegetables, wearing a white dress, or in this case tunic. Can you
believe there are no dresses or skirts in Baldur’s Gate 3! Seriously, just 2
items and the other one is basically underwear with gold accents! Okay,
sorry. Back to business.
She caught up to him and place the crate on the cart. Not really winded, but
her breathing was a little heavy. The kept moving while scouting the land.
They realised that it was still quite a way till the forest and the night’s sky
was changing color. Time was running out. Also, they would have to follow
the river back north having followed it south to Berduks. It couldn’t be
helped.
Tav realised that keeing closer to the river helped minimize Astarion’s scent.
The water, the fish, the barges, everything left a lingering smell that was able
to mask his vampire musk and her own. So, river it was until they entered the
forest. Besides, that was her domain.As they kept moving, Astarion saw the oxen pen. Tav saw him.
“It’s too big, my love. I mean-… how about the small sheep for now?”
“Fine. I’ll do the one and a Tav, tonight.”, he said as he took off.
“Seriously, that man. I would like the wool, though.”
She noticed her little coin purse was gone. She smiled. It was still surprising
to her how he was so willing to do things these days that would minimize the
bother of others. She hated taking things without persmission, so her
compromise was to leave more than enough coin to replace it.
For so long she had not needed coin, so she simply made her own items. But
since being with her friends, she learned that sometimes it’s just convenient
to pay for some things. These days, she didn’t make her underwear and she
also bought thread and needles. It made her happy that he took the coin purse.
Then she noticed an old building that was partially collapced in the distance,
which also allowed a pretty good access to the river. And she couldn’t see
any patrols with torches nearby. Even the watch tower in the distance was
still far enough for them to take shelter. So, she headed towards that building.
Astarion, would be back soon enough-… with a poor dead sheep.
Tav got her weapons from the cart and put them on. She felt naked without
them. As she kept moving at a swift space, she was trying to hear for noice or
notice scents. All sorts of things could be lurking and she had a scent thatcould attrack to a point and then repell, but why allow them to get near in the
first place. Being vigilant paid off.
Right when she was about to stop, she saw movement near the ruins she
wanted to use for shelter. It looked like a giant dog. She saw it first, and she
simply let her body take over. The arrow landed in between its eyes. Next
thing she knew, she felt a swift breeze beside her and heard a thud.
There was a sheep at her feet, and a vampire walking towards her with a bit
of blood on the corner of his lip.
“Ew”, she said making a face.
“Begars can’t be choosers, my love. Besides, it’s best when it’s fresh.”
“I know, but I didn’t notice you coming. Sorry.”
“Not to worry. No harm, no fowl. Here.”
He gave Tav her arrow back. It could still be used. He also gave her the
quiver full of arrows from the unfortunate gnoll they just took out. It was the
first one they’ve seen directly, all the rest were merely shadows and
whispers.
Then Tav spoke in a low voice.
“It’s time. You reckon we should. I mean, the smell-…”
“No worse than the stench we still have on now.”“Good point.”, she took off running and got there in no time.
He didn’t even wait for her to ask, he just took the empty buckets. She’d been
so nervious before that she forgot to fill up the waterskins at the river, so
she’d have to do those in the day time.
She began to check the ruined building and noticed that there was still some
part of the roof left and at least three walls, albeit not complete walls. It
would have to do.
She extetended the tent on the old cobble floor or what it seemed to be an old
barn and took out the frame of the tent. By the time she was getting the things
out, Astarion was back with the buckets. He placed them where they
wouldn’t be knocked over and began to help Tav.
Tav went around the area to place the warding stakes and throw a couple of
enchantments, too. He goal was to keep any gnoll from stoping around lookin
for the other one. She then went to get that body and drag it away. She was
strong enough that it wouldn’t be an issue. She took her small spade with her,
though.
When she was far enough away, she began to dig a shallow ditch near
enough the river to place the body. She checked it of anything of value first.
Then she went ot collect dry grass from around the ditch. She found some dry
branches and took those too.From her back on her belt, she took a small glass vial with a yellowish liquid
with a wax stopper. She removed the wax and poured the liquid over the
body and the branches. She added the tuffs of grass all around, including the
mouth of the beast. Then with the spell Gale taught her, she set the poor thing
on fire. Then she spoke her blessing to cleanse Astarion’s work:
From life comes death. From death comes life. The blood we take, we take
no burden. The life we take, we give back life. Let this sacrifised life know
it was not wasted. The flesh gives back to the nature it came from. The
blood gives life to he who was robbed from it. The skin will give warmth to
those that accept it. No part was wasted. No part will rot. Enter in me that
which life rejects and let me birth it back into the energy of the universe. I
will it by the fire that burns in me. I will it by the blood that runs through
me. In perfect love and perfect trust. So mote it be. This is so, and it is
done.
As she finished her incantation, the fire burned a little brighter, but then it
began to snuff out. The body was charred beyond recognition now. She
stayed a little longer just to make sure it was good enough to be buried. Then
she used her spade to throw dirt and rocks and whatever else was around to
cover the it all. Then she ran back. In all, by now the process took about 5
minutes. The oil she uses now helps speed up the fire.
When she got back, Astarion had placed the frame and the tent cloth on top.The only thing missing was the side tent. She noticed that the floor was
causing a bit of an issue for the frame, which ment her tent hole would also
be.
“Give me a minute. I’ll remove the rocks from it.”
“Thanks.”
While he worked on removing the stones, fresh dirt smell was filling up the
space. She loved that smell of fresh dug soil. Perhaps that’s why she liked her
man so much. Don’t you dare kink shame our girl. I like fresh dirt smell, too
and I’m not with-… never mind.
Because of the rocks on the ground, there was plenty of moisture on the
actual dirt, so it made digging easy. She was able to finish up quickly
enough. Then she told Astarion to head inside as she put up the side tent
herself. She emptied out the cart and tied it to the frame of the tent, and took
the things inside. She placed them at the entrance and he took the things to
place a little out of the way.
Finally, she placed the side tent from the outside, making sure it was secure.
This tent had no bottom, so it was just the dirt that was dug out. She made
sure it was at the proper incline to ensure the water they were going to use
went away form the larger one. Then just one more perimeter check for good
measure and she was done. She saw how the horizon was now getting
orange. She gave a quick smile and went inside with the water buckets.“Honey, I’m home!”, she mocked Astarion.
“Everything all right?”, he asked having seen her take the gnoll’s body
earlier.
“Yes. Nothing of value. Just a foot soldier. Poor sod. It’s over now.”, she said
with a sad voice.
He knew she didn’t like to kill unless it was a situation of “it versus her”,
which is why she avoided getting into fights. She was stealth unless she had
to attack. This was something he’d learn to do as well. The good thing was
that it was working well enough. No waste and no bodies to take care of. She
was very meticulous about cleaning up. Which reminded him of the sheep.
When he came too, Tav was praying over it. He found that doing her
incantation would keep the flesh from smelling for a couple of days. This
mean, she would take care of it in the morning. She really did want the wool.
He began to set up the bed pelts and the toys he bought her rolled out.
“Careful! They’re precious.”, she bent down to pick them up and placed them
on on the side of the pelts.
“You remember when we spent camp with the gang? You never had the cloth
on the floor.”
“I didn’t think it useful to be honest.”
“I know. Your tent was a mess. That’s why we played in mine.”
She giggled as she blushed.He hugged her from behind and whispered in her ear, “ And look at us now.
A home and pure bliss.”
He kissed her neck. She moved forward for him to let her go.
“I agree, but, it’s time. We stink.”
She stepped forward and started to pull at his shirt. He bent over to let her
remove his shirt. she let it drop to the floor. Then she pulled at the leather
buckle of his pants.
“Aren’t we eager tonight? I don’t mind. I’m just pleasently surprised.”
“Come on! Get a move on, young man. I will not waste water.”
He now understood her urgency. She was going to wash “two birds one
stone” again. That gave him an idea. A cheeky smile appeared on his face
when she turned to head into the side tent. He followed. But she noticed.
“Nope! Get the soap and washcloths first. I swear I think that’s all you think
about. I’m not complaining, but you really have to find a hobby or
something.”
He laughed, “you are my hobby. You are teaching me how to love and live
again.”
“Point taken. Come along then.”
As he entered the tent, he turned right back. He’d forgotten his tooth brush.
He knew her well enough to know he’d just ate literal “junk food”, so he had
to clean up.“What was that?”, she asked looking at him funny.
“Almost forgot the tooth brushes.”, he said as he hander hers to her.
“Thanks. Love you babe.”
By now, she was nude. She was going to use the same soap for everything
and everyone again. She still had about 1.5 k worth by now, but wasn’t about
to waste it. Eventually, Astarion told her about that one kid in Elturel. She
still thought it was a fair deal.
She tugged at his underwear, too. She was intent on washing before going to
sleep. She was surely tired, but was happy and grateful that the plan worked.
It always took a mental toll.
“Tav, let me help with that and you can focus on you. You look tired.”
“Thank you. Yes please. I guess for now, let’s just hand it inside. The frame
will hold and it’s not much.”
“I agree.”
So, they began scrubbing and washing and rinsing. The stink from the viles at
Berdusk easily washed away. Tav remembered her earlier recipies of this
stink liquid and how it had evolved. Now, it was easy to wash off, but it
lingered if you let it.
As soon as he wrung the clothes, she helped hang the things and they went
back inside. It was his turn to be washed. She grabbed the washcloth andbegan to scrub his back. Then she did his neck. She also wrung the cloth on
his hair to give it a good wash. It was becoming their ritual in the privacy of
their little home. They would help each other wash the dirt and grime of a
hard day’s night.
“My gods! The towel! You now what? Forget it. Why do I even bother with
it?!”, Tav said with mild annoyance.
He just laughed. He forgot it too.
They just walked out of the small and into the big tent. He headed to the pack
for the towel. He figured they’d just share it. So, he helped her get dry and
then did himself. Then she kept it on her hair like the strange bee-hive some
women do.
Between you and I, it’s crazy. Her hair is short. It’s to her ears, likely to keep
her neck accesable for feeding. But that’s my guess. Anyway…
“Astarion, are you-… peckish?”, she said shyly.
He looked at her with surprise. He had just gotten some blood, but he wasn’t
about to say no. It had been hours since he last drank from her. Surely, a little
wouldn’t do much harm, would it? Probably not, but it’s her body, her
choice. Same for him.
“Well, no. I just ate. But, I wouldn’t mind a little nibble.”
She laughed at that. Then he hugged her from the back and began to sway.
“But first my dear, you have to eat something before and after.”“I know, but I didn’t want to.”, she said begrudgingly.
She moved away to go get the things from the pack. She had gotten all her
thigs from the cart, which was now empty outside. The reason she was trying
to avoid eating was that she no longer had bread or cheese. She had to cook,
but she was feeling pretty exhausted.
Astarion, taking notice of her current slowness, walked to her and began to
help her with things. He wsn’t a cook per say, but he could help with prep
work.
“All right, Tav. What’s on the menu today? Potatoes, onions, fish?”, he made
a face at the last one.
“I think yes. Can you help me cut up a potato and-… um-… half the onion.
“You can put the other half facing down on that parchment paper so it
doesn’t stink up the place.”, she said as she was setting up her pot and pan in
the other tent. That one has a window flap.
“In there? Really?”
“Yes, I’ll have to use some fire. This tent doesn’t have a cloth floor and it has
the little window. It’ll be fine-… I guess. I just don’t want to go outside right
now.”
“Fair enough. Well, here you are. Where do I put them?”
“Here. Thanks.”, she said as she placed the skillet in front of him.
Her set up was rough, but it would have to do. She had collected some of thewood shavings from the shaft making in a small pouch, which now she’d use
to help. Then with all the control she could manage, she cast fire bolt. She
was using the pot as a safe way to control said fire, and had already openened
the window flap and closed the main tent one. She’d smoke herself out.
Besides, this side tent was a little loose around the bottom edge, so she also
moved it a little up to open it.
Due to the bulding corner they were using for cover, not a lot of day light
was coming in. The tent indeed feel cooler than normal. So, she finished up
her prep work. She now had some fish, potatoes, and onions all in pieces.
Then she added water to it. This one being from the smaller waterskin, which
is for drinking… obviously.
As the fire started, she left it on the floor with the skillet on top. She used her
daggers to help keep an opening between both the pan and skillet, so the fire
could keep going and the smoke to get out. She went back into the main tent.
Astarion had decided to not get dressed and was just lying on the pelts with
his eyes closed. She smiled and blushed as she also had decided to not get
dressed. They had gotten very comfortable with each other to not care about
dressing up while inside their private world. This was theirs. No filters. Just
them.
She decided to not go to him just yet. Instead she stood by the flap and justlooked at him. Her mind wanted to memorize ever inch of him as if it crucial
that no line, no blemish, and no scar could be misplaced. The joy she felt in
her heart knowing that this man, who very slowly showed her that she too
existed not as a shadow, but as a person, a woman, was certainly something
to be happy about. They had come a long way from that day of the boar and
his dagger at her throat.
Look at him being all perfect and beautiful. How in the hells did I manage
to get someone like him be with me? I’m just a-… perhaps he has seen in
me what I see in him. Either way, I’m glad that I got to meet him and be
with him, if only for a moment.
She then told him, “Astarion-… I love you. Thank you for choosing me, too.”
He just smiled smugly showing just a little glimpse of fangs.
He knew he was loved, a lot, by this woman, his beast of a woman. As he lay
there, he remembered what had just occurred. How her movements flowed
like the river’s current, silent, deadly, graceful. The way she was such at
home being dangerous yet chose to be the opposite.
This was new to him. He was coerced to do such horrible things for so long
that he never thought he could change, but now he paid for sheep.
I can’t believe that in less than a year she’s managed to unravel so muchof what’s made me. And all through sheer stubborness of giving me a
chance. Of all beings, this one chose the one that could kill her! But then
again, knowing her, she can do that to me as well. Perhaps we were meant
to be. Disturbing thought that I had to endure what I had in order to wait
for her.
He laughed mostly to himself, but Tav got his attention.
“What’s so funny?”, she said now with a mouth full of food.
“You, me, us.”, he gave her a smirk.
“Same. I think it’s surreal. All of it. All of this.”, she covered her mouth as
she spoke.
“It is. I was thinking that perhaps this might have been fate. I don’t know. I
guess what I mean is that I had to wait for someone like you to come along.”
She almost shouted, “SOMEONE like me! You were expecting someone
else? I’m offended.”
She said this imitating his voice in indignation.
They both laughed at this. But it was true. They got luck after having gone
through so much. Now, they had each other to help on the bad days, but also
to enjoy the good ones.
She continued, as she kept eating her food slowly. There was no rush.
“So, would you like to make a town like the one we saw outside of Berdusk?
But like, under or something?”“Mh-… I don’t know. I suppose we could try, but I haven’t really thought
about it.”, he said now looking at her.
“So, I have been toying with several things, but I think now is a great time to
bounce off some of them.”
She was very enthusiastic about her future plans with him and her found kin.
That things would work out was yet to be decided.
So here is a general list of things she’s considering to try or convince others
to try:
First, there is the idea of once seeing how many spawn are still grouped
together, to create a sort of council. The idea is to have the older ones be
heads of a small group of spawn. These groups being small in size. Perhaps
groups of 10 to 15 working together to keep each other safe. They, Astarion
and herself, would count as one head and lead a group, perhaps the more
difficult ones.
Second, speak to the spawns about creating rules with checks and balances.
This means, setting up rules of behavior and consequences. She is afraid that
letting so many spawn go rampant on any land will only lead to unnecessary
chaos. She believes that they too have it in them to rejoin humanity in their
own way.
Third, with them, create a sort of meal plan so that they get the sustenance
they need, but allow people to go about their business without fearing they
won’t return home, like it was done to them.
Fourth, create a business plan. They will need coin, all of them. They willneed housing, too. They need the same things the living do, but perhaps not
entirely the same ways. She wants to see if they could potentially create
caravans or settlements of spawn to help each other and protect each other.
Fifth, she was really wanting the creation of community services to help one
another. She knew by now that many of them, especially the youger spawn,
still had a recollection of their past. Some had been doctors and carpenters.
She was certain that perhaps they could teach one another skills to help grow
their community. This included offering therapy to those who seeked it.
She was well aware that they had all gone through something horrific. She
was also aware that most if not all are feeling scared and alone. They lost
everything when they were stolen. She wanted to give them a chance.
In her mind, she was not given a chance, so she took it by force. Now, she
had a loving partner and their little home, which sure was a tent, but it was
theirs. She really wanted the spawn to experience a calm life despite their
curse.
As Astarion heard her insane ideas, despite his best efforts, he couldn’t help
but be intrigued and a little excited. He was now very different from who he
was months ago and it was due to this woman full of spunk. She wanted to
share her joy with his kind. That’s all she was looking for.
It almost make me upset to recall that he considered ascending for power. Hewould have done that for himself, but this one was putting her life in danger
not only because she wanted to be with him. She also wanted to share her
happiness and joy with others like him for the simple reason of “it’s only
fair.” As if it was her fault the seven thousand were cursed because she
messed up. She wasn’t even alive for most of it.
He came back to the present.
“I said what do you think, Astarion? Too much? I know it’s crazy, but
couldn’t we at least try to talk to them?”, she said with a lump on her throat.
He knew she was scared, but her fear was not for her. It was for them. She
didn’t want them to be hunted forever. In her view, they had the same right to
live, love, and thrive, despite the curse that was forced on them. But it would
be a lot of hard work.
“I’m sorry. Yes. I do think your ideas or plans are surely impossible, but I
think that we should at least try. I think there might be a few that could
consider the idea.”
“I agree. That’s why I’m so nervous. I mean, none of you can make more
spawn, so that can be used as leverage when it comes to the living. I mean, if
we are going to fight for a space to be. But that means, we must take care of
everyone that wants to join the good fight. I just hope they can see my insane
logic.”
“I hope so too.”, he said with the same uncertainty that she had.It was a far fetched plan, but that’s all she had for now.
She stood up and took her skilled back into the side tent for washing. She
brushed her teeth, washed her hands and face, and then went back in. Then
she got on the pelts beside him. They snuggled, him with one of his arms
behind her neck and she snuggling on the side of his chest.
They kept chatting.
“Tav? Would you have liked to become a vampire?”, he asked in a soft voice.
“Mm-… to be honest, no. I mean, I think that vampires can’t love. At least
that’s what I understood from that demon. Perhaps, like you, a freed spawn
would be fine. I mean, I wouldn’t care either way to be honest. Though, like
this, being alive, we can achieve more. For example, you have a lot of
strength and can dazzle folks into doing your bidding. But, I can buy things at
shops during the day, have you try them on, and in case needed, go and
changed them before the shops close.”
He laughed. Here he was thinking she might go into something more
philosofical regarding living forever and she was thinking of shirts and pants.
“Tav. Never change.”
He leaned in to kiss the top of her head.“I won’t then. Are you sure, though? I mean, I know I’m still rough around
the edges and well, you’re still a man from high society. Look at me having
you sleep on pelts hiding in a delapidated barn. This is no place for a man
like you!”, she sat up with a bit of a panic.
He thought about her reaction.
I swear this woman is insane. I’m a natural killer and she’s worried that I
lay on pelts!
She continued.
“The thing is that I don’t see you as a vampire or spawn or whatever. I just
see you, Lord Astarion Ancunin, Magistrate at Baldur’s Gate. A noble high
elf who was attacked by a gaggle of gur, which resulted in him being infected
with an incurable disease that he can’t spread. It’s just that to me, you are a
man, someone who has no reason to be with a feral thing like me.”, she said
the last part looking down.
Despite everything they had been through and everything she had learned,
she still focused on the wrong thing. She thought of herself as inferior
because of class. She felt it with Wyll then, too and even with Gale.
She saw her friends as people with manners and being of high society.
Lae’Zel was more military like, but all of them had grown with rules and
costums. She was robbed from hers. She felt like she belonged nowhere and
as such, it was hard for her to believe a noble man would spare her a thought.“Tav. Have you felt this way all this time? Do you think that you shouldn’t
be with me because I was noble born? Seriously woman. The way your mind
works is impossible. I love you. Only you. I stopped being a ‘noble high
born’ the moment I was taken. And sure, the rest of the group along with
myself did grow up in society, but I don’t think it matters. All of us combined
are missing what you have ten fold. You have heart. Just look at the things
you have achieved before us, with us, and after us. You are more deserving
of palaces and crowns than any of us. And now, you are still risking your life
for a group of feral spawn just because you are dead set on giving them a
chance at life! In my time on this land, I’ve never met anyone like you. If
anything, I’m the one that is undeserving of someone as special, as important,
as magical, as impossible as you, Tav.”, he said while lifting her chin so she
could look at him.
He wiped a tear from her eye. This was something that still bothered her, the
feeling of being inadequate or less than. She saw him as this impossible
being, beautiful, strong, intelligent, charming, deadly, but she didn’t see the
same qualities in herself despite having them. The only difference they had
was that she had a lot of heart and he was just starting to grow one because of
her.
“I-… I guess.”, she hiccuped.
“No, I guess. It is true. Would I lie to you? I mean, now. Would I lie to you
now?”
“No, you wouldn’t.”, she avoided his eyes.“Come again?”, he questioned her to force her to look at him.
She looked at him.
“Oh, Astarion. I know you wouldn’t. But, I can’t stop feeling this. I’m-… I’m
nervious that you’ll meet another like you and that you’ll leave me.”, she
cried.
There it was. She was scared, but for the wrong reasons. She was sure that
Astarion would be better off with another spawn with a similar situation. In
her view, she was very much alive, always a temptation. She also had to do
things to stay alive. She had to cook, clean, and have a tent. The very things
that he found so fascinating, she found them a hindrance to his well being
and comfort. There was clearly a disconnect here for both. But it was Tav and
she’s always seeing things in a different way.
“WHAT?! LEAVE YOU FOR ANOTHER?!”, he couldn’t help but shout in
surprise.
He continued, but with a calmer voice.
“Tav, my dear. No! I wouldn’t even be able to share you with Gale and he
sure as hell wanted you. Had he not been so stuck on Mystra, he might have
beaten me to the punch. Same for Wyll. I got lucky you thought he was
royalty, too. Hell, even Karlach was dissappointed that I got to you first. I
basically had to fight against them to get your attention and by then you
already love them! I swear woman the things you focus on never stops to
surprise me. So, no Tav. You said I belong to you and that you belong to me.
We are stuck together even if it is to be miserable together.”She laughed at that. She had told him that back at the inn at Elturel.
“I’m sorry, Astarion. Is just that-… since I was alone most of my life, too, I
always felt inadequate. Whenever I would visit the towns, people whispered
saying horrible things about me. I was just there trying to sell my things and
learn from them. I was interested how they could all co-exsits but not be
violent like my clan. But, they didn’t have to use knives to cut. They saw me
and would laugh. I mean, now with your help, I don’t dress like I did. But
before I simply made my things. Sometimes, I’d see nobles visit the towns
and they were the worst. So I just learned to avoid them. Then I met you and
you treated me nice. It was great. I finally got to meet a noble man and he
wasn’t an asshole.”
“Oh, wow. Now that’s a twist I wasn’t expecting.”, he said not hiding his
surprise.
“Yes. That’s why I paid attention to you more. I mean, we met Wyll time
after. But, despite of you being sassy and nasty, I saw that you were
pretending, too. Like me. I was pretending to be human. I knew I was feral.
Most folks in the towns I visited said it. They tolerated me because I didn’t
cause trouble and my products were good. And I know that they took
advantage of me when it came to trade or coin, but I didn’t mind. I like bread
and cheese. You can’t find that in the forest. So, you see, I had to learn how
to be human by watching you lot. It was great fun, but difficult. There were
times I dind’t understand what you guys were talking about. It wasn’t until
you and Gale helped me with my reading that I began to get better. I’m
thankful.”“Mh-… that explains so much. I apologize, but I also thought you were more
like an animal at first. There was this wild look to your eyes as if you were
always on the look out for danger, but when we were in a job, your eyes
changed. You were almost like me, a predator. Your deadly focus and
ferocity was always a sight to behold. I think that’s why Lae’Zel and Misora
respect you. Hell, I would even dare say that Misora acturally likes you
because of how you fought for her.”
Tav laughed a little. “You think so? I’ve always thought she hated me,
despite it. She enjoyed saying nasty things to you because she knows it got
me angry.”
“I know. If looks could kill, you’d have destroyed her a hundred times over.”,
he laughed as he remembered how Tav one time, she almost did. He
continued.
“But, I need you to understand that you’ve grown and learned so much. I’m
really proud of how far you’ve come and I’m glad I’ve had the chance to be
here to see it. You will always have this fereal edge to you, but now you’re
better focused. I mean, you’re making plans with a vampire to create a
commune. What feral animal would do that? Even more so, your reasons is, I
think, noble. You want to give them a chance back at live. It’s insane, but I
want to see if it can be. If just out of curiosity, really.”
She smiled as she wipied another tear. Then she leaned in towards hisstomach and blew a raspberry. Real hard. He jumped a little. She started
laughing.
“Thank you, Astarion. You always know how to make me feel better.”
“Uh, you’re welcome, my little weirdo.”, he rolled his eyes.
He couldn’t believe she’d done that but was afraid she might start doing that
more often. But in reality, he didn’t mind. He was learning and accepting that
her love language mimicked animals in nature. Nipping, biting, sniffing, you
name it, she would do it, had done it, and would do again. He felt lucky to
have this now though. Besides, she was teaching him new tricks, too. And
that was certainly rather fun.
“By the way? You hungry? I’m ready.”, she said looking at him with a smile.
“I wish I could say I’m fine, but I can’t say no to you.”, he said with a
seductive smile.
She giggled and playfully punched his shoulder.
“Stop dazzling me. It makes me tingle all over.”
“Then I’ll keep doing it. I want to see what happens when I do.”
“Ah! You know what happens!”, she laughed as he pushed her on to her
back.
She looked at him and marbled at how this man, with all his history, was now
capable of a gentle touch. She was glad she gave herself to him and he didthe same. He then kissed her. She kissed him back. Despite her exhaustion
though, her body always craved for him. He took notice. His body craved
hers too. It was as if they were trying to make up for 200 years of lost time in
an instant.
She wispered into his hear while she hugged him as he kissed her.
“Astarion, take me.”
He straightened to look at her, lust in his eyes. He knew he didn’t need her
voiced confirmation, but hearing his name on his lips was always something
he desired. She moved her head to allow an easy bite. He smiled and then
showed his fangs and bit her.
She allowed her body to relax as she felt how his fangs pierced through her
skin and she felt how his bit still felt like a shard of ice that then numbed her
senses. By now her pulse no longer quickened like it did at the beginning.
No, now it was pure arousal for her. This was theirs. It was erotic for him to
have her, for her to be taken.
He also felt it. Her taste let him now she was enjoying this dangerous act. but
her body showed him with presicion. Her hand went up to his head, straight
to his hair. He felt how she pushed him more towards him while a little
moan escaped her lips.He finished his feeding and licked his lips. He saw her face, a smile full of
bliss. She enjoyed this as much as he did. His impossible woman, indeed.
They allowed their bodies to simply enjoy each other’s touch. His body was
on top of hers, feeling how her own heat produced sweat. He liked the
wetness that her stomach and breasts left on his own skin. Her scent was now
on him and that was madening. Then he moved his leg up to catch hers to
make it easier for him to enter her. She didn’t protest.
As he began making love to his woman, his mind drifted to an encounter they
had in a job they’d taken. He didn’t want to admit it then, but he’d claimed
her for himself long before now. All the group knew it, but they pretended on
one noticed.
The job lead them to recover something stupid like always, but it would
allow them intel and coin. Thus they agreed. They all split up to loot and look
for the thing. Astarion never bothered with looking for anything for he knew
he could get away with pretending to look for it. He just knew if he followed
Tav just enough, she’d vouch for his participation. Clever little rogue he was.
So, he knew Tav tended to go down the ruins and caverns for she had pretty
good eyes sight unlike some of the others. Another benefit was that she
wasn’t a ‘princess’ like Shadoheart, so Tav was more capable of tolerating
cobwebs and odd smells. And true to Tav’s nature, Astarion found her in adeep corner of the ruined palace. She’d found her one of her favorite finds, a
little studio with bookshelves. She was perusing the shelves’ titles with a
little candle she’d found and lit. Though the light was dim, it gave her enough
to see clearly in this odd darkness.
As she was looking over the spines of the books, she was distracted enough
to not notice a certain spawn walking slowly towards her. But then she placed
the candle holder down and removed her bow and set it down. Astarion was
curios to see what she was about to do and to his surprise, he didn’t expect it.
Tav was fidgeting with her pants. She unbuckled her pants and pulled them
down just a little. Then she was adjusting her underwear. She was wearing a
thong, but she was trying to adjust it while mumbling under her breath.
“That’s the last time I believe those girls about this. Thing is eating me up!”
Astarion couldn’t help but laugh and that’s when she finally noticed she
wasn’t alone like she’d thought. In her panic, she dropped the candle to the
floor and they were again in total darkness.
She said in a panic, “What are you doing here? Shouldn’t you be looking for
the sword?”
He got closer to her, “I am. I was. I found you. You seem to be in need of
assisstance.”“No. It’s just-… these tickle me. Whenever I move, they keep rubbing on me
and I can’t-…”
He knew she was flustered and he knew she arounsed do to a poor choice in
under garments.
“Then may I suggest you-… take them off.”, he said now next to her.
She gasped. Then she giggled.
“No, I’ll have to wait until we get back to camp and wear my normal ones.
Shadowheart said I should try them, but I regret it with a passion.”
As soon as she finished, Astarion couldn’t help himself and kissed her neck.
She gave soft moan. By now, it was difficult for Tav to pretend she had no
feelings for him. In her mind, she was playing her role well, “we’re just
friends.” No one believed them.
They gave each other hidden glances here and there. They’d always,
somehow end up together in a recovery quest. Then there was the night
feedings.
Tav, giving her best effort of a whisper spoke.
“Astarion. Careful. The guys are moving about. They might see us.”
“Mm-… is this an invitation to just keep quiet. I can do that.”
As he said it, he found her wetness in her crotch. He had moved his fingers
under the sad piece of cloth that was the culprit. And indeed, it was a realproblem for her. He smiled as he began moving his fingers in circles around
her aroused clit. As he did, she held on to his arm and clawed her nails into it.
As he reached down to kiss her neck, he purred, “careful now, Tav. I don’t
want you to finish just, yet.”
She muffled a moan and agreed with her head. She couldn’t say no to him.
She desired him, too. With her shaky fingers, she unbuckled his pants and
began to pull them down to reach in for his shaft. As her warm hand touched
his skin, he gave a little jolt. He laughed a little. Then kissed her on the lips,
using his tongue to part hers and end enter her. His tongue looking for hers
with a little too much eagerness.
Her soft hand began to clumsily move up and down his member, like a velvet
caress.
“Oh, woman. You surely know how to get my complete attention.”
“Astarion, please.”, she whimpered.
“Please what, my pet?”, he purred into her hear.
“Take me.”
Right on cue, that was all he needed. He lifted her up as her arms were now
free, so she pulled her pants letting them fall with a soft thud. She kicked the
test of pant legs off. She straddled him with her legs.
Then she reached behind her to gently lead him inside her. His cold sking
slowly entering her burning wetness. Her breath hitched, but she loved thisfeeling. He began moving, slowly. Her thoughts were a mess. All she could
focus on was how her own body was very aware of this man’s movements.
She kissed him again, but bit his lip.
“Mm-… seems like you are liking my efforts, my dear Tav.”
She moved her neck to expose more sking, and he kissed and sucked on it.
He wasn’t ready to bite just yet. Instead, he placed her down and turned her
around. As he did, he lifted her blouse, exposing her breasts and stomach.
She felt the coldness of his hands on her skin and enjoyed how the cold trails
left a lingering sensation. Then with his leg, he spread her own to allow him
entry once more. He held her tight, lest she fall over. He kept kissing her
neck and felt how she was now at his total mercy. She was giving in to him
completely and fearlessly.
Then she found him again rubbing outside of her wetness and guided his
thrust back inside. They both gave a light moan. Her eyes were closed as she
enjoyed this man that was loving her. His were too busy looking at her
enjoying ever moment in a random mirror on the wall. She hadn’t noticed it,
but he had.
Though he couldn’t see himself, he could surely see how every caress, every
touch, was taking her to nirvana. His name on her lips took him right with
her. He kept pushing himself inside her. Her arms were holding on for dearlife on his thighs. Though her nails were dinging in, he found pleasure in it.
She wasn’t meaining to hurt him, but she was enjoying him too much to
realise she was digging in. She was reaching her climax and he was racing
right behind her.
“Astarion, bite me.”, she whispered while her eyes were closed.
He did as he was told. Anything for her. He bit down and felt how her blood
rushed inside him as he kept going. It was the most delicious she’s ever
tasted, almost forbidden. But, she was his and that’s all that mattered. He
kept thrusting. She finally let go of her senses. Her litle death. He caught up
to her as he ended his feeding. Then he licked the bite he gave her and began
to kiss her neck again. Her body went limp, exhausted from reaching the
heavens with him. He removed himself from between her legs. She smiled.
He was thrilled. He wished he could see his reflection right about now. The
proud gloating face he had deserved to be admired. After all, he’d just made
Tav melt into him. He had just laid claim to her. And he was going to make
sure no one interfered with that fact. Tav was his, and his alone.
Meanwhile, neither him nor Tav realised the show they had just given. Turns
out that despite trying to be quiet, some sounds still carried and had brought a
small audience of two shocked, yet very quiet voyers. Wyll and Gale had
witnessed it all. Their hearts pounding in their hearts, clearly aroused by the
event they had just witnessed, but had been unable or perhaps unwilling toleave. Either way, they accepted the facts. Tav was his willingly. Astarion
was hers by her choice. They decided to leave once they were coming back to
their senses. Wyll had seen Astarion’s ears flick which told him they had
little time to leave before Tav was fully back and notice them, too.
They knew she wouldn’t appreciate her two friends gawking at her half
naked body while her vampire lover was still holding her as she regained her
strength. But Astarion now did have a knowing smile. He was sure that those
two would finally stop trying to get her attention. After all, he knew that all at
camp could hear when he entered Tav’s tent at night. Astarion knew that they
all knew feeding wasn’t the only thing that took place at her tent after
midnight.
He turned her around right after he pulled her blouse down. She was a fit of
giggles.
“We’re so bad.”, she giggled as she was trying to keep her voice down.
“Indeed, my pet. So, about those. What do you say if we trade?”
“WHAT?!”, she quickly covered her mouth. Then repeated herself.
“What, what do you mean?”, she asked again.
“You’ll wear mine, and I’ll keep yours. Mine won’t cause you the tickle, as
you said.”, he say with a coy smile.
She thought about it. Her eyes and her eyebrows scrunched trying to fall the
problem in his offer. There wasn’t. His were not like hers. She wasn’t goingto use these again anyway. Besides, it wasn’t like he couldn’t grab them after
she tossed them, so might as well just gift them, right?
“Fine. Keep them. Weirdo. But, I’m keeping yours if they are comfortable.”
“Sounds good by me.”, he said as he handed his over and held his hand out.
She put his on and giggled. They were a little big, but she liked how they
looked. He just put his pants back on and stuffed hers in the pocket.
“I’m keeping them. I’ll buy some more like these next town we visit.”, she
said as she began to get dressed.
“I’m sure you will, my pet.”, he said as he kissed her neck again.
Then she picked up her weapons and began walking back out and up the
stairs. But Astarion, as he followed her, said coily,
“Good thing no one was here to watch us make love, my dear. But if they
had, they would’ve loved the show.”
He knew the other two fools were still there, hiding in the shadows. They
figured it was best to lay low to not make any noise.
Tav tried to shush him, “Shush it. This didn’t happened.” But her muffled
giggled said the opposite. But Astarion just laughed. None of them ever
revealed what happened that day. Little did Astarion know then that he was
sure to find out what it meant to claim this impossible woman.Meanwhile, she was also reminiscing her claim to her chosen man. But her
mind went to their darker escapede. This time she remembered Cazador
Szarr’s Palace.
They were all on edge, but Astarion was worse. He was jumpy and jittery and
for good reason. You don’t simply walk into hell. But this time, he wasn’t
going to be alone. He had the whole gang, and he had his biggest champion;
Tav.
They were scouting the rooms on different floors. Karlach was having a blast
and even Lae’Zel and Shadoheart were enjoying the stealth mission. They
were all exploring, learning interesting intel, and knicking things that were
easy to stuff into their magic void bags.
The plan was to find any information possible and then meet back at the
entrace or somewhere nearby. Astarion figured that the people would be in
the bottom chambers, so there wouldn’t be many above. But still to be very
careful. There could be traps or worse lingering around. So, they all spread
out.
Per usual, Astarion and Tav left together, him guiding her through the halls
of his horrid past. He didn’t know what he was looking for, but he couldn’t
stop running. Tav knew he was terrified and lost. He didn’t know what to do.They reached one of the furthest rooms and he openened the door. He
stepped inside and she followed. The room was a bit small. There were some
bunk beds on the side of the wall. The walls were stone with some long
tapestries to decorate them. There were candles that provided enough light.
Everything was regal but wrong. You could feel the sickness these walls had
witnessed.
Astarion eyes gave him away. He was spiraling. Tav forced him to sit on one
of the available chairs. And then she held him while he sat. She ran her
fingers through his hair as she hugged him. Her fury was trying to escape her.
This was the hell that her Astarion had was stolen from by the parasite.
From one hell into another. He deserved that all the divines beg for his
forgiveness in her view. He’d done nothing but live his life, and then this.
She spoke in the softest voice.
“Astarion, hold on to me. I won’t let them take you. Not ever.”
He did as he was told and hugged her waist tightly. She held on to him, too.
Her legs between his, his face on her chest and stomach. He took in her scent
to calm down. She smelled of wild flowers and dirt after the rain. It was
comforting. She was comforting.
“Tav. I’m scared. I don’t know if I can do this.”She let go to look at him straight into his eyes.
“Look at me, Astarion. You are not his anymore. You have to finish this. You
know you do and you’re the only one that can.”
“But, what if I’m weak? If I take his place-… all that power-… I-…”, he
whispered while averting her gaze.
She held his chin firmly to force him too look at her again.
“You have to choose your next path. I know you know the consequences of
either choice you make, but it has to be you who decides. Or you can wait
here and we’ll handle it.”
“NO!”, she said loudly.
“That’s what I thought. Are you ready to go and finish this?”
“Yes. Let’s go.”
She let him go and started to walk towards the door, but he held her hand and
pulled her back towards him. He was now standing, but his eyes were
different. There was a fire in them now. He was ready to get the revenge he’d
been desiring for centuries. Tav look up at him. She wasn’t afraid, but she
didn’t understand why he stopped her.
“Tav. I need you right now.”
“I’m right here, Astarion. I’m not going anywhere.”
He kissed her passionately and she understood what he had truly meant. He
wanted to desecrate the palace’s rot with the love he’d found in Tav. Heneeded to begin his vengance here. She desired to defile everything that
Cazador stood for. She desired to make love to his beloved puppet. She
needed to claim Astarion for herself and this was the best place to do so. A
sort of “fuck you, Cazador. I’ve stolen him and now I will fuck him in your
home”. So, she was more than willing to let Astarion have his way. This time
it would be on Astarion’s terms. His freedom from his broken chains would
start here, in this room.
Tav began to pull at his shirt to get it off him, but he stopped her. He instead
unbuckled her pants and pulled them down. Then he did his own. She
stepped out of the pile on the floor. He kept looking at her with a fierce
intensity. Then he sat down on the chair and beckoned her over. She did as
she was told. Then she got on top of him. She guided his shaft inside her.
As she was about to moan, he caught her mouth and began to kiss her. Now it
was her who was claiming him. He then stopped kissing her. He needed to
see her face as she thrusted her self on him. He needed to see her pleasure.
And she needed to see him.
This time is was as if two defiant animals were mating to see who would
break first. Neither did. She sped up. Her breathing quickening. Her heart
pumping faster as her legs did all the work. Then he hugged her tight and
stood up. Her legs hugged him tightly while now it was him doing the work.
He moved them to the wall and used it as support. He kept pushing himselfinside faster and faster. He was starting to feel that it would be long until Tav
climaxed. Her eyes were giving her away. He decided to bite her. He needed
a clear mind and this was the best way. As he fed, he quickened his pace and
felt how Tav’s hips were now matching his own. She was there. He felt as
her walls clenched and she bit into his shoulder. He knew what she was doing
and why. The wilds had raised her and this was how animals mated. She was
claiming him, too. He stopped feeding.
He licked her wound and kissed her on the lips. The metalic taste of her own
blood still on his lips. She smiled as she came back.
“Astarion. I love you. Everything will turn out fine.”
He was surprised for this was the first time she let it slip out. She loves him.
Him of all people and here of all places. That’s all he needed to hear. She
wasn’t expecting for him to say it back, though. He had to finish this circle of
hell in order for him to accept her love. But, she could wait 200 years, too.
He let her go. She walked back to put on her pants and handed him his. She
fixed his hair and also hers. Then they walked out and went to meet the
others. None needed to know that they had reclaimed his power from
Cazador. Astarion was free and would never allow anyone else to claim him
for he was now on his way to becoming Tav’s one and only. She knew it
then, but Astarion still needed time to accept it.As she came back to the present, now she was on top of him while he
mesmerized her body as she moved into her own passion for him. Then her
back began to arch and he just held her hands so that she didn’t lose balance.
They both reached the climax they were seeking and finally she gave. She
fell on top of his chest. She was out cold. He smiled and rolled her off him.
Then got comfortable with her in his arms.
He understood that all that had happened had led them to this point, but they
were just getting started. Their future was uncertain and her ideas were
insane, but for the first time in forever, he had a reason to try and truly live
again. That’s all she was asking. Try to live life to the fullest. He was ready
to do just that, as long as it was with her. Then he remembered the blue box
inside his pack now. He would have to keep it in his pocket very soon.
But for now, they wait. They rest.CHAPTER 16- In the shadows
After a couple of hours they were rested and content. They stayed in bed for
an hour more, just enjoying the company and rubbing legs and feet together.
“Astarion, the farm roof sort of covers enough to give some shade, you
know.”
“Mh-… Perhaps we should step out for a little while.”
“I was thinking the same thing. Gives you a chance to get a tan like me.”
He laughed. But he would need to wear his special gear just for good
measure. It was fine, though. It would feel like real camping with both of
them outside.
So, once again, they continued their home routine: wash up, get dressed, pick
up the pelts, and all those little things.
Then Tav went outside to go scavange for wood, while he stayed back to
build a rock circle for a fire. Today that it was still daytime, there was no
issue with making one. Besides, the roof would help dissipate the smoke a
little.
When Tav returned, she had wood and some apples. She’d found a little
orchard and had take some. This time, since there was no fencing or any
detail that it was a claimed land, she left no coin. She was just merrilyreturning with her little cart and an apple in her mouth.
He enjoyed seeing her enjoying herself like that, especially now that it
seemed to be so quiet. The sun was not at it’s highest point, so it seemed to
be about 10 am.
Even with his dark glasses, he could see that it was a sight to behold. The
river was to the west and you could hear the barges and water splashing. The
smells of fish and other plant matter was strong. This was the reason Tav
prefered to follow the river. It indeed hide vampire musk in the land of the
Companions.
As for the grasslands, they were also a sight to behold. Long grass and unkept
ground. Some scattered ruins here and there even up to the distance getting
closer to the edge of the Reaching Woods. Even the woods look particularly
pleasant, hiding all the perils that were waiting for them. Despite that, it was
nice out. The air was crisp and it wasn’t too hot, yet.
When Tav arrived, she pushed the little cart near Astarion so he could build
the fire. She could do it, buy why? He could do it, too. Besides, she went
inside to get her food and water. She was hungry despite the apple.
“So, my moon, are you feeling peckish today?”
“To be honest, I’m fine at the moment. I thought I might, but no.”“Oh, that’s great. Then-… could you help me with-…”, she said shyly before
he stopped her.
He made a face, but he was still willing to help. He just thought it was messy.
By now he wondered if he was a rogue or a hunter, a ranger, like her. She had
taught him a lot of things of how to survive in the wilds. To her it was a
typcial day, but to him it was still a bit disgusting.
“All of it?”, he said hoping it was not a lot of work what she wanted.
“No, just the fleece. I know you don’t like the skinning, but I don’t need it. I
just want the wool to make us some socks. It might be cold in the Underdark
or something.”
He bursted out laughing. The thought of this one making him socks to keep
him warm.
Seriously woman, do you even remember what I am? I’m a vampire with
wooly socks to keep warm in the cold. You’re too good to me.
He continued, “Sounds like a plan. I wouldn’t want to get cold. Thank you.”,
he said this in is most polite posh voice.
She didn’t realize that her logic wasn’t there for she saw him as a man, not a
curse. Perhaps that’s why she adapted to him so easily. It was just things todo for her. But he was as normal as anybody in her mind.
She proceeded to make her meal once the fire was ready and as she ate, he
took a sharp knife to remove the fleece. Then she would handle the carcass
by taking to the last place she left the other body.
An just like that, they spent the day. At one point she convinced Astarion to
stick around as she tried calling their friends. Gale answered in no time,
cutting his class presentation short. Wyll and Karlach found a quieter spot
themselves to chat and tease Astarion about being a house-husband. Lae’Zel
and Minthara even said more than hello. The only one that couldn’t talk for
too long was Shadowheart. She was feeling a bit sick, morning sickness it
seemed. Tav was through the moon. She got to catch up with her beloved
family and was hopeful that once at the Grove, she might catch up with
Halsin, Minsk, and Jaheira. She didn’t know where they were, but the forest
might be keeping them safe.
Astarion finished his work and then sharpened his blade, and for the rest of
the day time, they simply chatted about old adventures or stayed in silence
hearing the noises coming from the river. No more gnolls were heard during
day time.
Then they took out the map to get an idea of where to head next. They
figured they’d need about one more camp until they got into the woods. But,by then, due to the trees, no more tent. Astarion was a little thrilled about
that. It did get a little claustrophobic at times for him.
So the hours passed slowly but very fast. When they least expected it, the sun
had set, Astarion had been able to enjoy it under the shade of the delapidated
roof and then the tent and all their presence was gone. Tav stuffed the sheep’s
fleece in a bag and placed it inside the her void of nicknacks with some salt
and cinnamon she saved for special occasions. They were set and they were
gone.
The only difference this time was that they no longer had to pretend they
were frail for any bigotted Champion of Elturgard. Tonight, they were back
to being a vampire rogue and his mate, the wood-elf ranger huntress. They
were heading to the woods, no less. That’s where she thrived. They would be
fine.
As they had the freedom to move this time, they were able to move much
faster to the point they simply decided to lift the packed cart up to move
faster on the rugged terrain. Poor Helen’s wheels just spinned slowly as their
running bounce moved her along. For the first time, Helen felt like she was
flying. She wasn’t, she was just not touching the ground.
They didn’t talk much while the moved, but it was because of the bugs. It
was a little difficult for Tav to keep up, so Astarion just adjusted his speed tomatch hers better. Either way, they made a pretty good run. They were much
closer. When they saw the sky start to change colors, they repeated their
routine. This time, though they were not near the river. They had moved
closer to the nearest edge of the forest. It was less likely for palandins or
hellriders to be near this land. Gnolls on the other hand were a different story.
In the darkness of the fields, they could smell them lurking. They heard
noises, too. But they weren’t afraid. Tav had her bow and quiver on her at all
times now, and Astarion was also on high alert.
Tav had baked her pototaoes and yams before hand, so they didn’t need to
make a fire. And the weather was still not too bad. She could manage the
temperature drops at night, but during day time it was no trouble at all.
So, another camp came and went. Rinse and repeat. By now, the were on the
night of the second day. This time, they would make it to the forest. The
smell of the trees and the moist dirt was now more noticeable. Tav breathed a
sigh of relief she didn’t know she was holding. Though this was not a forest
she had spend much time in before, to her most forests were pretty similar.
“Astarion, we’re entering the outskirts. I’d like to rest up there. Can you help
me with the things. We’ll hang.”
“Hang? What do you mean?
“Tie the packs with rope, hang the things from the thickest branch. Also, tiemy Helen and hang her, too. We’ll wait a couple of hours up there. Then, go
down and keep moving. I just need a couple of hours.”
“Very well then. To be honest, I never imagined how you’d manage life in a
forest. I guess it’s time for me to find out. See if I like it.”
She laughed for she knew he wouldn’t. No true comforts unless you were a
bit more wild-… a bit more feral.
“Well, I’d be surprised if you liked it a little. It’s not going to be comfortable
for you, but I have to rest. Sorry. I’ll be good soon enough. I hate running.”
So, they did just that. She found a good set of trees to hang the camp items to
keep animals from getting in them. She found a sturdy branch and she lay
there to fall asleep for a while. It was rather cool, but the weather was still not
letting snow in.
As for Astarion, he decided to go scout the land. He wasn’t interested in
sitting in a branch while Tav slept. So, he decided it was a good time to
search for a little snack.
While Astarion left for his little stroll, Tav asked him to mark the bark with
bag of poultice. He’d have to basically create distracting scent trails to mess
with gnoll trackers. As he did that, Tav, before taking her nap, lathered up
some throwing needles with a mix of the same poultice and meat from thesheep Astarion killed. She threw the needles all around where she could hit
some trees at a distance. Her hope was to warn the gnolls that there was a
vampire lingering around, but confuse the trackers on the direction said
vampire was moving towards or away from.
Now she rested. She was still on high alert for any forest forced you to stay in
hypervigilence. Her bow was on her lap and her dagger on her hand. Even at
rest, she was deadly.
Meanwhile, Astarion chose to move through the trees, climbing and jumping
at first. He wanted to have his scent marked up high to then go down and
start following Tav’s request.
He moved like a shadow, mixing with those found in the forest. He could
smell the trees and dirt, but there was a fain rotten odor, a little like old blood
and decay. There were gnolls in this forest. He’d already snacked on one, but
he wouldn’t mind on another or two.
He was on the prowl now. He’d covered a good distance from where Tav was
and left a buffer of 10 meters without any scent marking other than his own
scent. If he got lucky, any movement would lead to him and not to her. But
he wasn’t worried about her. He thought the forest should worry that she’d
wake in a bad mood. She burned a Cazador’s Palace down with two words
already and that was made of stone. He didn’t want to imagine what wouldhappen here that it was basically a giant pile of wood. So, he kept moving by
making a right turn going north. He was having fun tracking dogs.
Then he got what he was looking for.
“Oh, hello.”, he said to no one.
In the distance 15 ahead he saw a group of them, 5. Three young and two old
gnolls. Their look was as gross as their scent. By now it was twilight again. It
would soon be daytime. If Astarion wanted to have his fun, he’d need to
move fast. Besides, by now, he’d been gone at least two hours.
As Tav slept, occasionally her ears will flicker. This wasn’t the deep sleep
she achieved in the tent with Astarion. Right now it was more of a light night.
Then she heard something. She opened her eyes, grabbed her bow, and
moved to stand. It took seconds to clear her mind and focus.
Down below, there was a rabbit running for dear life, yet a little furter she
saw one of those damn dogs. Her hand just reached back into her quiver and
let her muscle memory do the rest.
There was a young gnoll running after the poor animal. Tav took a big wiff of
the air. It was potent, but she figured this one, being young, was alone. Too
bad.The arrow pierced through the air making a swish sound. Then a crack and
thud. The rabbit was gone. She put her bow behind her and grabbed her
daggers again. She used them to climb down quickly withouth needing to
jump.
She ran towards the body and scavanged anything useful. Then she took out
her oil vial and poured some of it. She took her arrow and checked it. It
would work again. Then she cast her spell. The body burned while she went
back another tree with the help of her daggers. She was now a sentry, making
sure the fire wouldn’t spread beyond the kill. It was a habit of hers, all kills
would burn. Ashes to ashes, and all that.
But then, she heard more noice behind her. This one wasn’t alone. She might
need to fight alone this time. But perhaps not. She made a calculated guess, if
she managed it, she might be able to jumpt to the nearest tree and stick to it
with her daggers. She had to think fast or her hanging camp would be found.
As she decided her next move, Astarion was playing with his food. He had
eaten recently and had drank her blood in the morning, too. He sort of felt a
bit bad about that, but Tav insisted on increasing his feeding to ensure he
would be at his peak while in the forest. It would be his first time in this sort
of hostile territory while being only with her. She needed his mind clear and
his claws and fangs sharp. Basically, this city dweller needed to be on top of
his game in her domain. She knew she could manage even with less blood.He’d found the gnoll camp with them grunting. He went down the tree he
was on and began to circle them. He was gaging as much as he could, before
the attack. So, he used some tricks he’d learned from her. First it was
deception. He took a little rock and threw it hard. It hit a tree 5 meters from
their camp. Then took another and threw it a little over. Basically, twelve
o’clock and three o’clock in direction. Then he moved left and circled the
trees.
He was making sure to step as softly as possible, then he climbed up. The
poor gnolls were disoriented. They could smell him, but couldn’t pin point
his location. At first they moved towards the first rock, but then half way they
split to go to the second rock. But the wind carried Astarion’s scent, just like
he intended.
Astarion could smell the fear in their rot. He knew and they knew, a vampire
is a much stronger foe than five of them together. Then Astarion heard a
whistle, a sort of dog whistle. Games were over. Time to go home.
The gnolls hear it too but had no idea what it was and with the fear of the
vampire scent, they decided to stay put. Astarion moved like a shadow back
to the camp. He knew Tav needed help. She was awake now and likely the
camp was compromised. It would take a while for him to get there. She’d
have to hold on.Tav moved higher on the tree to scout it better and saw a large one sniffing
the air. She couldn’t use her bow here. But, perhaps she could take it down if
she went back down.
She decided it was all or nothing. Down she went, cutting open the bark with
her blades as she went. She landed with a soft thud. Then took off running.
She flanked right opposite the large gnoll. It finally caught her scent clearly.
It hadn’t smelled one of those in a long while. It snarled its teeth in delight.
So, did she. She was near enough to see its face. The dog saw her and
launched forward. She saw it, and jumped and climbed the tree. She went
around the trunk and landed on the other side. It turned around to get at her
again. This time she didn’t move. She wanted it to get near.
Her daggers dug at its torso first. The metallic scent of its blood dripping now
down her hand. The dog snapped at her, but she kicked it off. It staggered
backwards. She went after it it again, dagger in hand. The crack of its skull
made a sickening sound. With her other hand she stabbed it again in the gut.
It was as if she had no control of her rage. The poor thing was dead and it
didn’t know it yet. Then she got behind it and she sliced open its throat. She
was not herself then. She couldn’t see it was dead, yet her body kept slicing it
open. Her chest heaving. Her eyes wild. Her ears searching for more.She turned around. There was a noise. She was on the hunt. She was getting
ready to take off for more. Then she stopped dead on her tracks.
“Tav! Stop!”, she heard a familiar voice and she snapped out of it.
She ran towards the direction of the voice as she placed her daggers back.
Then she waited at the bottom of the tree. Astarion climbed down.
“Just what in the hells was that?!”, he said trying not to shout.
“It woke me up.”
Astarion rolled his eyes. He lost 5 snacks because this one indeed woke up
cranky.
“I swear woman. Come on, let’s go. We’ve made too much noice. It’s time.”
“Yes. Sorry. I’ll make it up to you, my love.”, said Tav in a shy whisper.
They went back to the tree and moved everything down quickly. Then
packed the cart and once again carried her away heading north. The location
was still relatively clear; the Emeral Grove. Tav was excited to be back
there. She was very ready to tell the Tieflings about her plan to make a little
town.
Astarion noticed her increased speed, so he adjusted his step. It wouldn’t belong until they reached the Grove. As for the gnoll patrols, they both knew
they were lurking, but both Tav and Astarion were moving too quickly to
match a common victim. It was wise for the gnolls to accept that something
as fast as them in the forest could only mean trouble.
Then he began to take notice of the area as they ran. They were almost there.
But, that also meant that it was getting to be daylight in a couple of minutes.
They might not make it just, yet.
Very winded, Tav tried her best to speak.
“Astarion? It’s day soon. We have to plan.”
“Oh, Tav. You sound dreadful, but yes. We seem to need the beak anyway.”
They slowed down to a trot and then stopped all together. They placed the
cart down, too. She looked around, still hypervigilant about the area. He
seemed more relaxed, but was too on the look out.
“Let’s see. How about your protective gear? That would make me more
relaxed. I think you know we’re almost there.”
“Hmm-… I agree, but I don’t have to like it. I’ll have to dig it out.”
“It’s in my pack. The glasses are rolled in my cotton tunic, the orange one.”
He began looking for his things in her void bag. She continued.
“So, I’m thinking of this. Tell me what you think. I go in first. Get them toremember me first. Then have them open the gate a little and I’ll go in with
the cart running. You stay in the shade. Then I run back with a pelt and
conver you. Then we run inside and head to a shaded space. I mean, what
else can I do? I don’t how how they have it set up right now.”
Astarion thought about it. He hated having to wait and hide, but they both
knew that it was safer for them to be inside the grove. Besides, he could hunt
at night without having to open the gate. That was just a curtesy for the
people inside. He could easily climb the walls and Tav was crazy enough to
find a way inside, too. But, it wasn’t their home, yet. He had a feeling Tav’s
mind was already working double time with her machinations. She had that
look in her eyes.
“I think it’s the best way if we are to come in peace.”, he finally said.
“I mean, if you can add or-…”, she said a bit worried.
“No, I agree. We don’t have a lot of options lest we wait until dark and I
much rather have you inside tonight.”
“Very well. Shall we go?”
“Of course.”
She saw how her hand was now red with red welts on her skin, but she was
almost there, so it was fine for now. He saw it too, but he knew that she was
like an arrow now. She would not be stopped now. He just kept up with her
speed.And then they finally saw the clearing and the pathway up the closed gate.
She removed her bow and quiver and left them in the cart. Then she decided
to change clothes. She removed her top, leather pants and boots for her white
tunic and sandals. She thougt of this as her “I’m not dangerous” look. She
had seen some people at a healing temple that wore this often. Her logic
seemed solid.
Astarion gave her a smile while wearing his own sort of ‘uniform’. He had
his cloak, gloves, and glasses to help minimize sun exposure, while she had
her white tunic and sandals. This time, she decided to wear no weapons. She
was completely exposed and at their mercy. She really hoped they
remembered her.
She looked like a surreal being escaping the morning mist of the forest,
almost like a ghost or a goddess. Her tunic contrasting with her bronze skin.
Her unruly hair, but her giant smile. She was excited. It was difficult to walk
up slowly.
‘Halt! Who goes there?!”, said one of the guards.
She recognized him, it was Roland. He was guarding the wall this morning.
She began waving her hand to say hello.
“Is that you Roland?!”“What in the hells?, how do you know my name? Who are you?”, said he.
“It’s me Tav! Remember me? Last time I came with more people! But it’s
just 2 of us now.”, she said excitedly.
There was another at the wall that got the attention of Roland, so he stepped
back out of sight. It was Toron who remembered Tav and the gang, too.
Toron peaked over to see her down bellow.
“Tav! Welcome back! Where are the others?”
“Well, I’ve got the one with me, but the others are all over Faerun.”, she
laughed at this.
“Very well. Let me open the gate.”, said Toron.
“Yes, but only a little. Just give me a minute.”, she signaled them to stop.
She took of running back to Astarion. She gave him a quick kiss on the lips
and took the cart. She ran back up with her jingling cart. Helen seemed to be
singing with all the clashing of the metal on metal. Then Tav appeared back
at the gate.
“Remember, just a little way. Not all of it.”, she shouted.
They did as she suggested. She left the cart a little to the side and the people
were now taking notice. They were gathering. Then she directed her attention
to the guards again.“Astarion is still out there. But, he needs the shadows. I will need you to open
up a little again. I will run to him with extra cover. Then we’ll run back and
he’ll flank right to that tree’s cover. Understood? Then I’ll tell you all the
story. I’m so excited to be back!”, she said with a smile and pelt at her hands.
“All right, miss. Get ready, then.”
As soon as they opened the gate, she took off and got to him in no time. She
placed the thick pelt on him and she took running. Since it was still early
morning now, the sun was not right on top. It was more to the east, so was
relatively safe for now. Then once both were in, the gate shut with a noisy
thud. And Astarion turned right to go under the tree’s shade.
So, old friends got a chance to catch up in the most recent happenings and
talked about what the other members were up to. By then, they had been
helped with putting uptheir tent back up next to the tree’s shade. Like this
Astarion could stay outside for a bit longer.
This first day, they decided that it would be best to take it as a planning day.
They didn’t know what to expect once they went to the gobling camp again,
especially the inside to the temple.
By now, the sun was right on top, so it was around noon. Luckily, the tree top
they were using for shelter was holding quite well for Astarion. He kept the
glasses on per Tav’s request as she always got nervous if the sun was at fullbrightness and he was having to be outside. He oblidged to help her focus on
presenting her plan. He knew she was passionate about this and really wanted
to make a great impression. He could even feel the same excitement in
himself, but he also thought it was just because she was really giving off that
aura of hopefulness.
So, she went of with Okta and Roland to invite other people back down to the
gate to listen to her proposal. Surprisingly enough, plenty of them agreed to
go and see what was going on. They even set up a little tent to provide
additional shade. They even brought over snacks and drink. It seemed to be
turning into a little parthy rather than a serious meeting. But Tav prefered that
to make it easier for her to talk.
“Hello and well met, my dear friends! It has been a while since we saw each
other last. The last time you all offered your shelter to us, we were more, but
today it’s just myself and Astarion.”
Astarion lifted his hand to greet them, but said nothing. He didn’t like the
attention on him. He wasn’t sulking or broody, but he was not showing the
same enthusiasm as Tav was.
Then one of the tiefling kids said, “Why is he hiding in the shadows this
time? Last time he was out and about.”Tav took care of it.
“Well, Mol, you see last time we were here, we were on a mission to destroy
the nether brain. That thing had placed a parasite inside our heads and that
parasite allowed Astarion to move in the light of the sun. But we achieved
our objetive about a month ago, so the parasite is dead. As a result, he cannot
walk in the sun light anymore.”
Mol’s face was that of shock wondering what that meant. That is until Danis
hit him with his elbow and told him that Astarion is a vampire and to stop
interrupting with stupid questions. They knew enough of the gang of
champions by now that Astarion being a vampire shouldn’t be a shock.
Danis: “You know he’s a vampire, Mol. Don’t be stupid. Besides, he won’t
hurt us. She feeds him.
Mol: “Oh, yeah! Sorry, I had forgotten.”
Danis just rolled his eyes at him, feeling smug that he corrected his friend.
Tav: “That is very true Danis. Thank you for your clarification. Indeed what
you say is true. Is there anyone here that wants to ask a question or express
their feelings about this fact? I need us all to be clear about the situation
before I start with my-… our reason for being here.”
She turned around to look at Astarion to give him a smile. Then shecontinued.
Tav: “I vouch for him. He never attacked any of the people here when you all
asked for our aid against the goblins. And he won’t do it now.”
Then in a booming voice coming from the just opened gate, a large handsome
bronze man shouted while wearing a large smile.
Halsin: “And I vouch for them both. They are friends of the Grove and also
their protectors, too.”
Tav: “Halsin! You’re here! That’s fantastic! Oh, I missed you, so!”
She went to meet him and give him a large hug. He met her enthusiasm, too.
Halsin: “So, you’ve finally made it to the Grove, you too.”
Tav: “Yes, it took a bit. But, now I get the feeling-… did you know we were
coming?”
She closed her eyes enough to look like she was on to him. But Halsin
laughed it off, but he did try to slily look at Astarion and gave him a wink.
Tav let it go. Whatever those two were on about, wasn’t her business now.
Astarion remembered back at the tavern in Baldur’s Gate, right before he left
that Halsin pulled him aside.
Halsin: “Astarion, can I talk to you for a moment?”Astarion: “About?”
Halsin made a move with his head pointing towards a sleeping Tav on a chair
being help up by Karlach.
Astarion: “Very well.”
They both moved away from the group and went to an opposite corner to get
a bit more privacy. They found a little table tucked away and sat down.
Halsin: “So, what are you planning to do now that you can’t walk in the
sun?”
Astarion: “I’m going to the underdark and find the other spawns. I suppose
they’ll need some guidance.”
Halsin: “And what about Tav?”
Astarion: “What about Tav? She can do as she pleases. She’s a big girl.”
Halsin: “You know what I mean, Astarion. Though you both pretend to not
know the truth, the rest of us know what’s going on with you, too.”
Astarion: “How dare you come to me and tell me the obvious? Besides,
what’s it to you?”
Halsin: “I’m looking out for you both. But, I must admit that I am going to
shoot my shot if you keep pretending she’s just your friend. She deserves
more than the scraps you’re managing to throw her way.”
Astarion looked away a bit shameful, but he knew Halsin was right. Tav was
really trying to make sure Astarion knew she cared for him, but he was still
scared of letting her get too close. He had to accept that he was havingtrouble not feeling like he was using her for protection, but at the same time
she was growing on him. He had to accept he indeed was falling in love.
Astarion: “Why is it that all of you desire her so?”
Halsin: “You know why. Every one has something they have really enjoyed
about her. She came from nowhere and she gives her love so freely. She is
caring and her joy is infectious. That’s not even half of it, but I know that
even Minthara would like to have her. Scary thought, but you know what I
mean.”
Astarion: “Unfortunately, I do. She’s been sneaking around Tav’s tent
whenever I’m there.”
Halsin laughed. He knew that at this point, despite Astarion trying his best to
find private places to make love to Tav, somehow there was always someone
from the group showing up, making no noise, staying a little too long, and
then try to leave quietly before he finished having sex with her. He was just
grateful Tav was too distracted that she hadn’t really noticed.
Halsin: “That’s what I mean. By now, we all know she is in love with you
while pretending she isn’t. She does it for you per your request. I know that
you are still dealing with your past, but it is unfair for you to keep her on a
short leash while you pretend you are just friends. That’s a lie and it’s unfair
to her and to you.”
Astarion: “So, you want me to declare my love for her or you will begin topursue her interest? I think she won’t give you the time of day.”
Halsin: “Well, it won’t be only me. I don’t mind sharing.”
Astarion: “How dare you?! She is not a thing to be shared with anyone. I
won’t allow it. She’s mine!”
Halsin laughed again. He finally achieved his true goal. He pushed him to
accept his feelings about her. Though Halsin did like Tav and would love to
make her his woman, he also knew that Tav and Astarion were in love. They
just needed a little push to accept it instead of trying their best to hide it.
They had been fooling no one for months.
Halsin: “There you go. I knew you had it in you. May I suggest that you take
the long way to the Underdark with her? It will give you a chance to really
get to know each other and see if you can make it work. That is, before you
head into more difficult territory.”
Astarion looked at him with surprise. It was a great plan. Tav didn’t know
Baldur’s Gate well enough to know that they could go into the Underdark via
the sewer system. But the idea was grand. It would solidify his own thoughts
on having a mortal woman become his bride and all that.
Astarion: “You’re right. I think that would be a great idea.”
Halsin: “And you can reach the Grove before you go into the Underdark. I’m
sure she’ll love seeing the people there after the trip.”Astarion: “Well, Halsin. I will take you up on your offer. And I’ll really
apreciate it if you don’t try to persue Tav. Like I said, she is mine.”
Halsin stoop up while laughing to himself. He was glad he was able to push
Astarion into honesty, yet was quite surprised Astarion was so willing to
accept a suggestion regarding his own love life. But, then again, everyone
knew those two would end up together, except them.
Coming back to the present, Astarion smiled while he remembered this
conversation. He was rather annoyed at Halsin for interfereing, but now
understood that it was likely a conversation the group had regarding him and
Tav. They all knew it back then from the very start.
As he was lost in thought, Tav continued with her presentation to the people
she was also claiming as her people. It was becoming obvious that she took
those who had no place in Faerun. She too was like them, unwanted, but she
was intent on forcing Faerun to make space for her and her clan. She was
quickly growing the members of it, too.
Tav: “No questions then? Very well. We have come here because about 4
months ago, now, we freed victims of a vampire lord named Cazador Szarr.
He was living in Baldur’s Gate and due to the size of the city, he was able to
capture 7,000 people and kill just as many if not more”The tieflings stirred as they have been gearing up to walk and ask for assylum
at Baldur’s Gate. Tav realized the fear this had spread across their faces.
Then she continued.
Tav: “Now, I am awere that this news are simply horrible to hear. I agree.
But, let me continue before you begin to make asumptions or ask questions.
Please, allow me to continue.”
Halsin had to step in and calm the group for her to continue.
Tav: “Right then. The champions and I headed to the palace to kill this
vampire lord and thus free the victims under his control. These people, this
new kind of people, cannot make more vampires. They don’t have the
possibility to spread their curse, yet they are burdened to carry it. That palace
was destroyed along with the helpers of Cazador. Now, the victims were
allowed to go in the cover of night and head to the Underdark.”
The people’s faces went from bad to worse as she continued, but she needed
to finish. She pushed on.
Tav: “The reason is obvious, they will be away from sunlight. Our goal is to
go into the Underdark, find as many as we can and talk to them just like I am
doing with you now.”Now the folks were confused.
Locke: “What does that have to do with us? You aren’t planning on bringing
them here, are you?”
Tav: “Well, no. You live in the light. They can’t. But no. Let me now say
where my most important point is.”
Locke didn’t’ look to assured, but he had to allow her to finish.
Tav: “I’ve been taking counsil with the champions and thinking about
possibilities, and I think I have an offer that could work for all of us. I beg
that you listen with an open mind. My goal is to benefit all of us. So, the offer
is this; Let’s take back the woods. Let’s not go to Baldur’s Gate. Let’s fortify
this place. Let’s expand our permiter. Let’s fix the broken. Let’s make this
our home and stand firm. These woods have been the druids for ages. Now,
you, tieflings, have been pushed out of other cities unjustly, so let’s reclaim a
land that is now righfully yours. Let us help reclaim this land and work
together to create a save heaven for those that are looking for a place to
belong. We all deserve a place to live, to love, to learn, and to thrive.
Besides, even though we are inside the zealous Elturgard, this woods have
been avoided by the palandins and the hellriders for ages. That becomes a
safety for us. They stay on their side and we can continue to thrive on ours.
We can even become the next large settlement that can economically
compete with even Elturgard or Berdusk.”She completed her speech here lest she continued to ramble and confuse
them. She surely dropped a bomb on them. It was a lot to thing of.
Then Halsin, looking rather serious, spoke first.
Halsin: “That is certainly a lot to take in. But, may I ask what does that have
to do with the spawn?”
Tav: “I want to offer the same thing to them. The distance between both
settlements gives us an advantage.”
Halsin: “That is a truly mad plan, Tav. Even for you, but I’ve fought beside
you enough to know this wasn’t just a fleeting thought for you, was it?”
Tav: “Indeed, you are correct. I want to offer my bow to serve you all. I had
no home for most my life. You were robbed from yours. My desire is to force
Faerun to make space for all of us. People like him, liky my beloved
Astarion, have been cursed and now they have nowhere to go. And you guys
were cursed with something different, but you were also forced to not belong.
We will force Faerun’s people to accept us. We exist. We belong. And we
deserve to have a home.”
This caught the attention of the people. It was working. It wasn’t so much her
plan, but rather her conviction and passion. Here was this woman who was
vowing her life to them, the refugees, simply because she herself didn’t
belong to any clan. She was willing to risk her life to fight for a place to
belong. This was not something they’d expect in a thousand years.Then the eldest of the tiefling spoke.
Okta: “Young lady, when you were here before, it took little convincing for
you to help us. We had little to offer yet you rallied your friends to help us.
And now, after taking on a difficult feat and succeeding, you chose to come
back and help again. You could be with your love some place enjoying your
time, yet you are here to offer an outrageous plan. And all for what? To give
us a home. Just who are you, dear? If I didn’t know any better, I would
surely think you’ve been sent by a divine to help us.”
The woman laughed, but she helped her people see Tav in a different
perspective. Perhaps she was divine or perhaps she was some random nobody
who had crazy ideas and had the mind to push them into reality.
Tav: “Well, I am no divine. I’m simply a person who lost her clan years ago
and is fighting Faerun to get one back. So, what do you say? Are you daring
enough to fight against Faerun to make space for us? Or do you wish to
continue to go to Baldur’s closed gates to people like us?”
Halsin: “Your arguments are surely valid, but I think it is best to really think
about this before giving a sure answer.”
Tav: “I completely agree. Also, as a show of trust, I offer my gains, too. In
the past year, I’ve worked different odd jobs and made a little over a
thousand gold. It’s all I have, but I don’t need coin. I live of the land. So, Ioffer my coin to help. I offer this with no strings attached. Whether you
accept my offer or decide to continue the journey to Baldru’s Gate, the coin
is yours. Whatever help it may bring is a blessing I give thee.”
She handed the bag of gold to Okta, the matriarch of this group. This cuased
a stir for no one gives that much for nothing in return. But what they didn’t
know was that Tav had learned that you can change people’s opinions when
you show that you are willing to lose more than what you can “gain”.
She could make the money back. But using this could help tip the scales in
her favor. Besides, Astarion still had his bag and he had more than she did.
They could use his coin if needed to help the spawn.
Halsin then invited the people to go back to their chores and tents to allow
them to “ferment” what was discussed. He suggested they thought up of any
questions or arguments for either tonight or tomorrow morning. Tav gave
him a thankful look for she was ready to rest for the next couple of hours.
Astarion went inside the tent and Tav followed.
Tav: “By the gods! That took a lot from me! I’m still shaky, look.”
She showed him the ligth shake of her hands due to the adrenaline coursing
through her vains. He smiled. He was in awe of her power and grace.Astarion: “Come here my love.”
He tought it was best for her to finally rest. She had been awoken by gnolls
back in the last camp site. She was about to crash. So, she did as she was told
and snuggled beside him. Then her world went dark.
As she slept happily and safe, due to the proximity of her next big plan, her
mind forced her to remember her last meeting of sorts.
Wyll: “Are you sure this is a good idea, Tav?”
Tav: “No, but they aren’t mine to keep either. Not now at least.”
Astarion: “I understand, but I am also worried, which is surprising.”
Tav: “Well, if any of you guys has a better idea, I’m all for it. Otherwise, the
children must go back to their family.”
She was dreaming of what happened right before the spawn took off to the
Underdark. The Gur children needed to be handed over to Ulma. Wyll and
Karlach helped Tav speak with the spawn children about the plan: they were
to go back home under the promise that their family would take care of them
despite their new form. Tav was very uncertain of handing them over as was
Wyll, but they still needed to handle the parasites. They had few choices:
send the children with other spawn into the Underdark or back to the Gur.
Neither was ideal and she knew that.Tav: “I suppose this will have to be an olive branch with that lot. Perhaps
they’ll leave us alone.”
Astarion: “I highly doubt that.”
Tav: “I know, but it’s leverage. They still have it out for you, yet they ignore
they made you, too. If they dare touch you again, I will take their babes and
kill the rest.”
Astarion was taken aback. He had told Tav at one point what he remembered
of his last day living, but she didn’t show the same seething hatred she
showed now. Her cold stare and coldness in her voice wasn’t customary for
her. It was frightening that she was willing to reclaim or steal children and
destroy a clan just to ensure he wouldn’t be followed.
Karlach: “So the babes are ready to go.”
Wyll: “We’ll be their escorts out once the sun sets.”
Tav: “Good. I’ll speak to the woman. You’ll guard the babes. Follow my
lead. She will have to accept my terms.”
Both Karlach and Wyll looked at each other a bit concerned and worried.
This could be a blood bath tonight or later. But, they trusted Tav. She had
proven her worth before, why not now?
Later that night. They walked towards the Gur camp, sheperding the spawns.
They were calmer now having been feed. Tav had paid the others 10 goldeach to help find enough live animals to feed the poor lot. Even Astarion
helped, but he took no coin.
During the walk, only the three of them were present. Tav didn’t want Ulma
getting any ideas about Astarion. So, it was just Karlach and Wyll.
Ulma: “I see you decided to come alone, consort.”
Tav: “Mind your tongue, wench. I’ve got precious cargo. I can take it right
back.”
Ulma: “Speak your truth then.”
Tav: “I propose an exchange. Your children for your cease of hunting my
mate.”
Ulma: “Your mate? Pfft That thing deserves to-…”
Tav: “Spare me your venom, wench. I do as I please with whom I want. If I
want to fuck a vampire, I will. So, shall you waste more of my time, I will
take the babes with me. Or you can agree and take your kin back. Make your
choice, wench.”
Ulma spit on the floor at Tav’s feet in disgust and anger. Her only peaceful
protest. She knew Tav wasn’t kidding and finally saw who she was dealing
with. Tav chose to bed a monster. That made her more dangerous than the
monster himself. And her claims of taking the children was also true.
Tav: “Careful now. Cazador is gone, but I’m still here. Make your choice,Ulma.”
She said the name laced with such sweetness that even Karlach’s blood ran
cold. Tav was not to be crossed when she was in boss mode.
Ulma: “Very well. Deal. We stop hunting Astarion.”
Tav: “And you will take care of the babes. If at any point they get too much
to handle, I will reclaim them. If I get word that they aren’t being taken care
off, I will reclaim them. Ensure that you and your kin take care of them
properly. You don’t want to meet me again under a broken pact. Is that
understood, Ulma?”
Ulma: “You’d think that we would hurt our own children?”
Tav: “Is it understood, Ulma?”
Ulma: “Understood.”
Tav: “Wyll, Karlach, please. Allow the babes to meet their kin. Children, be
well. Live, love, and thrive. I’ll be watching.”
The children walked slowly and uncertain of what would happen to them, but
they were home. They weren’t sure what to do or how to feel, but they knew
that at least this one would be their champion in case they needed one. After
all, she protected the very vampire that had put them there.
After the meeting, Tav had gone to speak to Astarion about what happened.
Tav: “I traded the children for your freedom. But if they hurt any of them or
take up their chase again, they know I will kill them all. I wanted you to
know from me.”He was a bit shocked. He’d never known her to be so vindictive, but in a way
he was glad. The children didn’t have to go to the Underdark and the Gur
would stop their chase.
Then just like dreams do, it shifted to something calmer. This time it was the
tiefling party after they took care of the goblin problem. This memory held a
special place in Tav’s heart.
Astarion: “You know, I never picture myself as a hero. Never thought I’d be
the one they toast for saving so many lives. And now that I’m here… I hate
it. This is awful.
Tav: “It’s not that bad. Think of all the goblins you killed.”
Astarion: “True. That was fun. Still, I would’ve liked more for my trouble
than a pat on the head and vinegar for wine.”
Tav took the bottle and tasted it. It was pretty bad, but because Tav didn’t
like wine in the first place.
Astarion: “See what I mean? Awful. All I want is a little fun. Is that so much
to ask?”
Tav: “And what is your idea of ‘a little fun’?”
Astarion: “By the hells. Sex, my dear. A night of passion. Let’s wait until
things quieten down. Once the others are asleep, we’ll find each other.”
Tav: “All right, let’s do it. I’ll see you later.”Astarion: “Indeed you will, my love. Indeed you will.
She then left to go back to the celebration and talk to the people she’d just
helped. She was enjoying herself quite well. She even consumed some ale.
Bitter on her tongue, for she disliked the drink, but in the celebration, she
didn’t mind. But, her body kept taking her back to him. So, she approached
him another time. Now, a little more tipsy.
Astarion: “Here’s my little treat with their cheeks all flushed. You will come
to my bed tonight, won’t you?
Tav: “ ‘A little treat?’ You can do better than that.”
Astarion: “Oh, I certainly can, it would be my pleasure. How about this one:
All these accolades form the Tieflings are nothing compared to the sound of
my name, cried from your lips.”
Tav: “So many honeyed words, as usual.”
Astarion: “Not half as sweet as when I tasted you. Hmm, let me give it
another go: Every part of your perfect body whispers temptation- it’s as if the
Gods made you just to ruin me.”
Tav: “You’re sweet, and sillier than I thought.”
Astarion: “I can go on all night with the flattery, but is that really what you
want? How about if I sad these little words… Everone’s favorite… I love
you.”
Tav: “Having fun, are you?
Astarion: “I am, it’s hard not to with you. Now, as much as I relish standingaround and saying all my favorite lines at you. I’d much rather we got to
experience each others’ full portfolio of talents once again.”
Tav: “I’ll come find you after everyone is asleep.”
Astarion: “I’ll be waiting.”
Then her mind took her to a little later after she had mingled and danced with
the rest a bit more, her body took her back to him at his tent. It was as if her
body couldn’t help itself.
Astarion: “I hoped you would come. I have missed you. And now you’re all
mine, and I’m all yours. Until morning at least. Let’s see where the night
takes us.
She laughed at this and decided to go back and sit by the fire. Her head was
spinning a little and needed to calm down. She didn’t know if it was the drink
or the promise she made him. Meet him tonight when everyone is asleep.
Tav: “He said he loves me.”
She smiled at that. She knew it was a lie, but she didn’t care. It was the first
time anyone had said those words to her. So, what if it was to get her in bed.
Besides, he was her first mate, so she wanted to hold on to her fantasy a little
longer. Besides, they were more than willing participants in her little story.Finally, her mind took her where she wanted to return. That night at the
clearing in the forest.
Astarion: “There you are. I’ve been waiting. Waiting since the moment I set
eyes on you. Waiting to have you.”
Tav: “You don’t have me yet.”
Astarion: “Don’t I? You’re here. And I don’t think you want to talk. I think
you want to be known. To be tasted.”
Tav: “And what do you want?”
Astarion: “What do any of us want? Pleasure. Yours. Mine. Our collective
ecstasy. That’s what you want, isn’t it? To lose yourself in me?
Tav: “I want to have fun- that’s it.”
Astarion: “Then let’s have some fun.”
He then took her in his arms and began kissing her. She felt how her body
burned for him. She couldn’t control that feeling or yearning. Even his cold
touch wouldn’t be able to suffocate her fire. He lifted her up and took her to
the nearest tree for support.
Now it was she who kissed him with the hunger she’d been trying to supress.
Then she pushed him to the ground to mount him. She was going to claim
what she felt was rightfully hers. She had chosen him and she wanted him to
know it. He was now hers. Then he rolled her over and pinned her down.She allowed her neck to be free for his lips. He took a bite. The typical cold
shard was felt until it became a cool numbness that extended all over her
body. The weight of his body on top of hers was pure ecstasy for her. She
held on to him to keep him closer as he fed. She trusted him with her life
even now, like this.
He helped her remove her clothing while laying on the soft damp moss of
the forest floor. Then he marveled at her naked body. Her lustful eyes saw
him with a hunger, he’d only seen in animals and those like him. She desired
him, perhaps even more than he dared to admit. Or perhaps there was
something more.
Then she beckoned him to claim her. He did as he was told. He began kissing
her feet, then her calves, went to the knee, and to her thighs. He was taking
his time with his kisses, learning every inch of her. Little did he know then
that Tav would do the same to him once he accepted that she loves him fully.
He felt how her skin was burning, how her blood was flowing due to her
heart going wild. She was having a hard time controlling herself, but wanted
him to enjoy this as much as she was already enjoying it.
Then he continued kissing her hip bones which made her giggle. She was
ticklish. This could be more fun then expected. He straddled her, keeping her
knees together and began fondling her breasts. He would pinch her nippleslightly and run his cold fingers in circles copying her areolas. He loved how
her tan skin made them darker. He leaned in to kiss them, to lightly suckle
them. Her hand went to his head and grabbed a tuff of his hair. Her other arm
grabbed his shoulder a little too hard. He moand in pleasure. She was being a
little rougher than anticipated.
He decided to match her enthusiasm. She took his face and kissed him again,
this time parting her lips to find his tongue in his mouth. She need to taste
him lest she go insane. She loved his taste. It reminded her of her favorite
scent: forest dirt after a strong rain. A moan escaped her throat. He smiled at
that while still kissing her.
Then he let go to look at her. She was panting a little but clearly wanted
more. He lifted her arms above her head and pinned them with his left hand.
She smiled at that. Then he kissed her again while his right hand found her
wetness down below. She gasped. His hand was cold, but her body desired
him in every each of it.
Tav: “Astarion, please.”
Astarion: “Now, now, my pet. Let’s enjoy every minute of this delisious
torture.”
He moved his fingers in circles aroudn her little mound and allowed her legs
to open up for him. He was getting her ready for him. He back arched and she
cried his name. This would be the first of many. He relished in making hercry his name like this. This was all for him.
Tav: “Astarion, please. I can’t-… Mmm-…”
She was panting hard. He leaned in again to kiss her neck, but this time the
other side. And she took the oportunity she was looking for. She freed her
hands and placed them right on his back clawing them in to secure them and
then she whispered in his ear.
Tav: “Bite me and fuck me hard, Astarion. I’m all yours. Please.”
That was all it took for his control to waver. He thrusted his hard member
inside her and he felt her clench and gasp. As he did that, he bit her again on
the other side of her neck and began to drink. His hips moved in waves and
hers matched him. Then her legs locked over his hips. She was pulling him
deeper.
Both of them were matching the same level of energy. He could feel how her
body clenched hard, trapping him in her passion. Her nails just dug deeper
into his own skin. He quickened his pace to reach her climax before he
drained her dry. And then he felt it. He tasted it in her bloord; pure ectsasy.
He let go of her neck and kissed her again. She bit his lip drawing a little
blood. She smiled as she kept kissing him. He began to slow down a little, so
she took the opportunity to roll him and pin him down. Now it was her turn.He let her have her fun. She got on top of him and used her hand to guide
him back in. He saw the double puncture wounds on the sides of her neck and
gave a worried look. She saw his face and spoke.
Tav: “Don’t ruin it. I let you have all of me. Now, it’s my turn, Astarion.”
She let her whole wait fall on him letting him penetrate as deep as she had
space for. She felt how he reached to her end. Her skin gave he away, she
was fire trying to be put out by his cold touch. But, he was causing the
opposite effect. Her body rocked back and forth allowing his skin to cause
some friction on her clitoris. She was having a hard time keeping her moans
to a minimum, but it was almost impossible.
Then he reached in and began to play with it using his cold thumb.
Experienced fingers knew where to touch and how much pressure was
needed. As she was thrusting, he rubbed in fast circles that began to match
her own speed. She was almost there. Then he grabbed on to her hips to
allow her to ride her orgasm without falling off.
He felt how her legs began to shake and how her arched back just went a
little further back. She lost it.
Tav: “Ah-… Astarion!”He laughed. So much for keeping quiet. He was sure someone must’ve
woken up by now. But he didn’t care. She was his, at least for now. Then a
tall broad shadow caught his attention from the corner of his eye. He decided
to not be bothered. His woman was still riding her second orgasm while
riding him. This was the bliss he always wanted to have.
Then she finally got her body to return. She was spent. She bent forward and
snuggled on his chest, panting but very content. She smiled and drifted to
sleep.
Astarion, smiled, too. He felt happy which still was a rarety for him at this
point, but there was something about her that made it different. Perhaps it
was that she mated like a wild thing or perhaps it was that he knew she
wanted him. It didn’t matter. For now, he just let her sleep on top. Once she
rolled off, he would take her back to her tent. Or maybe just sleep there under
the stars. Either way, he got his fun and was glad it was with Tav, his Tav.
Halsin walked away silenty from the forest clearing with a giant smile on his
face. He was a little dissapointed that he didn’t get a chance to shoot his shot,
but was glad the little wild thing was finally claiming what was hers. He
understood her language, for he was a druid. He knew she still didn’t see
herself as human, so she claimed her mate the only way she knew. He
thought this was going to be fun to see develop, and he was right.Then Tav woke up with a fright. She looked around and felt the cold body
besided her. She calmed down and found his face.
Astarion: “What’s wrong my dear? A bad dream?”
Tav: “Has Halsin seen us have sex?”
She said with cheeks flushed. She was feeling so embarrased. He laughed,
but finally revealed the truth.
Astarion: “Well, to be honest, all our friends at one point or another have
either seen us or heard you cry my name.”
Tav : “No! Gods! That’s so embarrasing! Should I apologize? Should I bring
it up? Oh, no! This is so terrible.”
Astarion laughed even harder. It should be the friends who shouldn’t have
been peeping in the first place. But it couldn’t be helped. She was so deep in
her passion that it was the only time she was vulnerable. And it was because
of Astarion that she could let her guard completely down. She felt safe.
He calmed her down and they stayed snuggled for a while longer. It was
twilight again and the Tieflings and Druids were moving about, but no one
had come to the tent to fetch them. They figured they would just relax for a
little longer before going out. But Astarion’s curiosity was more about what
she had dreamed, so she told her the two dreams she had and why she was so
happy being back here at the Grove. He told her he loved her once more.Chapter 17- When we get home...
Halsin took the time they rested to have a little chat with Okta about the
proposition that has just been presented. Okta was surely interested in the
woman and her vampire lover. The last time she had met them, she
remembered they did have an odd energy to them. Knowing now that they
are mated, she understood that it was them pretending to not like each other.
But she was still curious.
Okta: “So, what’s the deal with you and those two? Are they mated?”
Halsin: “Hahahaha. Indeed, they are. And good thing, too. They just made me
with the bet.”
Okta: “A bet? Halsin, what are you on about? Is this the reason you took
longer to return?”
Okta was getting irritated with Halsin answers, but she didn’t know the half
of it.
Halsin: “Oh, don’t get angry, my dear Okta. You see, when they rescued me
from the camp, I noticed they gave each other quick side glances all the time.
And they always gravitated towards each other. So, when I agreed to help
them for a while, I paid more attention.”
Okta just looked at him a bit distrustful of where this was going.Halsin: “So, I wasn’t the only one who took notice. It was camp, it is small,
and the wind carries voices. She was always very giving to everyone, even to
me, but with him, she was extra caring. I remember when she told of
Minthara, the drow, for making a joke about Astarion. The only reason Tav
let it go was because Astarion defused the Tav-bomb.”
Okta: “Interesting. So, she’s very possessive of the vampire? That’s not
something you hear every day.”
Halsin: “I think that she sees him as a man, not a monster. Which would
explain a lot of what she does. Perhaps she just thinks he’s sick. But I digress.
The more time I spent with the group, we all took notice of their behavior.
During searches, they would end up together. Most her loot, would go to him.
She said she didn’t need it, and he sure didn’t mind having it. Even he would
go out of his way to accommodate to her. They developed this relationship
where they practically shadowed each other while working hard to hide it
from the group. Hahahaha.”
Okta: “I’m guessing they fooled no one. That bad, was it?”
Halsin: “Worse. They were so lost for each other while trying to keep the
“we’re just friends” idea that when he, per her request, asked for sex, she’d
agree all the time. We all knew they tried to sneak at night, but like I said, it’s
a small camp.”
Okta: “That’s horrible. I mean, for them having no privacy, but I guess you’re
right. The wind does carry.”
Halsin: “I know. The worse thing was that at one point or another, we all
either heard them in her tent while feeding him or somewhere they tried tohide. I know Astarion did notice, but she was too far gone at the time to
notice or care.”
Halsin blushed a nice shade of crimson as he recalled walking in on them
here at the Grove. He, too, remembered that Tav kept going back to Astarion
as he brooded over by his tent. She kept going back and forth, drinking a
little too much, so her movements became very obvious for the rest.
They got to talking about the Astarion-Tav “situation-ship” and they were
enough annoyed and a little jealous that they began to plot. All of them, even
Lae’Zel, were going to push this along to make them accept that they are
basically married. Karlach was thrilled with the idea and made a bet with
Gale and Halsin that she could push the love birds into admitting they were a
couple. Gale accepted, but he said that he was better with words, so it would
be him. Halsin added that he felt he had the best chance.
Shadowheart tried not to get involved because she thought it was wrong to
interfere, but they were all enough drunk that she ended up falling in the plan.
Lae’Zel offered to pay closer attention to their whereabouts to see what they
were up to. Wyll, though embarrassed, would try to talk to Tav and see her
standing about Astarion.
They knew Astarion tended to leave the group while at camp, so they weren’t
worried he’d hear the stupid drunken plan they were creating to play cupid.As for Tav, she came back all tipsy with a giant smile on her face for the
second time.
Tav: “I’m having fun tonight. More ale! Let’s all have fun.”
They looked at her flushed cheeks and giant smile. They knew what she
meant and burst out laughing. But Shadowheart, took her mug and instead
filled up a wine bottle with water. She gave it to Tav. Lae’Zel offered some
bread. They needed her to eat and drink to help with the alcohol. Tav was the
only one who rarely drank, so very little went a long way very fast.
As they continued with the celebration and Tav’s back and forth walks, they
felt joy. It was nice to be at peace and with friends. It was also nice to see
how two friends were beginning to develop a little romance.
As they went off to rest, one by one, Tav finally was more able to think
straight. She downed a loaf and a bottle of water. She waited until everyone
was in their own tents to finally go look for Astarion. It didn’t take long for
her to find him, though.
Halsin on the other hand, had decided to go for a walk and also patrol the
perimeter of the grove. By the time he reached the area where Astarion and
Tav were making love, he tried to walk away without making noise, but he
caught Astaion’s eyes right before he closed them again as he enjoyed his
Tav.Okta brought him back from that night.
Okta: “So, I’m guessing your meddling worked?”
Halsin: “Well, to be honest. It was not needed. Tav claimed him from the
very start. For her, it was just a waiting game. I think she was certain that she
would convince him to trust her enough for him to accept his feelings for her.
And it worked. I simply suggested to Astarion to take the long way to the
Grove. This would give them time to get to know each other without us there.
A bit of freedom to love in private.”
Okta: “That’s understandable. So, you really trust them with all of this?”
Halsin: “That I do. Astarion has begun to learn who he is with her help. As
for Tav, she can be ruthless when she needs to be, but she does have a heart
of gold. She meant it, all of it. She has no home and is desperately looking
for one for the both of them. That and she loves your group. She doesn’t offer
to gain an advantage. She offered because she loves your people enough to
fight for them again.”
Okta: “Yeah, I got that feeling, too. She’s very serious about it. I mean, that’s
a lot of gold. And I get the feeling that even if we decide to continue our trek
to Baldur’s Gate, she’d probably escort there and run back.”
Halsin: “I agree. She’d split herself up if she could. I think that she has some
logic in her mad plan, though. We’ve never thought of rebuilding this place
nor of taking back the forest. Perhaps she’s thinking of rallying forces to
remove the threats or create a treaty.”Okta: “But we’re not that many. It would be slaughter. We barely make it as it
is.”
Halsin: “Understandable. But, perhaps that’s where her plan begins. Not on
the Tieflings, but the spawn. She said her next place is the Underdark. Maybe
those are the forces?”
Okta: “Well, I guess we just have to wait for them for more details before we
make a decision. But, I’m not going to lie, I kind of do like the idea of
making the Grove a worthy town for us.”
Halsin: “I agree to that, too. Now, please excuse me. I’m going to go and
check on them, see if we’ll talk tonight or later.”
Halsin left off, heading down to the gate again to find them. He got near to
the tent flap and peeped in to invite them back up. Then a shout sounded.
Astarion: “What in the Hells, Halsin! Go away! We’re busy!”
Halsin: “Pardon me. When you’re finished, we’ll be waiting up at the top.”
Tav: “Mm-… Yes. Yes, go, go. Mm.”
Halsin turne around laughing to himself. Of course, this would happen with
those two. It was his fault for not listening to his own words before. Now
these two were sharing the same space.
Astarion was a little annoyed once they were done. Tav was laughing but
embarrassed. But then again, perhaps they should have waited after theydiscussed the topic at hand. Then again, the best way for Tav to relax was
Astarion. For those who don’t know, happy chemicals in the brain and all.
Astarion takes them through her blood, and Tav’s brain secretes them when
he’s all up in her business. It was like taking 2 aspirins and a coke. Good
stuff.
Tav: “Oh, calm down my love. It’s not like he saw anything.”
Astarion: “This time. He’s seen us before. I should start charging then. Put
the drow twins to shame back at Baldur’s.”
Tav: “Shut up! Hahahaha. I’d rather invest in doors and locks.”
So, she fixed herself up by making sure her tunic was mess free and
everything was back in place. Then she checked that he was proper, too. They
were ready to head back out into the world, more relaxed than before.
As they walked up, she took his hand in hers. She wanted the Tieflings to
know that he was no danger to them and that they were together. She needed
them to see that. She was still a little nervous about the whole ordeal, but that
was good. Being brave is about knowing the impossibility of a desired
outcome and still deciding to try and achieve it despite being afraid. She
understood this. But, she was the impossible woman. She won the heart of a
monster with love and dedication and he chose not to ascend. Two impossible
things together at the same time. She had to try this next impossible feat.
Perhaps the odds were indeed in her favor still.As they arrived, she lead Astarion near Okta and Halsin. The people just saw
them walk up. She gave an aura as if she was some foreign queen and her
monster king ready to offer a treaty and soldiers for the Tiefling plight. Some
faces were surely eskeptical, but others were a bit more hopeful.
Halsin: “Welcome again, friends! Come, sit here beside us. We have plenty to
discuss.”
Tav smiled and bowed to the people present. Astarion simply nodded and
followed her lead. They headed to sit down and waited for the people to
speak their minds first.
Zevlor: “Tav, Astarion! Well met friends! I was told you had come back.”
Tav: “Can I get a hug, dear friend?”
He stood up and hugged her tightly. She was glad to see him again.
Astarion: “With all honesty, I’m surprised to see you and your people still
here. I would’ve thought you’d left after we took care of the goblin problem.”
Zevlor: “Truth be told, I’m surprised, too. Thing is moving the people takes
careful calculation, but Halsin told us to wait a while longer. He said it would
be dangerous to be at Baldur’s Gate, so we waited. Then we heard word of
the battle you all fought and we were certainly glad we waited. Then, you
showed up out of nowhere. I’d say there is a divine hand here now.”Tav: “Well, I don’t know about divine anything, but I have ideas and I am
really wanting to share them with you all. I just want you all to be safe.
Baldur’s Gate is not the safe heaven you think it is, especially now that is in a
bit of ruins. Tensions are high still and this was just about a month ago.”
The people stirred and murmured. They had no choice but to believe it was
true. They had just come from the city and it took them a month to get to the
Grove. They figured had they been able to walk in daylight, they would have
arrived sooner.
Roland: “So, you came back here to help the refugees because of it?”
Tav blushed a bit at the question. The reason was that she didn’t want to
admit it, but she felt home here and didn’t want these people to leave the
safety found at the grove for the discrimination of the city or cities. So,
Astarion helped her a bit.
Astarion: “In a way, yes. You see, Tav feels at home here. She met you all
and fell in love with this place. I know her well enough to know she will put
her life on the line again to keep it safe and keep you all safe-… much to my
detriment.”
Tav lifted her head, gathering courage from Astarion’s words.Tav: “My partner speaks truth. I had no home for many years, and I was
welcomed here. Living in the darkness and shadows of the woods is possible,
but the Grove showed me a beacon of light. If you let me, I want to be its
champion and your blade, once more.”
Halsin: “And yet I’m not surprised you’d drag Astarion to your cause.
Hahaha.”
She blushed, but she couldn’t function as well as she could without him. He
focused her energy into something productive rather than simple survival.
Okta: “Well, then let’s remember your proposition, Tav.”
Tav: “Right. Well, I say we take the woods back from the varmin that is
intent in destroying it. Build better defences to the walls of the grove, but not
close off the grove. Fix and rebuild the town to better fit the needs of the
people. Create spaces for farming to reduce the reliance of buying from
Elturel, Scornuble, Triel, or Berdusk, but keep the options open for trade and
commerce with those cities. Basically, create a safe heaven for all here and
allow for expansion to receive more refugees who are looking for a place to
settle down. I mean, some ideas to start.”
One of the children spoke up.
Bex: “You mean, make the grove our home? Forever?”Tav: “I mean allow all to have the freedom to choose where they want to
settle, while also taking care of the woods and the Grove for future
generations to come.”
Rolan: “That is-… very ambitous. But how would that be done?”
Tav: “Well, first step is accept to listen to the proposal. Second step is
planning it out. It cannot be done in a day or a couple of days. It is a longterm project. It will need dedication and the willing participation of many.”
Findal: “Well, I am with you all the way, Tav. Hadn’t it been for you all, my
corpse would be rotting in a cave.”
Zorru: “Why do I get the feeling you’re aiming for a sort of farming
community? Is this what your plan entails?”
Tav: “YES! That’s the word I was looking for. Yes, a sort of farming
community taking into account the care and preservation of the sacred
ground. Take what is needed and give back. When coming here, I saw the
outskirts of Berdusk’s fields. Sure, for them it’s a large city, so they take more
than they need, but we can work together to have more than enough for all
and also tend to the forest. She needs us. It’s full of varmin and she wheeps.
We have to do something to give back and she can take care of us, too.”
Halsin: “This is a side of you I never had the honor to see before. Are you
sure you aren’t druid, my dear Tav?”
Tav: “I don’t know what I am. But, I do know that I feel it in my bones. I
know it sounds insane, but I don’t know-… something pulls me to this insane
plan. Save the forest. She’ll save you. I have to try. I beg thee to at least see
my side before discarding the proposition.”Okta: “I’ve never seen someone with such conviction to fight for something
so impossible. It’s refreshing. I am with you then. You seem honest enough
and letting go of so much gold-… it forces me to at least give you a chance.”
Tav breathed a sigh. That’s two down, perhaps with Halsin that makes three,
but she needed more to rally.
Tav: “I know it feels like I am imposing myself on the land. I apologize, but
that is not my intention. I am seeking an alliance with the two factions that
reside here. I seek an alliance with the Druids, the rightful guardians of the
Reaching Woods, and I seek an alliance with the Tiefling clan who has been
granted shelter here at Emeral Grove. I am offering all I have, my bow, my
sword, and myself to regain the forest from deviant control and to help create
a safe haven for all wanderers like myself and refugees. Faerun has forced us
to the fringe of life for long enough. I want to dedicate my life to make space
for all of us. A space that if taken care of, it will take care of us. I now it’s not
something that sounds beliavable, but doesn’t it make sense? We just have to
band together.”
Cal: “But what about the spawns you mentioned? That’s a lot of vampires
running about.”
Tav: “I agree with you and I also understand your point. This is where the
second part of the plan starts. If you all agree, you have my gold to begin
with whatever is needed to help fortify the area first. Send scout missions to
buy supplies at Scornubel or Berdusk. In the mean time, Astarion and I willclear out any remaining goblins and recuperate the entrance to the
Underdark.”
Rikka: “You mean Selune’s Temple?”
Tav: “Who? I guess, I don’t really remember the place from last time we
were here, but sure. The thing is that it is a good place for my kin to be. Close
enough to the Grove.”
Locke: “What is your plan exactly there?”
Tav: “We, Astarion and I, go in. Clean house. Then find a spot where we can
start a settlement similar to this one, but under-… over there. And offer them
guidance to learn to be human again. Those people, my kin, are also refugees,
but of a different kind. They need help, they need support, and they need the
benefit of a doubt. I gave Astarion a chance and today I trust him with my
life, my soul even. I am sure that there can be plenty of them that just want a
chance at living again.”
Zevlor: “You remind me of me months ago, but with a much better plan.
You’re not doing this for you. You are doing this for three groups of people
for nothing but the idea that they can all work together.”
Tav: “Yes! I know that together we can force Faerun to make space for all of
us. Our children deserve a safe place to live. We all do. We deserve to live, to
love, to learn-… We desrive to thrive despite our differencres. I know that
together, even if it’s hard, we can do it. We’ve defeated the brain. I know we
can reclaim this corner for all of us to pursuit happiness and peace.”
Umi: “You said the vampire spawn are your kin? Are you also a vampire?”Tav: “What? Uh-… no. None of them can make more vampires. Astarion
killed the vampire that made them. I burned his palace down to cinders so
he’s not returning. They are now free from control, but they can’t spread the
curse.”
Mol: “Do you want to be a vampire?”
Tav: “What? Uh-… not really. It’s not a priority to be honest. My beloved is
one, but he’s never pushed the topic.
Halsin: “Children, perhaps stop asking Tav about her private matters and lets
return to the topic at hand.”
Tav gave him a look of relief. She didn’t want to scare the folks regarding
vampiric neccessities.
Tav: “I’ll tell you what. Right now, I do not have the time, but how about you
make a list of questions regarding the topic. And I’ll work hard to make the
time to come and answer them. I think that it is important to pass information
of my kin. Now, they are my kin because Astarion is my mate and he is one.
So, the spawn are my kin by connection, not by cursed passed. Is that fair?”
The kids shook their heads to agree. They were now added to the list of allies.
Tav’s willingness to answer and to offer something she didn’t have to made
them feel important and special. They got the feeling that she could side with
them against the adults. Most kids didn’t want to leave the Grove.Zevlor: “Why do I get the feeling you are planning on rallying the spawn to
take care of the gnoll problem.?”
Astation sat up straight. He wasn’t even aware of that part. He thought to
himself:
So, that’s why she took them down. The mad woman was gaging strength.
She took 2 down easily and she overpowered the large one. If we train the
spawn properly, we have an army of spawn hunting for food. It’s an
ambitous plan, but it might just work. As long as we send foot soldiers at
night time and force them to keep off the necks of our allies here.
He smiled as he made the connection before she explained it. He had a
feeling she had thought of it very recently otherwise she would’ve ran it by
him by now. Tav gave a coy smile.
Tav: “Also, yes. Astarion and I have to go to the Underdark first. We need to
talk to those who will listen and make the same offer, the same treaty. But
with them, they would be brought up top to help with the clearing at night, as
you here stay safe. Basically, we attack the other ones all day and all night.
They will be overwhelmed and we can keep the assault going until they are
eliminated or they flee. Either way, we gain territory and we recuperate the
forest.”Halsin: “I am with you, friends. I will hold a council with the others and see
what we should do to start. Zevlor, Okta, I suggest you do the same. Figure
out who wants to stay and fight and who wants to continue to Baldur’s Gate.”
Tav: “I sure hope that you give me a chance if the decision is to keep going to
Baldur’s Gate. I’ll arrange for an escort. I don’t like the idea of you all going,
but I don’t want you to be attacked on your way.”
And like that the proposal was given. It was a very rough outline about what
she was planning, but she was sure passionate when presenting it.
The people slowly began to go back to their bed rolls and tents. Tav and
Astaroin stayed there a little longer just looking at the fire in silence. It was a
bold plan, but talking about it now would serve no purpose. They all had to
let it simmer a bit longer. Then after a couple of minutes, they stood and left.
Once at the tent, Astarion helped her make a little fire for her to heat up some
food. She hadn’t eaten all day despite him feeding on her. Now that they had
presented the proposal, she trully felt the hunger crash into her. He watched
her eat and sway side to side as she enjoyed her meal.
The people moved about the rest of the night. They found a place where they
could freshen up making sure the water wouldn’t hurt him. Then as the sky
started to change, they went back in the tent.Now it was just a waiting game again. She knew she had some folks on her
side and at least the leaders had joined in her insane plan. Perhaps in the
morning they would continue siding with her. With any luck, that wil stay the
same until night for tomorrow night, they head into the dark.Chapter 18- The land down under
Astarion returned almost tipsy. He got more than his fill tonight. Tav
took notice. He wouldn’t be able to climb back up.
Tav: “That idiot drank too much. He can’t climb.”
Cal: “What?! We can’t open the gate at night, Tav!”
Tav: “Don’t worry. Let mie see if I can help him up. Entretain him a
minute or so.”
Tav climbed down quickly to get some rope from her tent. Astarion
was trying his best to climb up, but was very clumbsy. He was
fooling no one. He needed help going up. He just giggled at his
predicament.
Astarion: “You wouldn’t know where the Tav is? I mean, the door?”
Tav: “I’m here. Don’t move. I’m going down.”
She moved swiftly. She tied the rope to part of the mechanism of the
gate and the other end to her waist. Then she went down. It wasn’t
too far down, but she prefered to do this than open the gate. The gate
took longer to open and close. It would make lots of noise, too.Astarion: “My lover. Hello. You’re so beautiful.”
Tav: “Hello, my love. You are, too. Let me just tie this around your-
… there we go. Very well. I need you to climb up. I’ll help you.”
Astarion: “Yes. Let’s.”
It was a little difficult, but Tav was able to make him walk up the
wall while using the rope as a harness on this legs and waist. She just
had to ‘walk’ right behind him. The guards were waiting for him at
the top, so as soon as they could grab him, they did.
Astarion: “Thank you, fine gentlemen. The wife is behind me. Tav
pays the tab.”
He laughed at his bad pun. Tav just rolled her eyes at him.
Tav: “Ignore him. He’s drunk. But thank you so much for your help.
I’d give you coin, but I have none left. Sorry.”
The guards just looked at each other a bit perplexed. These two were
something else, and were quite frankly causing a stir in a good way.
Most often they were on edge because to the outside threats, but tohave these warriors here now and acting like stupid teens, was
refreshing.
Tav helped him down to their tent. By now, she had finished setting
up their full camp set up with the permission of the druids, of course.
She led Astarion into the side tent to get him cleaned up.
Tav: “How many did you take down, love?”
She said as she took off his bloodied shirt. She began to use a wash
cloth to clean up his face, chest, and arms.
Astarion: “It was 5. The ones I almost had before your whistle.”
Tav: “Oh, then you are very welcome.”
She laughed. She was off the hook in her mind. She made it up to
him after all.
Astarion: “Cheater, but I’ll accept it.”
He tried to kiss her.
Tav: “Ew. No. Wash your mouth first. You stink like wet dog.”
Astarion : “No fun. But, fine.”
He pouted his lips in annoyance. But, he did stink. So, he did as he
was told. It didn’t take long before he was on the pelts trying to ride
off his high. Tav just lay beside him tracing circles on his chest with
her eyes closed. Tonight was done. He was too slugish to go tonight.But the bright side was that he wouldn’t need to feed for a while.
She could just keep him topped of for a while longer as they set up
camp down there.
She hugged him and gave him a kiss on the side of his chest and
snuggled to sleep. He was gone, too.
Hours passed and when she least expected heavy footsteps woke her
up. It was Halsin. As Astarion didn’t move, she decided to go and
see what was going on.
Tav: “Halsin. What’s going on? Everything all right?”
Halsin: “Everything is all right. I just came here to invite you to
breakfast. I’d invite Astarion, but I was told he had more than his fill
last night. Hahahaha.”
Tav: “He did. Let me just let him know I’m going. Give me a
second.”
She went back in, gave him a quick peck on the lips, and told him
about heading back up with Halsin. He hugged her to trap her and
laughed. Then let go.
Astarion: “Enjoy your meal, love. I’ll be waiting”
Tav: “I love you, my beautiful. Be back in no time.”She followed Halsin up to meet with others. Tav sort of felt that
there was more to this meal sharing, but she was hungry. And the sun
was getting brighter, too. She was going to have to do it alone.
Okta: “Good morning, dear. How did you sleep?”
Tav: “Very well, thank you. How about you?”
Okta: “As good as these old bones let me.”
Zevlor: “So, Tav, are you guys heading to the goblin camp tonight?”
Tav: “Yes. The plan was last night, but Astarion couldn’t do it.
Hehehe.”
Okta move a little uncomfortably. Tav noticed. So, she brought it up.
Nothing beats saying things with your whole chest. So, she did.
Tav: “Look. I know how most if not all of you are very
uncomfortable with the fact that Astarion is a vampire. But, please
let me make a case for him. He is a vampire spawn. That means he
was stolen by a full vampire and then forced into servitude for 200
years. He didn’t choose to be turned into the supposed monster you
are stuck on. He was alone in the hell that trapped him and no one
helped or at least tried to help. By a horrible miracle he was able to
escape his hell. That’s how I met him. Now, I will say it was not the
best impression, but I got to know him. The man, and he’s got a
heart of gold. Yes, he is considered a monster, but who here hasn’tbeen looked at with disdain for the simple fact of existing out there.
Even me. People whispered ‘witch’ and ‘feral one’ and other names,
some much worse. Astarion helped you once, even against his own
nature, and he hurt none of you. Back then he was more capable of
taking all of you out, but he chose not to. Instead, he chose to help in
exchange for nothing but wine and a party he didn’t enjoy. Now, he
is willing to help me with my insane plan. Besides, if anyone here is
a monster, it is me. I am the one who chose to mate with a vampire. I
am the one who can walk in the light and in darkness. If you want to
be afraid of anyone, be afraid of me. He calms me. Halsin can tell
you. I know he knows more than he leads on. So, I’m not
threatening. I am stating facts. He is a man with a particular
sickness. He cannot spread it. But if you want to fear someone, fear
me. Whisper about me. Feel uncomfortable about me. I was raised to
be a weapon. I have no qualms about my skills. But I choose life. I
choose love. I chose you lot and I want you all safe.”
The Tieflings present and some Druids looked a little flustered but
also a little ashamed. Their knowledge about vampires was being
forced upon Astarion, while the one that would take them out was
able to move about like it was nothing special.Zevlor: “I apologize Tav. You are right. He’s been nothing but a
great help. And I agree. I’ve seen you fight.”
She nodded her head in acceptance. By now, she had been served
some food and was enjoying it. She loved free food.
Halsin: “So, Tav what’s the plan exactly?”
Tav: “Scouting first. Reconnaissance. We don’t know much about
the land nor the whereabouts of the kin. Then camp out. Next plan
the next phase. I don’t know that part. But the firt part is clear.”
Zevlor: “Will you be needed help?”
Tav: “What?! To go down there you mean? Oh, gods, no! I don’t
even know what to expect. I mean, if you were offering. No, thank
you. You’ll need all hands on deck up here. That is especially for
those that want to keep moving to Baldur’s Gate. I would like to
escort those who go or find an escort.”
Zevlor: “Are you sure to just have you two go?”
Tav: “Yes. The thing is that we are will be the most dangerous beings
in those ruins. I need a full focus and Astarion and I have fought
together long enough to know each other’s moves. We are basically
a well-oiled war machine. It would take months to train your current
soldiers to match me. Right now, they would not be of any help tome down there. But all the best help up here. They know the land up
here. I’ll need their help when I come back up. I need an updated
map for this land.”
Rikka: “Oh! Perhaps I can help with that. I know the land pretty
well.”
Tav: “Would you?! Oh, that would be wonderful! Oh, but I do owe
you coin for your service. I’m all out at the moment.”
Tav gave an embarrased smile. Though she usually over paid for
many things, she had given away all her coin.
Rikka: “Don’t worry. You already gave us so much of it already.”
Tav: “Well, I’ll make it up to you, either way. Thank you so much.”
Tav finished eating and thank them all, then headed back down. She
was feeling energetic and rather full. The food was good. It surely
beat salted fish, so she wondered if she could do a trade up before
they left.
As she reached their tent, she saw him outside sitting on the grass
under the shade with his eyes closed. A faint smile on his face. She
could tel that he had noticed her already, which was the reason why
she didn’t want soldiers now. They were very much in synch.She then stopped walking and a wide grin appeared on her face. She
began to slowly back away, while still looking at him.
Astarion: “Just what in the hells are you doing, my love.”
He said with an annoyed look. His faint smile gone, but his eyes still
closed. Tav couldn’t control it, she started laughing out loud as she
continued walking forward. Then she sat right in front of him.
Tav: “Hi.”
She said with a devilish grin.
Astarion: “Funny.”
He finally opened his eyes. Today they looked a pale pink. She
noticed that the hungrier he got, the deeper in color they became.
This was mostly from her memories of his siblings when they tried
to kidnap him and take him back to the demon.
Tav: “So, how are we feeling today? Were you able to rest well? I
did. I didn’t have any dreams good or bad.”
Astarion: “Well, I think I will agree with you there. This place has its
charm and benefits.”Tav: “It does. I love it here. And it’s so close to the entrance. I’m so
excited about the trip. I can’t help it. I know it will be a challenge,
but I don’t know-… I feel it in my gut.”
Astarion: “Your gut? Or it can be the food you ate. Are you sure it
wasn’t poisened?”
Tav: “You tell me. You hungry?”
She teased while showing her neck. This was part of the reason they
got along so well from the start. She could take it as well as she
could dish it out. Even when he had a blade to her neck, she didn’t
feel in danger. Animals in the wild will always show teeth first. And
those who will attack don’t use theatrics. They just bite. In other
words, Tav let him play his games because she was entertained. He
barks. She bites.
Astarion: “So, are we leaving tonight? I saw you packed last night. I
apologize. I seemed to have gotten carried away.”
Tav: “Nah, don’t stress it. You have been looking out for me all this
trip. It was only fair you got your chance to endulge and rest.”
Astarion: “What on earth do you mean? I have been indulging.”
He caressed her cheek. She blushed red and averted his eyes. He
gave a little laugh. He loved it when he got her to blush still.Tav: “I know. But not like that.”
She caught his hand and kissed it. Had he been able, he’d blushed,
too.
Tav: “I was remembering what the route was like to the goblin camp.
Do you remember details? I have a bit of a blurr. I mean, I remember
the party that night, but the details of the attack-… I just-… it’s
vague.”
Astarion: “Well, I’d expect it to be vague for you. You were a bit
wilder then. You had a look in your eyes. Very cold, not you in a
way, but it was you. Like a different side of you takes over. You were
barking out orders and they landed with precision. Lae’Zel and Wyll
were quite impressed you hadn’t been trained for battle. Then again,
they didn’t know what I know now.”
She felt a little ashamed and disgusted with this. This brought back
the memories of the stolen childhood in her clan. They were very
bad folk, children or not, they all had to endure to live.
Her mind went back to one of the many training days. By now, she
was 6 years old going into 7 years old. A year from now, she would
have her first kill, a weak male cousin that couldn’t best her. That
morning she had been woken up from the baracks. She was one of30 children ages 5 to 10. They were grouped with similar ages and
sizes. The teens were now in another newer group. Due to her age,
she was still not ready for breeding, so she had to be put with the
male population per the established rules.
They headed to the showers first, then to eat, and then to train. The
first training was easy, they had to run for 30 minutes without
stopping over dangeours terrain. That terrain being that the teens
would shoot arrows at them if they moved too slowly. This taught
them to be aware of their surroundings and how to dodge and hide.
She thought it was stupid, but she had to do it anyway.
Then they had to practice with blades, swords, daggers, throwing
needles. This was not her favorite, but it was better than running and
dodging arrows. She prefered the daggers, though. It was more
intimate, but the way they had to learn how to wield them wasn’t.
They would sometimes have a child practice their skills of survival
and dual wielding by caging them with a predatory animal. Wolves,
bears, mountain lions, whatever animal the insane adults could come
up with, they would have a child with knives try to fight it off.She also thought that was stupid. She hated hurting the animals, but
she understood that they were that day’s lunch or dinner. As she was
rather nimble and flexible, she was able to use her surroundings to
take a higher ground and ambush her prey. Then cut the hind legs.
Then the side. Bleed the animal a little before jumping on top and
slicing the throat open. She was thankful that the people observing
never made a noise. This wasn’t a show to cheer for. This was just a
regular Tuesday.
Then shower again. Eat whatever was on the menu and head to the
next stage, bow practice. This was gradual. They taught different
aspects of how to use a bow properly, how to maintain it, how to
craft it, how to consider your own body to craft it to your benefit,
even how to make your own arrows. The training went fast, so she
had to pay attention and review a lot. If it was detected that she was
falling behind, the punishment could be a whiping or death.
Accidents happened to those who failed to catch up. And for her,
being the daughter of the Clan Chief meant she had not space for
mistakes. Her mother and her would receive punishment for her
failure.
Then it was the theory classes. There she learned about organizing
groups of fighters and reconnaissance, and planning. Basically, whatLae’Zel and Wyll were impressed about. She had also been trained,
but she didn’t show it. The tests for this part of the training were the
toughest, though. That was because it was combined with their
ranger training.
For the rainger training, they had to apply all they learned plus the
extras. Climbing trees, making rope, finding good spots to spend the
night. Basically, they would train the kids five days a week. Then
two days, the would have to survive the forest alone. They were
being hunted by other members of the clan while also needing to
stay safe from whatever other danger would be lurking in the
shadows of the forest.
Tav had several close calls in her first expeditions alone, but got the
hang of it soon enough. She didn’t want to die then, but she didn’t
want to live that life of her people.
Then, she turned 7. The training got more intense. This was the cut
off for the ones who were strong enough to progress and those who
were not worthy of carrying on the family blood line. Like cattle,
only those with the best traits would be allowed to move forward.
So, the day came that she had to participate in the battle. Everything
they had learned to that point was to be used to make it out alive.She had been practicing for a year and she taught she was good
enough to survive. But then, when she arrived at the field, she
realized who she was paired against. It was the one she always tried
to help.
All of them were related, so he was one of many cousins. The
problem was that she took a liking to him for he was not feral like
the rest of them. Had he had the chance, he’d been a great scholar.
Unfortunately, he too had been born in a den of monsters.
She looked up to her father up at the platform with all the hatred she
could muster at her young age. She knew this was his doing.
Demons like him were always watching and he knew that she had
been saving the poor kid countless times. But now, time ran out. She
would have to decide if she lived or he. We know how that turned
out.
So, they rang the bell and the fight began. It was an obstacle course
first. This time they had used hungry wolves. That was good for her.
She was a good climber, but the kid wasn’t. She had to help him,
only avoiding the inevitable. Tav begged him to not let go as she
went back down to take out the wolves. The fist one closest to hernipped at her, but she jumped back and hit her head. She saw blurry.
A branch cut her forehead and she was bleeding. The wolves went
into a frenzy. She shouted at the boy to not let go.
She ran to the opposite side to get them away in case he couldn’t
hold on. She knew that some of their members were born frail, but it
was more to do with inbreeding than anything. By then she had
made that connection, so she took care of him because it wasn’t his
fault. He was just unlucky.
So, she found the hidden bow and arrows that she was supposed to
find by the glint of it. She took it and the quiver and climbled a tree
with a thin trunk. She used her legs to help herself stay on high
ground. She was high enough that even the jumps of the animals
didn’t reach.
The she twisted her torso to try and hit at them. It wasn’t the best
position, but she had little choice. She managed to hit 2 and as they
went down, the other three began eating them. She used the
distraction, to climb to the branch and swing away. The cousin was
struggling more now, but with his leg pointed to a rock with a
crevice. That’s where the other weapon was. She ran to get it and thewolves took after her. It was a dagger. As soon as she grabbed it and
turned around. The wolve had jumped at her. She felt how the dagger
cut through the animal and then its blood ran down her hand. It felt
with a thud. She slit its throat. You don’t move unless you make sure
they stop moving. For us that means, “always double tap.” If you
know, you know.
As she was being circled by the last two, she finally saw the other
dagger. She slowly went to get it. It was sticking out for the tree
trunk. She grabbed it and used them to climb up the trunk. She
needed time to breathe and think. She looked at the terrain and saw
that she had to move fast or the boy would fall. Not that it would
serve any purpose. But she couldn’t let him go yet.
So, she took a risk. She threw the blade at the dog. It hit on the side.
It yelped. As this happened, she had gone down the trunk and had
already let go of the arrow to the other one. It hit on the head. It went
down. Then she ran to the one with the dagger on its side and stuck it
in more. With the same dagger, she took it out and stabbed its head.
She was almost done. One enemy left. He was now standing in the
center of the arena, their cage. She didn’t want to go, but he calledher name. She looked up. She had no choice. She knew that if she
refused to finish it, he would still die. They would also punish her by
making her repeat the test with another and another. Her father knew
she was capable. She was good stock in his eyes. All he had to do
was wait for her first bleed to transition her like her mother before
her.
His booming voice called her name. She looked up at him with
hatred. He reminded her of what she already knew. She had no
choice.
So, she walked slowly towards the boy. Short and frail with bronze
skin, light brown hair, and the sweetest eyes. She was crying in
silence. Her tears running down her face, falling on the floor even as
if her tears where trying to wash away the sins of her people. She
didn’t want to do it.
She took her fighting stance and told him to do the same. She threw
a dagger at his feet to give him the final aid, a weapon to defend
himself. Then she wiped her tears, her face smeared with sweat, dirt,
and blood. Her eyes burned and she could smell and taste the metalic
flavor of blood. Some was hers, but most was from her kills.Then he launched at her. Bad posture. Bad form. He had no chance.
She turned, evaded, stuck her leg between his as he ran towards her.
He lost his balance. She grabbed his shirt to guide him where she
needed him. He dropped his weapon. She still had hers. She pinned
him down.
It was time. He smiled at her as if forgiving her for what she was
being forced to it. All of it. Then he spoke for the last time.
Rikkon: “It’s fine. I’m free.”
Her blade pierced through his little chest straight to his heart. And it
was done. She closed his eyes. He still had a smile on his face. He
was free and she was forever trapped in that hell. She cried. She
couldn’t help as the waves of anger and grief washed over her. She
failed in protecting him, but she succeded in her test. She would live
another day.
A guard had to kick her of his body as she dind’t want to let go.
Then her father arrived and slapped her. She was showing weakness
and making him look bad. She was whipped 10 times that night. Shewould keep surviving this hell until she turned 13 to then be
banished from her clan.
She came back to the present with Astarion before her, a worried
look on his face.
Astarion: “Tav? Oh, my love. Come back to me. There wasn’t much
you could do then. As for the camp, I’m sure you are more capable
of staying in the now.”Come here.”
He leaned in to hug her, but he knew what memory popped up.
Before, when they still had the parasite, he couldn’t help but reach
for her mind and he saw it. Every thing that happened that day for
her and her ward, Rikkon. She blamed herself to this day. In a way,
he understood why she was the way she was. As well as why she
fiercely protected those who she thought needed protection. Rikkon
never left her and she never let him go.
Tav: “I’m sorry. I just got lost a little, but I’m fine now.”
Astarion: “No, my love. You’re not, but I have you now.”
Tav: “Thank you. I love you my star, to the moon and back.”
Astarion: I love you, too. Everyday a little more than before.”Chapter 19 - We’re home.
As they waited for the sunset, people came and went. Tav requested
permission to leave the cart at the grove along with some big items
like the tent. They would be kept by Halsin for safe keeping,
especially since the tent was a magical item.
Tav also was able to trade her salted fish for other dried red meats.
She was even able to get some bread and cheese. Though, she wasn’t
scared about food. In case of emergency, they made the plan to come
back up, and they would also have the communication stones Gale
gave them. Halsin had his. He had begun to wear it as a necklace and
he fashioned one for Tav. She loved it, but Astarion not so much. So,
as a compromise, she wore it as a bracelet instead. Halsin laughed at
the solution for he made a necklace to tease Astarion and he knew it.
Once the time came, they said their “see you later” to not jynx it.
Besides, this was a recon mission. They were told that the goblins
were not able to gain enough force after the last battle and most
stragglers had gone. The Shattered Sanctum should be mostly free of
anyone by now. So, they took off for it.They were on high alert but the light of the moon helped them see
clear enough, him having a better view of course. But she wasn’t too
bad. Their weapons were at the ready and their backs weren’t too
heavy. This time, she carried only one water skin for drinking which
was full and the others were empty and tucked away in Astarion’s
pack.
The cool night air was refreshing, though. The trees’ leaves and
branches swayed a little. It seemed like a calm night. They
ocassionaly herd the little noises form gnolls at a distance, but they
were easily dispatched if they got near. After the 7 kills they gave
them, they were certain that their scent was now a known threat. For
now, the gnolls were not going to get near.
As they kept walking, the vegetation began to thin. They were near.
They didn’t talk tonight. They just paid attention and tried to
remember the last time they had been at that area of the forest. Then
they saw what they wre looking for. The saw the stone bridge with
studded wooden barricades. No one was manning them. It was
eering to see it dark and abandoned. The last time it was full of life-..
but they saw to that. Then Tav broke the silence.
Tav: “I’ll have to clean up.”Astarion: “I’ll leave you to it.”
Tav: “Funny. You’re helping. We gotta clean your den of
debauchery.”
Astarion: “Ha ha. I’m a changed man. I swear, mother.”
She laughed silently at this. She recalled how he was entertained last
time they were there about enjoying the horrible mess the goblins
made. But Tav didn’t like the mess. She thought it was a nice place,
too nice to be destroyed that way.
Then they got to the main entrance. Still nothing. No noise, no fires,
just eerie silence. Though nothing much had changed in décor. The
tunnels were still there, too.
It just smelled like the forest had reclaimed this space once more. It
was just the smell of the trees and moss. Dust and dirt layered
everything that was out in the open.
Astarion and Tav had their orders. No prisoners. No survivors. The
problem if still there would be deal with. They walked through the
center courtyard trying to not make much noise as they walked. Thememories were coming back. They knew where to enter the
Shattered Sanctum now.
Keeping north of the courtyard, as they walked, they finally saw the
Heavy Oak Door. There was no one guarding it now. The Shattered
Sanctum was straight ahead.
Astarion was about to open the door but Tav stopped him. She was
on edge thinking that there might be a trap. So, they checked for any
signs of tapering. They found none. He opened the door and they
stepped in.
It smelled like you’d expect. Goblins aren’t known for being clean
and tidy and this place had likely been abandoned for about a year.
Also, gnolls aren’t too picky about their food sources, so think about
that after the battle with the goblins.
Tav wanted to walk straight ahead, but instead just went to the right
side to get to where she wanted. She found some things that could
topple over, so she let go of her first arrow. She wanted to get it over
now. If there were stragglers, the noise would surely wake them.There was a loud bang as the items fell. It was some wooden crates
and armor pieces that fell to the ground. They waited for any
reaction. There was nothing but the echo of the noise she had caused.
As they kept walking, Astarion saw a war drum on the floor. He saw
Tav and she agreed by nodding her head. He hit the skin hard to
make as loud a noise as possible. Still nothing. The goblins were
either scared or gone, but nothing but silence met them. This
convinced them that indeed at least here there was no life left.
They kept walking towards the next set of oak doors which lead to
the Defiled Temple. This time it was Tav who opened these doors to
enter. As she touched the wood of the door, she felt a strange little
jolt of energy enter her body trough her hands.
Tav: “Oh! That was odd.”
Astarion: “What? What’s wrong?”
Tav: “I got shocked by wood-… I think. Nevermind, let’s keep
going. The room is nearby.”
Astarion: “So, it’s coming back to you then? Good to know.”
Tav: “I’m in the zone. And I’m tingly. I’d run, but I hate running.”Astarion just smiled at that. She really did hate running.
The last time they were here, this used to be Gut’s personal
chambers, but she was dead now. And both were hopin Polma was
dead or gone. So they took the right until the end of the chamber and
then took the left. And sure enough, there was no one.
They were still expecting anyone to pop out of somewhere and
attack, but nothing. That made it worse. They were still on edge. So,
Tav stopped him. He looked startled, he though she something that
he hadn’t seen.
Tav: “We need to calm down. We’re getting clumsy. Let’s wait here
and collect ourselves before continuing.”
Astarion: “Very well.”
She sat on the dusty floor and a little puff of dust lifted as she did.
She began to caugh and swat her hands at the dust. Astarion began to
laugh and he too caught the cloud of dust and began cough-laughing
along with Tav.As the dust settled, they were more relaxed. Their noise hadn’t
awoken anyting nor attracted anything to them. This was good for
this used to be a guarded room-… well if you could call it a room.
Tav began to talk nonsense to him just to get herself distracted a bit
more.
Tav: “So, how are the kids? And how’s work? And the wife?”
Astarion: “No. Fine, and crazy. I think that’s about right.”
Tav: “Good. Good. So, no worries about sending them kids off to
Gale’s school.”
Astarion just rolled his eyes at her while still leaning on the wall
with his arms crossed. Tav just smiled at him from the floor.
Tav: “Say-… do you think that maybe that it’s empty, that perhaps
we could-…”
Astarion: “Well, it’s rather big, but as an entrance to it, doesn’t
sound half bad. It will be a lot of work to clean it up and spruce it up,
though.”Tav: “You mean it! I can clean it and if I make more coin, I can hire
them kids to help clean up, too. Give them something to do-… other
than ask me a million questions.”
Astarion: “Tav, our entrepenuer choosing child labor. How quaitn.”
Tav: “I won’t force them-… I’ll convince them with my charming
ways and coin! Good ol’ coin! hehehe”
Astarion: “Scary thought to consider your new empire of employed
children.”
Tav: “What-… it will teach them skills such as clean and clean
faster, but better.”
He gave her a smile. He knew she was kidding, but it wasn’t past her
to really employ the kids to clean up for coin or the kids to say no.
Especially the one that had a little shop. That one was tough.
Astarion: “So, ready to go, love?”
Tav: “Yes, please. A little help?”
She extended her arms for him to lift her up. He did and kissed her
once she was up. She threw her arms around his neck letting him
know that she wanted a little more. He gave in, of course.Astarion: “What was that?”
Tav: “Let me be. I like to kiss you anywhere and any place.”
He made a smirk as he turned to walk through the door and headed
down the stairs right into the Defiled Temple where the puzzle was.
As soon as they got there, they saw the puzzle on the ground. It had
been moved, so the hidden door was closed again.
Astarion even tried the lever, but nothing. They had to solve it. Tav
sat down on the floor again looking at it for a bit. Then realized that
the moon light was hitting one of the circles. She remembred that the
last time it had been Gale and Karlach who found the answers, but
those things were gone now. So, it was down to her memory and
Astarion’s luck. She knew for a fact he hadn’t payed attention to the
puzzle before.
So, Tav stood up and began to twist the circles to gather the black
ones on one side then the white ones on the other. She first tried the
white ones on the circle of moonlight. Nothing happened. Then she
tried again, but this time with the black ones. Something clicked and
moved somewhere. Astarion tried the lever and it opened the hidden
door.Tav stood up and this time dusted herself off before heading forward.
Astarion waited for her to walk over to him. She kissed him on the
cheek. She was feeling excited.
Astarion: “Ready, love?”
Tav: “Very. Let’s go.”
As they walked, there was little light, but it was enough to still see
the area around. Moving forward they eventually got to the doorway
with the symbol of Selune on top on the rock wall.
Tav: “Oh, that’s pretty. Has that always been there? I don’t
remember.
Astarion: “I swear you’re hopeless.”
Tav: “What? Why? It’ just pretty that’s all. Oh, shut up.”
They finally go to the ladder. Tav did a couple of stretches to move
climb down. They were basically there. So, now at the little wooden
platform, they were ready to finally reach the Underdark.
Tav: “Was this thing this unsafe looking before?”Astarion: “I wouldn’t know, but it’s probably as old as me if not
older.”
Tav: “We should have it inspected to see if it holds or just replace it
eventually. I don’t want accidents of my bebes.”
Astarion: “I will go down first and you’ll go down after me.”
She looked at him with suspicion.
Tav: “Don’t look at my bum, perv.”
She poked at his stomach while laughing. But he grabbed her hand
and pulled her in for a kiss.
Astarion: “No fun. It’s the best view.”
Tav: “Is it hot in here or is it just me?|
Astarion: “It is you because of me.”
He swept her of her feet as she put her arms around his shoulders
and leaned in for another kiss. There was something about this place
that was making them all giddy, but they didn’t know why. They
weren’t complaining either. Who was going to see them acting like
fools down here?
Astarion: “I swear woman. The things you do to me. Let’s go.”
Tav: “Oh, you love it.”The climb down was long and tiring on her arms. She was glad he
was below her, though. If she slipped, he could try to help. He dind’t
feel the same kind of tired she would have.
After what seemed like eons, the smell started to change a little
more. They were almost on the ground. She was glad. Then the
ladder came to an end and Astarion helped her down. He knew her
arms wher sore.
Astarion: “Are you all right to continue, love?”
Tav: “I don’t mind a little rest. I feel-… odd. Like, a ringing in my
ears and my stomach is-… I don’t know. But, I need to sit down. I’ll
be fine. I think it was the trek down.”
Astarion looked a little worried, but there wasn’t much he could do
now for her. So, sitting was the best thing to do. They moved past
the gate and she decided to sit in the center of the floor looking to
the statue. She realized she hadn’t seen it before, they had gone
around through the window and had seen all those poor drow
petrified. It had been a tough battle but they defeated the spectator
monster. But now, there was no one else but them. She patted thefloor next to her for Astarion to sit with her. He did so, reluctantly.
He didn’t want to sit on the dusty floor.
Tav: “So, what do you think of this space? Does it ring like ‘home’
to you? It sort of does to me. I don’t know what it is, but I feel-…
safe. Calm. Electric. Do you feel it? It’s weird. I’ve never felt this
before.”
Astarion: “Well, perhaps not entirely to your extent, but a little.
Perhaps since the goblins were defeated, the magic of this place is
returning.”
Tav: “But what is this place? It looks like a temple and all, but for
who? Do you know?”
Astarion: “I do. Her name is Selune and this here is Selune’s
Outpost. It is a direct entrance to the Underdark, Shar’s domain.”
Tav: “REALLY?! HAHAHAHAHA. This is Shadowheart’s business
then. Before the hair and after the hair. Yours looks better, though.
Very handsome. Very distinguished.”
She teased him. She knew he was many things, but vain about his
looks was his top.
Astarion: “Ha ha. Funny-…”But before he could finish his sentence, Tav pinned him down. He
was shocked, but into it. It wasn’t common for her to initiate
anything. In the past, it was mostly him, in dark secluded corners.
Back then they were still pretending to not be anything but fuck
buddies.
Tav: “Do you remember when we would sneak around? We don’t
have to sneak around like bandits anymore.”
She gave him a mischevious grin. He knew that look and he was not
very willing to stop her. Though it was too dusty for his liking.
Beggers can’t be choosers, here.
Astarion: “Tav my dear, I’m all down for it, but the ground is so
dusty.”
Tav: “Then let’s stand.”
He stood up and helped her up. Then dusted each other a bit. Then
Tav went in for another kiss. It had become a habit of theirs to have
their little fun in places like this, so now it wasn’t surprising.Their kiss intesified by her own accord. She felt this energy coursing
through her body and just couldn’t stop. So, much so that she bit his
lip. Then she stopped and looke at him with a surprised look.
Tav: “I’m so sorry! It’s just-… I-…”
Astarion’s resolve broke. It was rare for her to be so rough with
foreplay that now that she had done it, he felt the same energy. He
began kissing her passionately as he walked her to the nearest pillar.
Her hands where all over him, his hair, his back, but landed on his
bum. Her favorite part to look at when he wasn’t looking. She
squeezed with both hands. He smiled as he kissed her. Then he
stopped to look at her.
It was now a ritual to ask “Can I…?” with a simple look before they
proceeded to do anything more intimate. She said yes. She had
started this and was pulsing with engergy. She needed that release he
knew how to give. So, her hands went to her own pants to undo them
and then to his. He was still pinning her, lightly, to the wall. She then
found him and began to move her hands to warm him up. Not that he
needed much warming, the bite on the lip was enough and the
kissing kept it going. She then guided him inside. A little gaspescaped her lips. He smiled wide at that for he knew that he was cold
where she wasn’t. It always gave a little jump until she heated him
up to feel alive again. She held on to him for a minute without
moving. She didn’t want to come to early, so letting her body adujst
to him was necessary.
Then he began kissing her again and she matched the energy, her
hands now back on his bum pulling him towards her. That was the
confirmation he wanted. He began to move and she began to bite her
lip. She didn’t like to make a lot of noise unless she couldn’t help it.
He liked to make it impossible for her to keep quiet. He usually won.
He began to intensify his thrusting. She was now holding his back
trying no to let her knees give out. Her head leaning back in
pleasure, showing her neck. He bagan kissing and suckin on it while
he was making her arch her back. Then she said his second favorite
line.
Tav: “Feed.”
Her gasping breath a very faint whisper. She was enjoying this
release as he made love to her while startled in these ruins. So,
grabbed her from the wall, holding her close to him. He stoppedthrusting for an instant as he was inside her to then bite down on her
neck. He wasn’t hungry, in fact he was rather full, but her blood
gushing down his throat like this in this place was excilirating.
She was right about feeling electric. There was something going on
tonight and they both were feeling it. He just took two gulps this
time, and licked her wound and then began to thrust again. This time
harder and faster than before. She was already like putty in his
hands, so this took her right the edge. He caught her orgasm with a
final kiss and she caught his own. He climaxed along with her and
then they seperated.
She giggled as he looked at her with loving eyes.
Tav: “That was intense. Let’s do it again sometime.”
Astarion: “Seriously woman. Unless we focus, we will get nothing
done. But yes, let’s do it again.”
He laughed too as he stepped back to fix himself up.
So, it began. The first bite. They didn’t know it, but soon will. This
was the beginning of their next stage in their life.Now that she had released some of that weird energy she was
feeling, they decided to investigate the adjacent rooms before the
main chaiber where the statue was. Tav was clearly avoiding it, but
Astarion wasn’t going to push her. He knew she was really inclined
to make this space their home base, so there was no hurry.
Astarion went inside the first little chamber that had the iron gate
unlocked to check it out. There wasn’t much to see but there were
some oil barrels right near the gates on both sides. There were a
couple of iron torches on the walls, too. Astarion began to light those
up with a bit of the oil and a flint and steel he had.
Tav was just analyzing the space thinking how she could match it to
the little cabin she had in her head. She was smiling from ear to ear
and Astarion was just fascinated towards her attitude. He had never
seen her so happy. He was amazed how this place, being so dark and
dusty and clearly in need of a lot of work, could make her so thrilled.
He could feel how her energy was building up again. Next thing he
knew she was like Karlach. She couldn’t hold still so she was
dancing in place.Tav: “This place is perfect. Look, we can remove the gates or maybe
just wall them up with wood for privacy. Then put some rope here
and add curtains-… maybe. A sort of fancy window? I’m so excited”
Astarion: “Darling, do be careful. The brazier is right in the middle
of the room.”
Tav: “Not to worry. I’ll just move it a bit and that’s it.”
She tried to move it towards the fenced wall, but the floor was too
dusty, so she kept slipping. Then she began to pull instead. Astarion
just stared at her and then decided to help. They moved the 2 of that
room that was to the left of the chamber looking towards Selune’s
statue.
Tav: “See. It looks better already. Can you light these two please?
And I’ll love you more than ever.”
She called out as she went to check the broken fence that lead to the
Underdark. She saw a glimplse of the petrified bodies remaining, but
she focused more on the fence on the ground and the destroyed wall.
She was already thinking about how to reuse materials and bring
some down here to begin fixing her new claimed home.Tav: “Astarion, you reckon the Selunite people will come and try to
reclaim this place. I mean, it looks like it’s been years alone. I want
it. It will be our cabin! HAHAHAHA IT IS OURS FOR THE
TAKING!”
She said a little louder pretending to speak like a pirate. She was
really into the idea of claiming this as her new home, despite its
dilapidated state. You know what they say, “stay with the one of the
process and all.”
Astarion was in a way starting to spiral again despite Tav’s
enthusiasm.
This woman can’t be serious about her joy right now. This place is
horrendous. It practically ruins and dangerous and she sees it like
prime real estate?!
She noticed he was making the face he made whenver his thoughts
were getting the best of him. So, she walked over and hugged him
tight. Then spoke her truth.
Tav: “My love, I have never had a home. I was never loved or at
least shown that I was loved. I always had to fight to keep living
another day. I had been alone all my life. But then I met you and theothers. I learned that people who are trained soldiers don’t have to
behave like animals. And that there is space for scholar type warriors
like Gale. Rikkon would have loved him. The thing is that in the
time I have spent with all of you, I fell in love. You have taught me
what love is and it feels fantastic, but I wondered if I would one day
be able to have what others have. I wanted a home. Don’t get me
wrong, I enjoy the tent and travelling. But I would at least like to try
something more permanent, even if it’s for a time. And I feel that
this place is great. Is it the best? No. Can it be fixed? Maybe. But, I
want to try. And you know what’s better? I get to do it with you
knowing that I don’t have to worry about the sun coming through. I
can focus on other things and not have to be constantly checking if
you will be all right. You won’t have to be stuck in a cloth cage.
Besides, my dream cottage is just a dream This-… this is real. I’m
already thinking of how to add more privacy to the walls, and we
can rebuild those, and-…”
He hugged her tighter. He needed to hear that. He knew that she was
stopping his spiral, but she did it with her truth. She wanted this with
all her heart. And the only reason she wanted it was because of him.
She had told him before if he wasn’t part of the picture, then what
was the point. This was because she wanted him in it.Astarion: “Fine. You win. Let’s make this our home, my love. We’ll
rebuild and claim it. And we won’t let any Selunite scholar or
anyone else try to come and claim our home. Tav? Thank you, for
everything you do; for everything you are. I never imagined this for
myself in the long life I was forced to live, but now I want it all.
Perhaps, that’s why I have lived so long. I was waiting for you.”
She lifted her head to look at him with such tender eyes. She loved
that man and it was rare for him to open up about his desires.
Tav: “Then trust me when I say that I want it all with you.
Everything. All the good and the bad. I am making no sacrifices
here. Never forget that. I am here because I chose to be here. I am a
day walker, sure but I can also walk in darkness. I will always
choose to walk beside you no matter where that leads. But, tonight it
lead us here. And we can claim it as our first home. Also, it’s huge. I
imagined a cottage much smaller than this. This place is large. I bet
4 cottages! That’s crazy!”
Astarion: “Four?! What in the hells? What is it with you and small
places?”
Tav: “What is it with you and large ones? Besides, this can be the
palace that you like-… I think you like.”As they were talking, they hear a loud bang and a couple of swoosh
sounds coming from the room with the statute and they looked over
to the outside and saw that the defence mechanisims were still
activated. They were as powerful as ever. Tav looked at Astarion
with excitement.
Tav: “They work! Let’s keep it.”
Astarion: “I’m not so sure about that Tav. It could very well attack
us, too.”
Tav: “I don’t know. I get the feeling it won’t. But, we’ll check it out
later. Let’s go check out the other room over there. I’m thinking
divide them into 2 rooms each. That makes 4 smaller ones. Come
on.”
He followed her, but was still a little aprehensive about the statue
beign active still, but was forcing himselft to trust her. The other area
had a locked gate, so Astarion had to use his skills to pick the lock.
This room was just like the one before, but had an adjacent room
with a broken floor and wall. There were still plenty of things left
that she would later check out. Since the last time they were here,
they went directly to the Underdark via the broken wall, they hadn’t
looted anything.Plenty of chests, barrels, and crates were there collecting dust for
years. But, she wasn’t too interested in that yet. She wanted to check
out the space and see what she was working with.
Tav: “Oh! This can be our bedroom. It’s tucked away. We’ll just fix
the floor and the wall and it will be perfect.”
Astarion: “Mm-… wonder what sort of goodies are in those chests,
too.”
Tav: “You see. You too are hopeless. Hehehe.”
He rolled his eyes at her for teasing. He would peruse the chests
later. Then Tav went through the hole in the wall, down to another
little chamber where the entrance was actually in the main room
where the statue was. She just jumped and then climbed down. He
decided to go around instead.
This place was a sort of common area with some working tables and
benches and it had a fireplace on the opposite side of the torn wall.
Her face said it all.
Tav: “My kitchen. My living space with pillows for friends.
Astarion, it’s perfect! It’s beautiful.”Her tears of joy now falling. She was beyond herself. It was better
than her dreams. Astarion walked to her and lifted her up in a hug.
He was also beyond himself. Her reactions to everything were more
than what he had hoped for. Here he thought it would be difficult for
both to adjust to living in the shadows and there she was marveling
that her dream was nothing compared to this abandoned place. She
trully did see the beuaty where others didn’t.
Astarion: “I’m guessing you won’t take no for an answer, now.”
Tav: “I can take it and the I will put it in the trash. This is our house
now. Anyone that protests can fight me.”
Astarion: “All right, my fighter. Are you ready to go meet her,
now?”
Tav: “Yes-… no-… I still feel strange. Like I’m being pulled, but not
in a bad way. It’s like-… there is no turning back now. I don’t know
what I’m saying.”
Astarion: “Tav? Are you scared? We can always go back up, and-…”
Tav: “No. I wan’t to stay. I like it here. It’s not about this place. It’s
about me. There’s something inside me that compels me to stay. I
feel like I have to swear an oath or something. Hahaha. That’s just
stupid. I’m not Wyll or Shadowheart. I’m just me. I’m a nobody that
walks in the shadows of the forest. I cna’t-…”Astarion: “You are somebody to me. As for the other things, I
honeslty don’t know what to say. I don’t feel the same pull you do.”
Tav: “And that’s fine. I don’t know what I feel, because I’ve never
felt this. Like there is this energy coursing through my body. It
almost feels like when I touch you and I feel how my heart skips a
beat. Look, touch me.”
She held out her hand and he took it. He felt it, now. She was almost
shaking as if a large amount of energy was coursing through her
body and into him. Even his ears started to ring. He even felt it in his
teeth. But it didn’t hurt. The sensation was the strongest in his
stomach as if a force was moving him towards the statue but it
wasn’t strong enough to move him. It was as if it didn’t want to
force him. It was simply inviting him to go.
Astarion: “Mh-… Now I know what you mean. I can feel it, too.”
Tav: “You think we shouldn’t be here? I really want to stay. I don’t
want to go.”
Astarion: “Tav. Come here. Sit with me.”
She went to sit down, but stared at the floor. Then she leaned on his
side resting her head on his shoulder. He knew this would help
ground her. She mind was all over the place and was spiraling, too.He held out his hand and she took it. His cold skin cooling her hot
hand. She squeezed it tight. She was glad she had him.
Tav: “I am really sorry for everything that you had to endure for so
long, but I am thankful that I got to meet you. I feel very blessed that
you have me the chance to prove to you that I can be a worthy
partner, especially now that we are about to start our next chapter.
That’s a lot of bebes.”
Astarion: “I’m worried, too. But, I agree about meeting you. I was so
angry for so long. No one answered my prayer. Then the next thing I
knew I was in a box. I broke out. I fell. I woke up and it was
daylight. Then one day, out of nowhere, this woman comes walking
followed by some other fools. And she offers to help! Of all the
things, she agrees. Mad woman. And I threatened to kill her.”
Tav snorted. She remembered the same up until that part. She knew
he wouldn’t. He was scared, too.
Tav: “You weren’t going to do it. I called your bluff. In the wild, you
only threaten when you are scared. Then you distract and take off
running. You didn’t do that. It intrigued me. Also, you were very
handsome.”
Astarion: “Am I not handsome now?”Tav: “Well, actually-… I think you are more handsome now. You
smile more and your eyes don’t look sad. I even dare to believe that
you know what happy feels like.”
He wasn’t expecting that answer, but it was true. In the last couple of
months, he was more jovial. In the last month after the deafeat of the
Netherbrain, he did feel like his world was going to crumble now
that he had to return to the shadows, but Tav didn’t want to leave his
side. She made the darkness better.
Astarion stood up and took her hand for her to stand up, too. He
looked at her and smiled.
Astarion: “Tav. You have been the single best thing that I have
stumbled upon in my long and weary life. Being with you this last
year has shown me more than 200 years in my hell. You have shown
me compassion, acceptance, trust, beauty, and love. You have taught
me so much about what it means to be alive. You have accepted me,
fully, even at my worst. You have been so patient and so kind with
my and you now want to pass on that same love and compassion to
the people I unknowingly helped create. I don’t know where you’vecome from, but I don’t want to continue my journey without you.
Tav of the Storm clan. Will you marry me?
He had gotten on his knee for the last part. Tav, stopped breathing
and her knees finally gave. She fell. She was in shock.
Astarion: “Seriously woman, here I am pouring my heart out and
you topple over like a plank.”
Tav still in shock, was mumbling something while trying to hold on
to the table to stand again as he helped her up. Then he heard what
she was saying. “That’s not my name.” Over and over again.
Astarion: “What?! What in heavens do you mean?!”
Tav: “I can’t. I can’t. I-… It’s not-… I-… Tav doesn’t exist. I made
her up. That’s not my name.”
She looked up at him with tears in her eyes. Her final secret now
revealed. She was terrified that she had ruined his desire to marry,
but she couldn’t let him marry a lie. Tav was not her.
Astarion: “Would you like to tell me your name then?”There was a slight annoyance, but he was more worried than
anything. He sat her on the table this time as she was easier to reach
than on the bench. But, Tav shook her head. She didn’t feel ready.
She needed to breathe to calm herself.
He led her there as he felt her take deep breaths to steady her pulse.
She didn’t look at him, she just burried her face in his chest. It took
her a couple of minutes to calm down.
The she looked up at him.
Tav: “I’m ready.”CHAPTER 20 – Truths, Oaths, and Vows
She let go of him and he stepped back. There were still tears on her
face, but a new fire in her eyes, and perhaps her whole being. She
stepped back on to the floor. She was determined to reclaim her
power back. Dreaven Storm had claimed her truth long enough.
Tav: “It’s time I get my name back, father.” -She whispered to
herself, but Astarion heard it.
He just waited. The ring box now safely back in his pocket. He
simply looked at her to see what she would do next.
Tav: “Astarion. I’m so sorry, but back in the woods I told you most
of my truth. I was not ready to reclaim my whole self then, but my
time has run out. No more running from my past, it seems.”
She walked towards Selune’s statue with conviction and took his
hand for him to follow her. She was still shaky, but was determined
to lay herself bare.As she stood in front of the statue, she looked up and marveled at
this diving being. Her soul recognized who she was and now she
also knew her name. She laughed.
Tav: “For years I was tormented by the very same who where
supposed to protect me, to love me. They spat my name with disdain
every time I refused to commit their crimes. They would whip me
then use healing spells to not leave scars. We had to be ‘perfect’ for
the men. It was vile. They would say my name like a curse wishing
to one day have the permission to take my body. My tormentors
taught me how to hunt, how to fight, how to kill, how to survive.
And I got fucken good at it.”
As she was speaking, she turned to Astarion, now standing in front
of her. Still quiet, just taking it all in. He would not interrup her truth
now. She has waited long enough.
Tav: “My moon was my only and best companion. From my
barracks to the trees I had to escape to, she was there. She lit the
way, to safety and even to food. Since I was a babe, I followed her
everywhere. She led me out of the clan’s forest grounds and into
other lands far enough away. I always ran. I felt they were chasing
me. Dreaven doesn’t loose easily and a banishing brand wouldn’t besomething to stop him. He’d done it before. But he hasnt’ found me,
yet.”
She began to remove her boots and her socks.
Tav: “When I was banished and kicked out, I was hunted. I became
their test. They chased me for weeks. I wanted to die, but I couldn’t.
I wasn’t going to give them the satisfaction to rid of me. So, when I
was now alone, I lost my name. There was no one left to call me that
name. There was no one. I was alone, abandoned, cast aside. I did
everything they demanded, yet the one thing they couldn’t do was
the reason to eliminate me. Monsters the lot of them, no better than
the ones down there. At least those have a purpose.”
Her anger was rising. It was a difficult mask to destroy. She removed
her belt and little items and placed them on the floor.
Tav: “So, for what seemed to be a long time, I didn’t speak. I just
existed like one more animal in the forest. I began to lose myself. I
was feral. I was wild. I chose to not be me anymore. I lost my
name.”She had to take a moment to compose herself. She closed her eyes
and tilted her head back. She was fighting her grief. She was tired of
crying. She wanted to purge the last remains of her father’s curse
and he didn’t deserve her tears.
Tav: “By the time I was 25, I had been out of the Great Wild Woods
for some time. I had kept moving and eventually stopped at the
Forest of Lethyr. There some settlements near that forest and I began
to make products to trade with them. I didn’t need to, I wanted to
have an excuse to go and learn about people. But it was so difficult.
They saw me like some feral beast that was pretending to not be it.
And I had no name to give. I didn’t want to give it. It was still
tainted with the venom from home.”
She sighed. Then she removed her pants, slowly.
Tav: “I kept going back and forth with humans, trying to learn their
ways, but it was so hard, you know. Their rules and their opinions
that always contradict. Then the way they treated each other
depending on how much gold they had. Once I was even kicked out
of the town market because I scared the man in a dress! Me! Look at
me! Am I frightening? Don’t answer that.”He didn’t but he did smirk a little. She cold be a little scary
especially if she was angry. She removed her top and her necklace
that she was wearing as a bracelet.
Tav: “I stopped going to that town. Then I went to the one beside it.
Nyth, I think. That one was a little better. There were more people
due to the rivers.”
She gave a little jolt at that. Then she took a deep breath and
continued.
Tav: “By then, I had learned to sell pelts and poutices, and preserves.
I had begun to buy clothes like theirs, too. It was a disguise I would
use when I went to the town. Then one day, an old woman kept
looking at me. All day she would just linger around. Until I was
packing my things to head back to the forest that she decided to
come to me. She told me that I reminded her of her daughter. She
had been found drowned in the river when she was young. She never
got closure. She offered me some tea at her home and told me about
her girl. A fun girl, full of life. Her whole life cut short. I stayed with
that woman for a week until her heart gave. She was lonely like me
and she wanted not be. Her daughter’s name was Tav.”Tav let a tear escape. That was one of few good memories she had
before Astarion.
Tav: “I promised Urith that I would honor her Tav by taking her
name and living a long good life. She smiled at me and she closed
her eyes. Then I went to the town cryier to announce her death. I
never returned to that town for I knew they would blame me for the
inevitable.”
Then, Tav looked up at Selune and smiled. Her tears finally falling
from the corners of her eyes. She took in a big breath.
Tav: “Then one day, I woke up in a broken glass case. I was scared
and all my stuff was gone. My weapons, my clothes, mememtos. All
of it back at the forest. I didn’t know where I was. Then I met
Lae’Zel. I had never met someone like her, but she was a soldier like
I had been, so I followed her. I gave her Tav’s name. It was by
mistake, but I didn’t have the heart to correct myself. I had promised
Urith that Tav would live through me. So, I let her live, and what I
life I gave her. But, it is time for Tav to go back to herself.”
She removed her final clothes and now was bare. He couldn’t stop
looking at her. All of this was a lot to take in. But he understood thatthis is something she would do. Give herself to others who were
robbed, like he was.
Astarion: “Then who are you?”
He felt a pang of longing. He needed to know who was this woman
who gave herself to him fully but now had no name.
Tav: “The woman you have met. The woman you have travelled
with. The woman you have learned to love. That is me. All of it has
been me. The only thing that was not me has been the name I took to
honor a dead girl who was stolen from a friend. I promised to give
her a good life, and I did. But, now it is my turn to reclaim myself. I
need to take back my name from the monster who gave it to me. It is
time that my story belongs to me and to you, my lover.”
She reached her hand out to take his hand. He seemed frozen in
place. Then his legs began to move towards her. The closer he got to
her, the stronger the pull he felt. His ears were crackling with static.
He felt the energy like an aura that was either coming from her or the
stature or both. Even his tongue felt electric. Once he was in front of
her, she began to help him remove his clothes. Then he helped. He
didn’t know why.Now, the two naked bodies stood before Selune. Tav kissed him and
held him. He did the same. Then she whispered to him “feed” and he
bit her a second time. Two gulps. He then licked her wound. Now a
little pink because it hadn’t had time to heal properly.
He licked his lips. It was as if he was in a dream, but wasn’t sure if it
was going to turn into a nightmare or not. She caressed his cheek
with her warm hand then leaned in to kiss it.
Tav: “Thank you for being patient. Today, I have to return to my
body, fully return. I can no longer carry my past into the future we
are working towards. You will need me fully. I have to let Tav go. I
have to return and I am glad you are here with me to receive the
woman I hid for so long.”
She still had his hand on hers. Then she reached to touch the statue
and finally the link was established. She felt now a burst of energy
coursed through her body and made the hairs stand up. It didn’t hurt,
but it was strong enough to make them glow for some seconds. Then
she let go of the statue.
Astarion was a bit shocked about what had just happened, but it was
as if a burden had lifted from his heart. Like all lies he carried were
now forgiven and left behind. His face showed a clear confusion asto what happened. But seeing her face, so full of love for him, made
him be at peace.
Then she spoke:
“Astarion Ancunin. Look at me. I am not Tav of the Storm clan. She
never was a Storm clan. She was human. I am not. I let her borrow
me like a vessel to live the life that was stolen from her. She became
me and I became her. But every single thing that I have lived, every
moment of happiness I experienced, I shared it with her. I am the one
who fell in love with you. I am the one that chose to be with you. I
am the one who chose to be your protector, even from yourself.
Though, I was weak. I didn’t want to let her go. I never thought that
you wanted to marry, so I didn’t bother with letting her go. But, then
you wanted to spend the rest of my days with you, and it all came
crashing down. My time for running has come to an end. My time as
Tav is also done.”
She took both his hands and looked him straight in his eyes. She had
never been as honest, as bare as now. She hoped to all the gods that
he would still chose her. She took a deep breath and exhaled.
She continued:“My name-… it’s-… River, from the Storm Clan. River Storm for
short.”
Astarion: “WHAT?! HAHAHAHAHA. A bloody River!”
He steped forward to embrace her and he cried. The irony of this
impossible woman. The very thing that she’s been working for him
to not be hurt by in their journey. The very water that can so easily
kill him. He had always thought of her like the fury of the oceans
and now she reveals her true form. He cried in relief.
Not only was she the light in this darkness, but now she was the river
that would water the lands to have them grow. She cried with him.
She was free. She was back. She was home.
Astarion: “You mad, impossible, beautiful woman. Thank you for
existing. Thank you for flowing into me like the fury only you could
carry.”
He lifted her to kiss her and she wrapped her legs around him. She
kissed him with a passion of someone no longer bound by chains.
She was fully his now. And he was hers. Then he felt as his knees
gave and they fell on top of their clothes.This reminded them of the cementery back at Baldur’s Gate.
Astarion had his chance to be reborn. Now it was her turn.
He claimed her as his own, but now it was as her true self.
Their bodies were crackling with little burst of static electricity and
they felt it, but it didn’t matter. He made love to his woman at the
feet of Selune, her first protector. He vowed to protect her now and
as he was making love to her, she vowed to protect him, his siblings
and this land in the name and honor of Selune. As her thought came,
a burst of light fell on them from the moon stone.
River: “Feed, my love. Feed.”
Astarion: “Gladly.”
As he bit into her, while covered in the light that didn’t hurt them, as
he was inside her, he felt how she tasted different. No longer was she
earthy. She tasted like the forest, like the fresh air, and the trees, and
like the rain. Perhaps it was the dead woman who gave her the
earthy taste, but she was gone now. This River flowed into him and
didn’t burn. He felt as if they were finally, trully one. He took a third
gulp, and then let go.As he let go, they climaxed together once more and the light finally
stopped shining on them. It never hurt. They were just two bodies,
bare. She was panting, but smiling. He was smiling too and rolled
over. Something poke him on the back. He reached over to get it. It
was the box.
Astarion: “River Storm, marry me.”
River: “Yes, my love. I will. Let us be blessed here and now, and
forever.”
He took her ring and placed it on her left index finger.
Astarion: “We have come a long way to get here. We have a long
way to go, but now it’s official.”
River took the ring for him and inspected it. It was quite lovely. She
placed it on his left index finger.
River: “Astarion Ancunin, I vow to protect you and love you and be
there for you. I loved you then, I love you now, and I will love you
forever and always.”Then she kissed his ring hand and he did the same to her. It was
done. From the Ravaged Beach to Cazador’s Palace, and now
vowing to help his River build a safe haven for those like him at
Selune’s feet. They both traveled through hell and back, but the
journey was worth the prize. They were together as one.
Now, River felt very tired as if all the energy and tingles had finally
consumed her own reserves. Even Astarion felt a bit tired.
Astarion: “Perhaps we should get dressed, wife of mine.”
River blushed and giggled. But agreed. She stood up and grabbed
her things and his and took off.
River: “But not these. They are dusty.”
She went to the room where the tables were. That would be the first
place to fix up.
River: “Can you go get the packs and bring them here, my husband.”
She giggled at that. He smiled, but went. He felt a little strange
walking naked like that, but it was fine. It wasn’t like some random
stranger was watching him walk up the steps, get the packs, then
walk down and go into their future kitchen, right?He placed the packs on one of the tables and began to take out some
clean clothes. Then got dressed with everything except weapons.
Something told them that nothing would dare bother them at this
place, their claimed home.
River: “Right then. Let’s get dirty. I found some ancient brooms. I
wonder how long for them to give. But, they’ll do for now. So, I was
thinking we start here. Clean this up and have it be our base before
we head out there and find the babes. We should scout this area
around and remove whatever threats lurk around. Then fix up the
upper area to have it ready for guests. I just saw that this wall has a
portal, too. We have a lot of work to do.”
Astarion: “Ugh. I’m already having to do husband work. I might not
be able to help with all of it.”
River: “Oh, shut up. Don’t be such a baby. How about we go fix the
metal fence that is at the window to secure this place a bit more?”
Astarion: “Fine. But, I will complain as I do it.”
River: “And I will tease you as you do.”
They headed back up to the now room on the right. River having
grabbed her rope. He jumped down to tie the rope first and have herpull. He lifted the metal and together, they were able to lift it back up
to cover the window. For now, it would remain in place with the
rope, but they were going to see what else they had available. She
felt safer already.
Then Astarion looked at the fence that gave way to the Underdark.
He saw that there were 2 statues that were the ones that shot
anything that came near. He was warry of it. It was powerful magic.
River: “It won’t hurt us. The beams of moonlight. It is not going to
hurt us.”
Astarion: “You seem so sure. What makes you say that?
River: “Selune blessed us as we made love at her feet. We are to care
for her home, out home, she wont’ hurt us.”
Astarion: “But what about the spawn? We will need to deactivate it
then.”
River: “No, she won’t hurt us. My essense is part of you. Yours and
theirs share a common link. You are the reason they will be safe. I
am the reason you will be safe. We are all connected. She won’t hurt
us.”
Astarion: “What in the hells?”
River: “Not the hells, but let me show you.”She took off and wiggled herself through a broken wall and went
around, barely missing the exploding fauna. Then she stood outside
the gate, at a distance that the beams could hit her, but didn’t.
River: “See, you wont’ hurt us. She chose us to take care of her
temple. But we will start here, at the outpost. Then, with time and a
lot of work, we will work our way up. It will be a safe haven for all,
not just a weird place for weird scholars wearing dresses or weird
folks reading books and only that.”
Astarion: “Hahahaha. Don’t let Gale or Shadowheart hear you say
that.”
River: “Don’t tell them. I didn’t mean them. I like them. But, I mean
it is a dress.”
They both laughed as she scaled the rocks to climb back in. They
were now having a fun time as they fixed up the place. After a
couple of hours, Astarion had lit the fire place and Tav was heating
up some food.
Astarion: “So, I’ve been wondering, if you and Halsin are both
wood-elves, why don’t you work with animals like he does?|
River: “I don’t feel I should. I had to kill many when I was training
and I don’t have the heart to team up. I prefer them to be wild. Free.Also, he is a Beast Master. I am not. I am a hunter. Well, I am now.
The Storm clan are Gloom Stalkers, but I think they took it too far.
Bunch of wackos if you ask me.”
Astarion: “Huh-… That explains so much. No wonder you have no
qualms about being in the Underdark.”
River: “I don’t fear the shadows. They made me. I fear not having
you here with me though. I like having you around. Now, more so.”
She stuck her hand out to marvel at her pretty ring. She loved it, but
she loved the man who gave her the ring even more.
River: “So, when did you buy them?”
Astarion: “Elturel-… after we fought.”
He looked a little ashamed. She stood up to hug him.
River: “Thank you for listening. I think you have learned about love.
And so much more. But now we will have to learn about running a
settlement.”
They both looked at each other. They knew that the next chapter in
their lives would be challenging, but they were sure that with the
help of their friends, and a little divine guidence, everything was
going to be all right.
